


  p. 2230 (#1187)                      

ity
DEC 2_1926
7
United States
Naval Institute
Proceedings

VOL. 51
DECEMBER, 1925
NO. 274


NST
NAV
NAVAL
ACADEMY
U.S. N
TUTE
EX
IDENS
*
1873
>
SCIENTIA
2231
2242
2244
2259
2265
2276
2286
2289
CONTENTS
Sea Power and Pocketbooks.-Knox . .
Bombing Radius as Affected by Wind.-Schuyler.
Naval Mining and Naval Mines.—Bagby. . . . .
Naval Aircraft in International Law.-Sherman
Control of the Seas by an Air Department.-Kieffer . .
Direct Reading Maneuvering Diagrams.-Willson . .
A Device for Solving for True Wind.-Gilmer . .
The Destroyer Engineer in Battle.-Fairlamb.
A Destroyer Division Commander's Inspection.—Godfrey
The War Staff Idea Afloat.-Wright. .
United States Occupation of the Dominican Republic.—Baughman
Are You Worth It?-Brown.
Discussion
Professional Notes
Notes on International Affairs
Book Reviews .
Secretary's Notes
Index to Volume 51.
2293
2298
2306
2328
2334
2341
2407
2414
2423
2431


  p. 2230 (#1188)                      


FUEL OIL
GAS OIL
DIESEL OIL
There is more power in
THAT GOOD GULF GASOLINE
and
SUPREME AUTO OIL
GULF REFINING COMPANY
New York
Boston
New Orleans
Philadelphia
Atlanta
Houston
General Sales Office
PITTSBURGH, PA.


  p. 2230 (#1189)                      

United States
Naval Institute
Proceedings
December, 1925
Edited by H. A. Baldridge

SESONG
INS
VAL
TIT
U.S.N
TU T
verse
1873
U. S. Naval Institute
Publication Office: Menasha, Wisconsin
Editorial and Business Ofice: Annapolis, Maryland


  p. 2230 (#1190)                      

1855 ,
1925
CRANE V ALVES .

HIGH PRESSURE CAST STEEL BALANCED STOP VALVE
We can supply any valve
or fitting for any ship
CRANE
Address all inquiries to Crane Co., Chicago
GENERAL OFFICES: CRANE BUILDING, 836 S. MICHIGAN AVENUE, CHICAGO
Branches and Sales Ofices in One Hundred and Fifty Cities
National Exhibit Rooms: Chicago, New York, Atlantic City, San Francisco and Montreal
Works: Chicago, Bridgeport, Birmingham, Chattanooga, Trenton and Montreal
CRANE EXPORT CORPORATION: NEW YORK, SAN FRANCISCO, SHANGHAI
CRANE LIMITED: CRANE BUILDING, 386 BEAVER HALL SQUARE, MONTREAL
CRANE-BENNETT, LTD., LONDON
CW CRANE: PARIS, NANTES, BRUSSELS


  p. 2230 (#1191)                      

UNITED STATES
NAVAL INSTITUTE
P R O C E E DINGS
Vol. No. 51, No. 12
DECEMBER, 1925
WHOLE No. 274
Y..........................
2286
Contents
SEA POWER AND POCKETBOOKS. By Captain Dudley W.
Knox, U. S. Navy, RETIRED.......
2231
BOMBING RADIUS AS AFFECTED BY WIND. BY COMMANDER
GARRET L. SCHUYLER, U. S. Navy.......
2242
NAVAL MINING AND NAVAL MINES. BY THE LATE LIEU-
TENANT COMMANDER OLIVER W. Bagby, U. S. NAVY... 2244
NAVAL AIRCRAFT IN INTERNATIONAL LAW. By LIEUTENANT
FORREST SHERMAN, U. S. Navy................. 2259
CONTROL OF THE SEAS BY AN AIR DEPARTMENT. By LIEU-
TENANT COMMANDER H. M. KIEFFER, U. S. Navy...... 2265
DIRECT READING MANEUVERING DIAGRAMS. BY COMMANDER
RUSSELL WILLSON, U. S. Navy....
2276
A DEVICE FOR SOLVING FOR TRUE WIND. By LIEUTENANT
F. H. GILMER, U. S. Navy.......
THE DESTROYER ENGINEER IN BATTLE. BY LIEUTENANT
GEORGE R. FAIRLAMB, JR., U. S. Navy........
2289
A DESTROYER DIVISION COMMANDER'S INSPECTION. BY LIEU-
TENANT V. H. GODFREY, U. S. Navy.....
2293
THE WAR STAFF IDEA AFLOAT. BY LIEUTENANT H. J.
WRIGHT, U. S. Navy...............
UNITED STATES OCCUPATION OF THE DOMINICAN REPUBLIC.
By COMMANDER C. C. BAUGHMAN, U. S. NAVY.......
ARE You WORTH IT? BY LIEUTENANT COMMANDER WAL-
TER E. BROWN, U. S. Navy...........
DISCUSSION ........
PROFESSIONAL NOTES .......
2341
NOTES ON INTERNATIONAL AFFAIR
2407
BOOK REVIEWS .......
2414
SECRETARY'S NOTES
2423
INDEX TO VOLUME 51........................
....
2431
The writers. only are responsible for the contents of their respective articles
2298
2306
2328
2334
S
.....
Editor, Captain H. A. Baldridge; Assistant Editor, Lieutenant Com-
mander R. S. Field.
Published monthly at 450 Ahnaip St., Menasha, Wis.
Executive, Editorial, and Business Offices, U. S. Naval Institute,
Annapolis, Md.
Entered as second-class matter at the post-office at Menasha, Wis.,
April 4, 1922, and at the post-office at Annapolis, Md., under Act of Aug. 24,
ce for mailing at the special rate of postage provided for
in section 1103, Act of Oct. 3, 1919, authorized Mar. 13, 1922.
Membership dues (including Proceedings), $3.00 a year.
Subscription Rates, $5.00 a year. (Foreign postage 50c extra.) Single
copies, 50c.
Copyright, 1925, by U. S. Naval Institute


  p. 2230 (#1192)                      

OFFICERS OF THE INSTITUTE
President
REAR ADMIRAL HENRY B. WILSON, U. S. Navy
Vice-President
Vice ADMIRAL RICHARD H. JACKSON, U. S. Navy
Secretary-Treasurer
CAPTAIN H. A. BALDRIDGE, U. S. NAVY
Board of Control
REAR ADMIRAL HENRY B. WILSON, U. S. Navy (ex officio)
VICE ADMIRAL RICHARD H. JACKSON, U. S. Navy (ex officio)
BRIGADIER GENERAL GEORGE RICHARDS, U. S. MARINE CORPS
CAPTAIN W. T. CLUVERIUS, U. S. Navy
CAPTAIN W. G. DUBOSE, (CC), U. S. Navy
CAPTAIN P. B. DUNGAN, U. S. Navy
COMMANDER BYRON MCCANDLESS, U. S. Navy
LIEUTENANT COMMANDER W. G. GREENMAN, U. S. Navy
CAPTAIN H. A. BALDRIDGE, U. S. Navy (ex officio)
PAST PRESIDENTS
ADMIRAL DAVID D. PORTER, U. S. Navy, 1873
REAR ADMIRAL JOHN L. WORDEN, U. S. Navy, 1874
REAR ADMIRAL C. R. P. RODGERS, U. S. Navy, 1875-78
COMMODORE FOXHALL A. PARKER, U. S. Navy, 1878-79
REAR ADMIRAL JOHN RODGERS, U. S. Navy, 1879-82
REAR ADMIRAL C. R. P. RODGERS, U. S. Navy, 1882-83
REAR ADMIRAL THORNTON A. JENKINS, U. S. Navy, 1883-85
REAR ADMIRAL EDWARD SIMPSON, U. S. Navy, 1885-87
REAR ADMIRAL STEPHEN B. LUCE, U. S. Navy, 1887-98
REAR ADMIRAL WM. T. SAMPSON, U. S. Navy, 1898-1902
REAR ADMIRAL H. C. TAYLOR, U. S. Navy, 1902-04
REAR ADMIRAL C. F. GOODRICH, U. S. Navy, 1904-09
REAR ADMIRAL RICHARD WAINWRIGHT, U. S. Navy, 1909-11
REAR ADMIRAL BRADLEY A. FISKE, U. S. Navy, 1911-23
REAR ADMIRAL WILLIAM L. RODGERS, U. S. Navy, 1923-24


  p. 2230 (#1193)                      



  p. 2230 (#1194)                      


Photo-B. M. Powell
"Fuuu Power"


  p. 2231 (#1195)                      

UNITED STATES
NAVAL INSTITUTE
P R O C E E D I N G S
Vol. No. 51, No. 12
DECEMBER, 1925
WHOLE No. 274
SEA POWER AND POCKETBOOKS
By Captain DUDLEY W. Knox, U. S. Navy, RETIRED
(6THE American motor car owns Rio.” So said an Ameri-
can naval officer recently returned from Brazil. The
further information that Yankee automobiles have cap-
tured practically the whole South American market is from the
same source. Making due allowance for conversational exaggera-
tion, evidently "quantity production" has won against our com-
mercial competitors in this profitable field, notwithstanding their
tremendous advantage of cheap labor at home.
Our exports of automobiles are now approaching the rate of a
half million per year. What this means, translated into terms
of the number of American workingmen employed and the number
of dollars in the pockets of each, we will leave to the resourceful
statistician. Certainly American imagination can reach far enough
over the horizon to comprehend the relation of this fact to the
recent revival of prosperity in the automobile industry. The
enormous plants, the great numbers of persons employed in then,
and our modern development of machinery and methods of manu-
facture, have created such an immense production capacity that the
industry must soon face hard times in the absence of extensive
foreign markets.
Between the high pressure of productive capacity and the
suction of foreign demand there is required a connection of trans-
portation, if the circuit of business and its attending prosperity is
to be completed. To understand our recent success in South
American trade and the consequent fattening of pockets among


  p. 2232 (#1196)                      

2232
[Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
our workingmen at home we should know something of the part
played by American shipping.
Until recently our comparatively small trade with Argentina
and Brazil was carried by a few slow foreign ships. The principal
fast routes were by way of Europe, thus making it very difficult
for us to compete in marketing the class of goods manufactured
both in Europe and America. When our government established
direct fast lines to South America, trade was greatly stimulated,
and notwithstanding initial operating losses by the shipping lines,
the country as a whole has undoubtedly reaped a large net profit
from the automobile business alone.
Of course ocean transportation is only one of the important
elements outside of our borders which enter into the general ques-
tion of marketing our exports. Banking facilities, port arrange-
ments, and commercial agencies on a background of overseas
American investments are all a part of a foreign trade structure
in which we must follow in the steps of our greatest competitors.
But American-owned ocean shipping nevertheless remains as the
keystone without which the structure will fall.
The example of our automobile trade to Latin America is merely
symptomatic of much greater things. Our huge surplus produc-
tive capacity is not limited to the manufacture of automobiles. It
exists in almost every American activity. We have applied quan-
tity production principles to a great variety of occupations, from
the construction of ships, railroads, and irrigation works to the
output of raw materials such as coal and wheat. The depths of
our stupendous capacity to produce, through Americanized appli-
cation of power and of the division of labor principle, were never
sounded until the war.
That ended, we stood astonished at our genius, and were actu-
ally confronted with the necessity of drastically cutting down the
output of everything, from grains of wheat to ocean liners. The
world had been our market and we had demonstrated our ability
to meet the needs of a large part of it.
In the hard times following the war the farmer, the miner, and
the mechanic, no less than the bond holder, had a taste of what
it means to run this giant producer country on a basis of supplying
only the home market. But for the process of "motorizing" the
United States, now largely completed, depression would have been
very acute.


  p. 2233 (#1197)                      

1925]
Sea Power and Pocketbooks
2233
Our evolution of quantity production has brought us to a con-
dition parallelled only once before in history. England was in
much the same situation before and during the Napoleonic era.
The invention of cotton spinning machinery, the advent of the
use of steam power, and the application of the division of labor
principle were the primary elements of a sudden and great ex-
pansion of that country's productive capacity to undreamed of pro-
portions. This so-called “industrial revolution” happened to co-
incide with a virtual British monopoly of the world's carrying
trade at sea. With no competition either in production or trans-
portation there seemed to be no limit to the wealth which could
be acquired; and no dream ever came more true.
For nearly a century she was the only industrialized nation, in
a modern sense. The world was her market. Even the loss of this
country as a colony did not prevent us from remaining her best
customer. Production-transportation-markets—were the trinity
of Britain's unparalleled wealth.
Today, notwithstanding the titanic expenditures of treasure
which the war forced her to make, England is probably still the
richest of nations, notwithstanding propaganda to the contrary.
In the more modern "industrial revolution" of "quantity pro-
duction” which American genius has brought about we now stand
as England did a century and more ago, only in respect to a sudden
and remarkably increased productive capacity. In the world's
markets we find, instead of a monopoly, very keen competition
from several highly industrialized nations. This we are able to
meet with reasonable success, by virtue of the cheapness and excel-
lence of quantity production products, provided the third element
of the wealth trinity—transportation—is adequately provided for.
President Wilson's far-sighted vision of restoring the American
Merchant Marine to something of its former eminence on the seas
has met with disappointment. The most recent chapter, the sale
of some 200 vessels, at about one-hundredth part of their cost
price, to be broken up for scrap metal, seems to be about con-
summated. Doubtless several important causes contributed to the
failure, but we need to give especial attention here to only two of
them, viz: (1) adverse foreign influence exerted in this country,
and (2) a seeming lack of understanding by the American people


  p. 2234 (#1198)                      


LEVIATHAN
U.S. Shipping Board
THE "LEVIATHAN"


  p. 2235 (#1199)                      

1925]
2235
Sea Power and Pocketbooks
at large of the close relation between an American Merchant
Marine and American prosperity.
As to the foreign influence we should recall the unusual episode
of President Harding making a vigorous public protest against
foreign lobbies attempting to influence national legislation, at the
time he was fighting for a subsidy. If foreign influence will go to
such lengths it is reasonable to suppose that they will employ other
easier devices. One of the “lessons” of the war which stood out
so clearly as to be beyond dispute was that our press had been
freely used for foreign propaganda, apparently for many years.
Did our competitors in the ocean carrying trade then omit anti-
American Merchant Marine propaganda and are they now neg-
lecting it? The importance of this matter would seem to make
an investigation of it worth while. Judging from the strength
of the anti-American Navy propaganda now being carried on both
here and abroad, It seems a fair assumption that much (if not all)
of the home opposition to the best interests of our mercantile sea
power could be traced to the same sources. Perhaps the failure
of our people in general to grasp the importance of having an
American ocean transportation system is due to foreign propa-
ganda.
Certainly there have been sufficient recent examples demon-
strating the dependence of our national prosperity upon American
shipping. During the Boer War, Great Britain diverted so much
shipping to war uses as to create a shortage on our coasts. Hard
times came to America as a direct result. Prosperity returned to
us with the ships. These experiences were repeated on a grander
scale during the World War. In 1915-16 we were again shown
the hard fact that prosperity requires more than the production
of goods and the dumping of them at the seaboard. We filled all
the warehouses and all the freight cars. The latter accumulated
at the salt water terminals in such numbers as to cause the greatest
of freight blockades. Finally goods had to be dumped along the
roadside and left to deteriorate in the open. Millions of farmers,
miners, and mechanics were thrown out of work through the neces-
sity of shutting down production.
The American people are not stupid. They can understand
such elementary facts in spite of the most insidious adverse propa-
ganda, if proper publicity is given to the matter. This has not
been done with sufficient persistence and scope. It is true that


  p. 2236 (#1200)                      

2236
(Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
for a long time the undeveloped condition of the country caused
a cessation of interest in maritime affairs, and people would not
take the trouble to think them out. But conditions are rapidly
changing and all that should be required now is correct informa-
tion upon, and analysis of, our own maritime and economic inter-
ests in our own press by our own citizens having no foreign affili-
ations.
III.
In earlier periods of our history there was no lack of appreci-
ation of the foregoing. The intimate relationship between codfish,
tobacco, pepper, tea, sugar, and so forth, on the one hand and fat
pocketbooks on the other, when linked with ocean transportation,
was well understood. In those days the American trading vessel
swarmed the seas. Then also the function of a navy as a great
agency of national prosperity was better understood.
Naval power is one of the two hands of sea power—whether we
consider a state either of peace or war. The war function of the
· Navy needs no attention here. The peace function of the Navy,
on the other hand, seems to be little understood by naval officers,
and by the public of today almost not at all. In any event, there
is no clear cut comprehension of the Navy as a great instrument of
prosperity, an important agency of the national economic welfare,
a vital factor in the price of wheat and in the wages of the indus-
trial worker. Such is the fact and it is largely the Navy's fault
that the country fails to understand. Once such a thesis is made
clear to our people the teeth of the foreign propagandist will have
been drawn and the number of anti-navy pacifists will dwindle to
insignificance. A pacifist may love peace but he loves a fat pocket-
book even more.
IV.
Within the last few years there has been no want of literature
made available to service readers respecting the many ways in
which the Navy fosters and protects our Merchant Marine and
foreign trade during peace. The history of our Navy abounds in
striking examples of splendid and vital service in this respect, from
its very beginning to the present day. Perhaps the most notable
are the Barbary operations; the opening of China, Japan, and
Korea; the West Indian operations extending over a long period,
and the current operations in China which promise to be of long
duration.


  p. 2237 (#1201)                      

1925]
2237
Sea Power and Pocketbooks
The pacifist will remark that for such work we do not need
a large navy. The answer is that we do. Competition is too
keen to permit of any long continued, stabilized, large scale trade
in the world's best markets by any weak naval power—at least
until human nature changes, and President Coolidge's remark in
his inaugural address, that the most unchangeable thing in the
world is human nature, is worth remembering.
The ratios of naval strength established by the Washington
Conference were supposed to be proportioned according to the
interests of the respective powers and to assure each a reasonable
security against aggressive action. It does not appear to be to the
commercial or other interest of any of these powers that one of
them should reduce its naval power below the agreed ratio. We
need the stabilizing check of our full Treaty Navy upon each
of them just as much as they need the check of their navy upon us
and upon others. Thus will be afforded the minimum likeli-
hood of war arising from the great commercial rivalries which lie
in the near future, and the maximum probability of fair competi-
tion, which is all that America asks.
The writer personally is in favor of a further limitation of arma-
ments provided that all reduce proportionately, and that the major
terms of Mr. Hughes' original proposal, to which all formally sub-
scribed in principle, are complied with. It will also be needful to
guard against a too drastic reduction since there is a minimum of
numbers below which navies will be inefficient in covering im-
portant large areas of ocean. Moreover universally weak navies
would simply mean that armed merchantmen would assume an ex-
aggerated importance in naval warfare and countries possessing
large merchant marines, especially of the liner type, would have
much the greatest advantage in controlling the sea and maritime
trade.
The whole question of naval ratios and naval power revolves
about commercial competition and the ocean transportation that is
essential to success in such competition. All can be reduced to
terms of individual pocketbooks.
Dependence upon foreign shipping as the vital extension of
our transportation system, from tidewater railroad terminals to
overseas markets, is certain to favor the success in those markets
of the commercial competitor who carries our goods. It is certain
to mean restricted output of our factories, mines, and farms, and
consequently lowered general prosperity and leaner pocketbooks in


  p. 2238 (#1202)                      


EU
Kindness of United States Lines
S.S. "AMERICA," OF THE UNITED States LINES


  p. 2239 (#1203)                      

19251
2239
Sea Power and Pocketbooks
the United States. A large and successful merchant marine cannot
be permanently maintained by this country without a navy of pro-
portionate size. In other words, an adequate navy is one of the
essential major elements in the pocketbook of the man on the
street. This is what the people of most of our commercial com-
petitors understand and what our own people do not. This is one
of the important aspects of our national maritime interests which
naval officers are in duty bound to make clear to the country, no
less than matters connected with the national defense in war.
V.
As an agency of the federal government under the Constitution
the Navy is properly an instrument for the promotion of the gen-
eral welfare of the nation. As previously mentioned the Navy
has always performed this function well, in its broad sphere re-
specting maritime commerce afloat. But the writer conceives that
the Navy's responsibilities do not end here and, especially in view
of certain peculiar conditions existing in the United States, are
extended to an important degree into the field of public informa-
tion and education upon maritime questions affecting the national
interests and welfare.
It may be fairly said that the great mass of Americans have little
conception of what constitutes their maritime interests, of the
vital relation between foreign trade and national prosperity, of the
intimate association between an American merchant marine and
their own pocketbooks, nor of the rôle of a navy as an agency of
the national economic welfare-in short, of the matters comprising
the main theme of this article.
The reasons for this unusual want of appreciation by the Amer-
ican people of the elementary feature of their own maritime
interests are doubtless manifold. Concentration of attention and
energy upon internal development, the size of the country, its
wealth, and what not, have played a part. But particular attention
is drawn here to that phase of the question which pertains to public
information and education. The opinions of most persons are
formed by what they hear and what they read, and the last few
generations of Americans have had little opportunity to hear or
read clear-cut and complete expositions of their own maritime in-
terests. This seems to have been brought about by the great
dearth of competent American writers and speakers, and con-


  p. 2240 (#1204)                      

2240
[Dec
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
sequently by a dependence of the American press and platforms
upon foreigners or persons of foreign affiliations. Is there any
wonder that American public opinion is now largely opposed, un-
consciously, to what are actually their perfectly legitimate and
equitable maritime interests ?
Reference to President Harding's public protest against for-
eign lobbies opposing legislation favorable to American shipping
will bear repeating here, together with the natural assumption that
the same un-American influences utilized our, perhaps innocent,
press to sway public opinion. We had another example of the
“open door” to the American press on maritime questions during
the Washington Conference, when all publicity connected there-
with was placed exclusively in the hands of a foreign publicity
organization. The gun elevation controversy furnishes another
illustration. On the first morning when it became a news item
there appeared a long editorial in one of the leading New York
papers giving a perfect presentation of the side of the case against
America. There could be no question of this paper being thor-
oughly American on general issues. Inquiries by the writer as to
its naval editor led to the information that he had been born in the
country whose side of the case he was espousing, and was possibly
still a citizen of that country. The paper was one of the kind which
is widely followed, especially on maritime questions, by the press
of the interior of the country, and whose "service" is paid for and
regularly used by many smaller papers.
Many other cases could be cited to show a widespread foreign
influence in our press upon matters affecting American interests
on the sea, but space forbids more than one more. During the last
two years an old and prominent American periodical has published
a series of articles by its naval editor, all sustaining a thesis con-
trary to the American side of a naval controversy. Practically
without exception all of the facts in the case which favor the
American side have been omitted or have received scant notice,
while all the facts of opposite import have been magnified unduly
and dwelt upon at great length. Many of the technical premises
taken are seriously in error, though this fact would not be appar-
ent to non-technical persons. Inquiry disclosed the information
that the naval editor of this periodical also had been born in the
country which his articles had defended and had not come to
America until a young man.


  p. 2241 (#1205)                      

1925]
Sea Power and Pocketbooks
2241
Several of the articles mentioned in the last paragraph contained
slurs upon American naval officers and one of them dwelt at
length upon the alleged fact that our naval officers had been trying
to deceive the country with regard to the Naval Treaty. Develop-
ing this idea the foreign-born author had the temerity and affront-
ery to advocate strongly the suppression of naval officers. Since
then a number of articles by various authors have appeared, both
in this country and abroad, the general tenor of which is to cast
discredit not only upon the judgment and intelligence of American
naval officers but upon their integrity also.
When we consider that naval officers are the only group of per-
sons in this country of any considerable numbers who are com-
petent to advise the country as to its own maritime interest-
including both commercial and naval—it appears to be high time
that we awoke to our responsibilities respecting publicity. It
scarcely seems proper to leave the prosperity of the country any
longer in the hands of persons affiliated with our commercial com-
petitors. That is the effect of the present conditions because of
the power of the press in moulding public opinion. In other coun-
tries there are large groups of civilians well versed in maritime
and naval matters. Here in America such civilians are too few
to cope with the situation; the country is too big, the people have
too little interest in, and understanding of, such affairs, and strong
unsound prejudices already exist, apparently as the result of many
years of propaganda.
The propriety and duty of naval officers participating in proper
publicity is beyond question. By law, upon being commissioned,
we each take an oath to support and defend the Constitution of
the United States. One of the cardinal objects expressed in the
preamble of that famous document is to promote the general wel-
fare of the nation created by it. We are therefore sworn to pro-
mote the general welfare of America, no less than to share in its
defense. The general welfare of America depends to a very large
degree upon her maritime power, both mercantile and naval, and
the greatest obstacle to such power at present is an uninformed or
misinformed public. This obstacle cannot be well overcome with-
out the substantial aid of the Navy in the publicity field. Our
technical education and training have been paid for out of the
public treasury. The country has every right to our technical
advice and guidance. Let it hear from us.


  p. 2242 (#1206)                      

BOMBING RADIUS AS AFFECTED BY WIND
By COMMANDER GARRET L. SCHUYLER, U. S. NAVY
TO SWIM a mile and back at two miles an hour takes sixty
minutes. But if one swims it down with, and up against, a
mile-an-hour current, one mile is made at three miles an
hour, taking twenty minutes, and the other at one mile an hour,
taking sixty minutes. The time for the round trip is thus in-
creased one third because the slower progress is made over a
longer period than the faster progress.
Similarly, when a bomber flies to an objective and back, there is
always a net loss in bombing radius if a steady wind exists. The
average condition is no more favorable than a steady wind.
Bombing radii must therefore be somewhat discounted and, as the
fact seems so generally overlooked, it may be interesting to see
what the usual effects amount to.
0= Angle of-wind with ground course.
W=Wind velocity.
W,=Wind across ground course, W Sin 0, SK Sin 8.
W. = Wind along ground course, W Cos 0, SK Cos 0.
S=Air Speed.
S.-Air speed along ground course.
S,=Air speed across ground course.
K=Ratio of wind to air speed, W = KS.
Ro=Bombing radius in calm.
Rv=Bombing radius in wind W.
f=Fraction by which Ro must be multiplied to get Ry under the given
conditions.
dR=Fraction of bombing radius lost by wind.
Sz=(S?–W,2)=S2 (1– K2 Sin? 0)....
.................I
Ro Ro Ro Ru
-+-=- t- ...
S S S.-W. Sz+W.
1-K?
Ro S,2-W,
so f= -=-
Ro S.S.
(1-K?Sinº)1/2


  p. 2243 (#1207)                      

19251
2243
Bombing Radius as Affected by Wind
By formula III, we may produce the following table:
TABLE I
Angle Between Wind and Ground Course
0° 15° 30° | 45° 60° 7 5°
|
90°
1
Avg.
.990
.992
.993
.994
.995
.980
.962
.912
Näin ist es in
.875
.969
.932
.878
.806
.715
.750
.830
.864
.708
.603
.991
.992
.993
.960
.964 .968 .974 .978
.910
.921 .931 .942 .953 .954
.840 .845 .857
.896 .915 .917
.756 .775 .800
.866
.640 .648 .670 .707 .749 .794 .800
.510 .519 1.544 .586 .640
.714
From this table may be derived the following empirical relations:
dR (max) = 1.00 (W/S).
IR (avg) = .80 (W/S).
.........V
d R (min) = .55 (W/S)2.
........... VI
and from the following comparison it appears the degree of approximation is ade-
quate.
From Table I
From IV, V and VI.
dR(max)
dR(avg) | DR(min)
dR(max) | dR(avg)
dR(min)
.010
.007
.005
.010
.008
005
.031
.040
.040
.090
ä en it is in in
.020
.046
.083
. 134
. 160
.068
.122
.194
.285
.397
.032
.072
.128
.200
.288
392
.090
.160
.250
.360
.490
.250
.360
.490
.022
.049
.188
.138
.198
.270
.200
.
.7
.286
1
According to page 60, Monthly Weather Review, Supplement
No. 20, weather at 1,000 meters altitude, the annual average of
wind velocities at six well scattered stations in the United States
is 22 knots. Taking a 60-knot bomber and assuming a steady
wind of 22 knots, the rated bombing radius (making the trip and
coming back) must be reduced never less than 7.4 per cent, 10.8
per cent on the average, and possibly as much as 13.5 per cent, de-
pending on the wind's direction.
The conclusion is that aside from all other margins which pru-
dence suggests, it is unwarranted to undertake two-way non-stop
flights with the slower planes without first discounting even the
rated endurance something on the order of 10 per cent to allow
for possible wind effects of this peculiar though readily under-
standable nature.


  p. 2244 (#1208)                      

NAVAL MINING AND NAVAL MINES
By The Late LIEUT. COMDR. OLIVER W. BAGBY, U. S. NAVY
The brief historical résumé of the history of the development and use oi
naval mines contained herein is taken from a "Study of the Mission of the
Mine Squadron,” which was prepared by Lieutenant Commander Bagby
during the time that he was mining officer of the mining squadron of the
scouting fleet. Necessarily, the confidential matter has been eliminated, but
the article is otherwise practically unchanged.
C. H. WRIGHT,
Lieutenant Commander, U.S.N.
HERE are two general classes of mines which need to be
defined before reaching a proper conception of the scope of
naval mining as distinguished from coast defense mining,
which, in the United States, is under the direction of the War De-
partment. In coast defense mining the Army uses a controlled
mine; that is, a mine whose firing circuit is led to some control
station on shore so that the mine cannot fire until an observer on
shore completes the firing circuit. The controlled mine must,
necessarily, be fixed to the bottom and must be placed in shoal
water near a shore which is commanded by our own forces. The
controlled mine then denies an area to the enemy but offers no
menace to friendly ships.
Naval mining, on the other hand, uses a contact mine, that is,
a mine whose firing circuit is complete within the mine itself so
that the mine will fire when the presence of any ship in its danger
area operates the firing mechanism. The contact mine denies the
same area to friendly ships as to the enemy. It may be a ground
mine resting on the bottom, a moored mine attached to its anchor
by means of a cable, or a drifting mine with no connection to the
bottom. The ground mine must, of course, be laid in shoal water;
the moored mine may be laid in any water where the depth is less
than five hundred fathoms; the drifting mine may be laid in any
water available to the mine-laying vessel. A description of these
types of mines will be given later.


  p. 2245 (#1209)                      

1925]
2245
Naval Mining and Naval Mines
A controlled mine is a purely defensive weapon, while the con-
tact mine may be used in a larger field either offensively or de-
fensively.
From the first use of the mine, in 1585, when vessels loaded with
explosives and fired by clockwork destroyed a bridge in the Scheldt
River, until the Russo-Japanese War in 1904, it appears that all
nations regarded the mine as a purely defensive weapon, much in
the nature of a fixed fortification for the protection of their own
ports or harbors, or for denying the enemy access to any waters
which were under their own control. This conception, or rather
this limited use of mines, left only a very small field for naval
mining. That this conception persisted in our own service even
after the Russo-Japanese War is shown by the following quota-
tions. They are taken from a letter and its endorsements which
caused the decision to remove mines from our battleships about
1910.
The mine is a purely defensive weapon.
The occasion for which particular provision should be made in use of
mines in the Navy is in connection with advanced base work.
It appears that mines now carried in battleships and armored cruisers
would rarely be used except for the fortification of an advanced base and
the mines required for such purpose would better be included in the advanced
base material handled by a special organization and carried in a special ship.
The opinion given in these quotations would limit the use of
mines to pure defense and would limit the use of such mines as
may be laid by the Navy to the fortification of an advanced base.
In a lecture delivered at our Naval War College in 1911, how-
ever, it was stated :
Now as a matter of fact, advanced base mining has nothing whatever in
common with the mining which will be required by the Navy. A different
mine is required for the two purposes and the mine ship is not fitted for
laying the type of mine which is best adapted for advanced base work.
The first war which employed naval mining in a larger field was
the Russo-Japanese War. During this war, contact mines were
extensively used by both the belligerents. The only strictly de-
fensive mine laying was done by the Russians in the bays around
Port Arthur to prevent the landing of the Japanese Army, and in
the entrance to Port Arthur to put a stop to Japanese blocking
operations. The first casualty was the sinking of two Russian


  p. 2246 (#1210)                      

2246
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
[Dec.
ships by their own hastily placed contact mines. They then de-
layed the mining of the entrance to Port Arthur until controlled
mines could be received from Russia. In this connection, an offi-
cial booklet published in 1920 entitled Joint Army and Navy
Action in Coast Defense, states :
In general, however, it must be realized that the laying of mines in our
waters is a dangerous procedure because our vessels may enter the mine
field through carelessness or some mistake or neglect in disseminating in-
formation. Mines may also break adrift and become dangerous to our
vessels.
Moored contact mines were laid offensively during the Russo-
Japanese War for the following purposes : :
a) By the Japanese to bottle up the Russians in Port Arthur.
This mining was only partially successful as the Russian mine
sweepers were able to keep a clear channel. The mine did, how-
ever, delay and hamper the movements of the Russians.
b) By both belligerents in laying mines surreptitiously on the
known cruising grounds of the enemy. This form of mining was
eminently successful. The mines were laid during the darkness
or fog, the Japanese using destroyers and small converted steam-
ers, the Russians using regular mine layers and destroyers. One
Russian and two Japanese battleships were sunk by this form of
mining
This mining may be regarded as the primary step in the offen-
sive tactics of mining, a form of tactics which was certain to de-
velop in the next war.
The Russo-Japanese War gave only one example of the use of
drifting mines. In the battle of August 10, while the Japanese
were forming their line, Japanese destroyers were sent ahead of
the Russian line. There is some question whether the destroyers
actually laid mines, although there is no doubt that they were able
to do so. An eye witness reported having seen two drifting mines.
The Russian admiral made signal: “Attention-drifting mines,”
and changed the course of the Russian fleet by four points.
Whether the Japanese destroyers actually laid mines is not im-
portant; it is important that the Russian admiral was forced, by
fear of mines, to change his course.


  p. 2247 (#1211)                      

1925)
Naval Mining and Naval Mines
2247
The following table shows the number of vessels sunk by mines
in the Russo-Japanese War:
Russian Japanese Total
Battleships ..
1 2 3
Cruisers, 2d Class ..........
O I I
Cruisers, 3d Class .........
0 1
Coast Defense Vessels, 3d Class
Mine Laying Vessels
0 1
Gunboats .....
Destroyers
2 3
Torpedo Boats
2 2
24
11 17
* Russian vessels sunk by their own mines.
After the Russo-Japanese War, all of the principal naval
powers, except the United States, gave great attention to the de-
velopment of mines, mine vessels, and mining organization, and
included the use of mines in their strategical and tactical exer-
cises. Great Britain, Japan, and Italy turned all mining over to
the navy. Austria fitted all naval vessels with mine-laying in-
stallations. England abandoned harbor defense mining entirely.
From these preparations, it is easily assumed that all nations
which gave mining serious thought and study, fully expected that
the offensive use of mines introduced in the Russo-Japanese War
would be a feature of the next naval war.
Prior to the World War, it was the intention of Germany to
mine the English ports immediately on the outbreak of war for
the purpose of delaying the mobilization of the British fleet. This
excellent plan was frustrated by the mobilization of the British
feet before war was declared. From the beginning, and through-
out the war Germany vigorously pursued a campaign of mine
laying along the English coast. For this mine laying she used
moored contact mines laid by submarines. Occasional drifting
mines were also found. This campaign forced England to adopt
practically continuous mine sweeping to keep her ports open.
To supplement the mining of English ports, the Germans also
Jaid moored mines in the vicinity of lightships, buoys, or other
navigational marks; and, in fact, at any place where they expected
either men-of-war or merchant vessels might cruise or pass. This
caused the North Sea to be more or less strewn with mines on the
chance that some of them might be effective.


  p. 2248 (#1212)                      

2248 U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
[Dec.
The Germans laid extensive fields in the Baltic and along the
eastern shores of the North Sea. These mine fields did no actual
damage to the British fleet; on the contrary they were a constant
menace to the Germans themselves. One German cruiser is known
to have been sunk by these mines. The fields were laid probably in
order to give protection to a retiring German fleet, and the known
existence of the fields did influence the tactics of the British fleet,
particularly in forcing the British battle cruisers in the Dogger
Bank action to give up the chase and to countermarch when within
fifty miles of Heligoland. This is an example of the tactical use
of moored mines for covering a retreat to a base; had the existence
of the fields not been known to the British it might have been an
example of luring an enemy over mine fields.
At the beginning of the war, England lost valuable time by not
having an efficient mine and mining organization ready for im-
mediate employment. Subsequently, British mines were laid in
the Skaggerack and Cattegat and along the eastern shores of the
North Sea in order to block the areas and channels which the Ger-
mans had left for themselves. This caused the Germans, in turn,
to adopt continuous mine sweeping to keep their North Sea bases
open.
Both England and Germany used moored contact mines defen-
sively in the protection of their naval bases. The British trusted
more to boom and net defenses, but placed mines in the nets. In
this defensive mining the controlled mine does not appear to have
been used. The Germans, using contact mines, mined themselves
in so thoroughly at Wilhelmshaven that they were unable to use
that port as an operating base. The novel reason given by them
was that the British had also mined themselves in and there was
no further prospect of an engagement between the fleets.
The biggest minin' eration of the war was the closing of the
North Sea by a Britisu field at Dover and a combined British-
American system of fields extending from the Orkneys to Nor-
way, known as the Northern Barrage. The object of these fields
was to confine German submarines to the North Sea. The fields
were laid during 1918. The Northern Barrage was not completed
when the armistice was signed; consequently the full effectiveness
was never demonstrated. Of the effect of the Northern Barrage,
Admiral Strauss stated :
With the information at present available, it appears that a total of six
submarines were destroyed in the barrage and possibly an equal number
were severely damaged.


  p. 2249 (#1213)                      

1925]
.2249
Naval Mining and Naval Mines
In the other theaters of the naval war, mines were used for
practically the same purposes stated heretofore, with one excep-
tion. During the Gallipoli campaign the Turks took advantage
of the current in the Dardanelles to launch drifting mines against
the allied ships. These mines are known to have sunk one battle-
ship and are credited with sinking two others. The Turks also
· used controlled mines with great success in connection with barbed
wire entanglements to oppose the landing of the British troops on
the Gallipoli peninsula.
The tactical use of the drifting mine in connection with a fleet
engagement, which had been so freely predicted, did not appear.
There are two probable reasons. In the first place, the North Sea,
the principal scene of the naval war, is shallow, and moored mines,
laid beforehand in known positions could be utilized in the place
of tactical mining during the progress of an engagement. In the
second place, the waters of the North Sea are so restricted, and
were already so well mined, that each side felt that further tactical
mining would offer probably as great a menace to itself as to the
enemy. It was reported that the Germans, in their raids against
English coast towns, carried mines with them in hope of sinking
pursuers, but otherwise it does not appear that mines or mine
layers were carried with either fleet.
Due to the character of the World War, merchant vessels were
probably the greatest sufferers from mines, but that mines also
sank a considerable number of men-of-war is shown by the fol-
lowing table of vessels known to have been sunk by enemy mines:
Allies Central Total
....... 6 0 6
- 3 2 5
2
2
A
2 0 2
2
hoats ....
08
.
.
.
.
.
Battleships .....
Cruisers
Light Cruisers .....
Torpedo Gunboats
Monitors
Sloops
Destroyers
Torpedo Boats ...
Mine Vessels
Commissioned Auxiliaries ..
Other Small Vessels .......
Submarines.
LAW N-acen - NNW a
ŏ w N r ät uw na na
.
.
glaooo ūONONNO
.
.
.
.
.
Total


  p. 2250 (#1214)                      

2250
[Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
From this brief history it may be seen how the use of mines de-
veloped from the Russo-Japanese War to the World War. In
general, mines were used for the same purposes in the two wars,
but there was an enormous increase in the number of mines laid.
The total laid in the Russo-Japanese War is not known but the
total in the World War was approximately 204,500.
While it would, of course, be unsafe to assume that the uses to .
which mines have been put in the past will be neglected in the
future, it would be just as unsafe to assume that new uses cannot
be found, or that the conditions of future wars will be identical
with the conditions of past wars. There seems to be a develop-
ment of mining which conditions of future wars may make ad-
vantageous. This is the tactical use of drifting mines. So far, we
have had for an example of this type of mining, only the fear of
the Russians that such mines had been laid by Japanese destroyers,
and the probable use of mine layers to accompany German raiding
expeditions against the English coast towns.
The menace of mines to the side which lays them has un-
doubtedly been a powerful deterrent in the past and must be care-
fully considered for the future.
This kind of mining divides itself into two classes: first, when
mines are laid surreptitiously with the object of damaging the
enemy by the mines and throwing him into confusion; second,
when mine laying is done with the knowledge of the enemy in
order to influence his tactics by his fear of the mine field. In both
cases, when actual mines are laid by our own fleet our tactics may
be influenced to our own disadvantage. In the first case the enemy
will not be harmed unless he passes directly over the mine field ;
therefore, it would seem that we should not lay tactical mines sur-
reptitiously unless we are reasonably certain that the enemy will
pass over the field, and that we do not require the area for our
own use.
In the second case, where the mines are laid in positions known
to the enemy, his tactics would be influenced by the mine field at
least as much as our own. Both fleets would, for safety, assume
an area much larger than that actually mined. The advantage
would lie entirely in our ability to select an area more valuable to
the enemy than to ourselves. Since the purpose of this mining is
to influence the enemy's tactics by his fear of the mines, the laying
of real mines is not necessary provided we can make the enemy


  p. 2251 (#1215)                      

1925)
Naval Mining and Naval Mines ·
2251
think we have laid real mines. The use of dummy mines in this
case would impose no disadvantage on our own fleet and would, if
the enemy is deceived, have the same effect on him as the laying
of real mines.
Tactical mining would appear to be advantageous as a means of
throwing an enemy cruising formation into confusion in prepara-
tion for torpedo attack; hampering deployment of an enemy; forc-
ing tactics disadvantageous to an enemy during battle for the
better effect of our own gunfire or torpedo; covering a withdrawal
or retirement of our own forces; heading off an enemy in flight.
Summarizing, the uses of naval mines as indicated by past wars
are:
a) The defense of our own fleet anchorage and bases (moored mines)
b) The closing of enemy ports (moored mines).
c) The closing of passages useful to the enemy but not needed by our-
selves (moored mines).
d) The enclosing of enemy ships in extended sea area (moored mines ).
e) The use of mine fields as a barrage behind which we may retire
(moored mines).
f) The laying of mines in the theater of war on the enemy's cruising
ground (moored mines).
9) The laying of mine fields in such position that the enemy may be
lured or forced to pass over them (moored mines).
h) The surreptitious laying of mines ahead of an enemy force (drifting
mines).
i) The laying of real or dummy mines to influence the enemy's tactics
(drifting mines).
j) The launching of mines in a current against ships at anchor (drifting
mines).
TYPES OF MINES
As stated before, the dividing line in our services between mines
used by the Army and those used by the Navy is established by
the method of firing the mine. The army controlled mine is capable
of being fired by an observer on shore, the naval contact mine
carries its firing mechanism complete within the mine itself and
fires when contact is made with any vessel.
The controlled mine must be fixed to the bottom in a definite
known location. It may be either a ground mine, that is, the mine
and its anchor remaining together in one unit resting on the bot-
tom; or the mine itself may be buoyant and moored to its anchor
by means of a cable. The choice of employment between these


  p. 2252 (#1216)                      

2252
[Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
two types of controlled mines depends upon the depth of water
and the character of bottom, and upon the method of control to
be used.
Controlled mines are ordinarily placed in groups of from seven
to nineteen mines. Circuits are led to shore which enable the ob-
server to fire all groups or all mines of one group simultaneously;
or to fire any particular mine of a group. There are three methods
of controlling the mines :
a) The observer, or observers, on shore plot the track of an
enemy vessel and close the contact when the vessel is observed to
be over a mine or group of mines. This method requires that the
location of the mine field be visible from the control station.
b) Each mine, when contact is made with a vessel, makes a sig-
nal in the control station on shore so that the observer may fire
the mine. In this method, the location of the mine field need not
be visible from the control station, but the observer must be in-
formed of the location of friendly vessels.
c) The firing contacts on shore may be kept closed to make the
mine practically an automatic contact mine for enemy vessels; the
contacts on shore being opened to permit the passage of friendly
vessels. In this method, the location of the mine field need not
be visible from the control station, but operator must be instructed
when to open a channel for friendly vessels.
In commenting on the use of controlled mines, one of the lead-
ing authorities on mining in our Navy states:
The use of controlled mines is limited to the defense of harbor en-
trances and approaches in situations where suitable control points may be
established within good visibility. Such mines are large and bulky and
their handling is encumbered by heavy anchors and control connections. To
plant a mine field of this kind is a comparatively slow operation, requiring
good weather and fairly smooth sea. Hence, controlled mines are unsuitable
for use on the high sea or in any mining operations involving the laying
of mines in considerable number at command and in a short time. The
chief value of controlled mines lies in their suitability for mining channels
through which innocent or friendly traffic is to continue. Their use is only
defensive, and unless adequately protected by batteries or patrol vessels,
they may be swept up or their connections severed by dragging.
The naval contact mine may also be either a ground mine or a
moored mine; or it may be a drifting mine, which has no con-
nection with the bottom but floats freely on the surface or a short
distance underneath the surface.


  p. 2253 (#1217)                      

1925]
Naval Mining and Naval Mines
2253
The contact mines used during the Russo-Japanese War were
almost exclusively moored mines. It is not known exactly what
type of anchor was employed; it was probably an automatic anchor
which set the mine at a predetermined distance below the surface
but did not permit mine laying except at slow speed. After the
Russo-Japanese War, when the importance of mining was real-
ized, successful efforts were made to develop an automatic anchor
which would permit the mine to be laid at any speed. The result
of these efforts was an automatic anchor, which first forms with
the mine a buoyant unit in which no mechanism operates until
outside the region of turbulent water near the rudder and pro-
pellers.
The present type of anchor is quite satisfactory, provided it
functions as designed. Future developments will probably be in
the direction of increased reliability. During the World War, the
British at one time contemplated giving up the automatic anchor
because of the danger that one anchor with faulty operation might
leave a mine case on the surface and thus disclose the location of
a whole field. The alternative of using an anchor with a fixed
length of mooring cable with necessity of knowing beforehand
the exact depth of water in which the mine is to be laid, is so dis-
advantageous that it will probably never come into general use.
With the advent, prior to the World War, of the submarine
mine layer, the mine and anchor instead of first forming a buoyant
unit were required, for submarines, to sink in order to clear the
mine tube. In this type, the mine and anchor first sink to the bot-
tom. Later, by a delay release, the mine case rises and sets the
length of its mooring cable by hydrostatic pressure at the level of
the mine case. There are objections to this type and it probably
will not come into general use for surface mine layers.
The firing mechanisms of contact used in the World War were:
1) Inertia.
2) Mechanical.
3) Electro-chemical.
4) Electric.
The inertia firing mechanism which operates to close a circuit by
the movement of an inertia ball or plunger when the mine is
struck, appeared largely in the early designs of mines. It was
probably used on contact mines during the Russo-Japanese War.


  p. 2254 (#1218)                      

2254
(Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
The mine with this firing mechanism is liable to be fired by wave
action and is sensitive to countermining.
Prior to the World War, the Italian Elia mine was most popu-
lar in all navies with exception of the German and Austrian serv-
ices. The Elia mine had a purely mechanical firing mechanism,
operated by a horizontal firing lever pivoted around the mooring
cable at its junction with the mine case. Rotation of the firing
lever relatively to the mine case unlocked a bayonet joint and
allowed the strain of the mooring cable to cock and trip the firing
pin as the mine case was released from the mooring cable. Tests
of this type of firing mechanism did not indicate reliability, only
about twenty-five per cent of the mines firing on “bumping" tests.
At the beginning of the World War, the British had only Elia
mines but soon abandoned them. The United States issued them
to naval districts in 1917, but so far as is known, none of them
were ever laid. However, a type of firing mechanism which fires
the mine as the mine case is rising toward the surface has distinct
advantages, and may reappear in the future design.
The most widely used mine during the World War was the
electro-chemical mine. In this mine, contact by a ship breaks a
glass tube inside a horn projecting from the mine case. An elec-
trolyte, usually sulphuric acid, then escapes from the tube and
runs into the container of a primary cell inside the mine case.
Upon receipt of this electrolyte, the primary cell generates the
current to fire the detonator. This type of firing mechanism as
used by the German and Austrian services was very reliable, but
the British had considerable difficulity in obtaining a glass which
would not break on explosion of a neighboring mine and thus
allow a whole field to be countered. Their anti-submarine barrage
at Dover was exploded entirely, early in 1918, by countermining.
The activities of German submarines in the World War made
a strong demand for a mine to be used against subsurface craft.
Contact mines prior to the war had been designed for use against
surface craft and required, for firing, that a vessel make contact
with the mine itself or with a firing buoy at a short distance above
the mine case. The danger area of such mines was small and the
number required to block a large area against submarines was
prohibitive. The mine which we employed in the Northern Bar-
rage was designed to meet the demand for larger danger area.
The mine carried a vertical antenna supported by buoys, and was


  p. 2255 (#1219)                      

1925)
2255
Naval Mining and Naval Mines
designed to fire on the contact of a vessel with horns on the mine
case, or with any part of the antenna. The length of the antenna
was from thirty-five to seventy feet, depending upon the depth
at which the mine case was set and upon the destructive radius of
the explosive charge at that depth. It increased the danger area
of the mine in the vertical direction by several hundred per cent,
and a much smaller number of mines was then required for an
effective anti-submarine barrage.
During the World War, the constant use of the paravane and
continuous mine sweeping operations robbed moored mines of a
great deal of their effectiveness. The mine sweeping of English
ports led the Germans to experiment with mines designed to defeat
mine sweeping. Their first attempt was a mooring cable contain-
ing a device to permit passage of a sweep wire without cutting the
mine adrift. It was not successful. The next attempt was what
was called the “Monday, Tuesday, Wednesday” mine. This ex-
pressive name was given because the mine laid by submarines had
a long delay on the bottom before leaving its anchor and then the
mines of a field would rise on successive days. The use of this
mine required vessels to be gathered in convoys and to be led in
and out of port by mine sweepers.
The demand for a mine which will defeat mine sweeping is still
strong. The antenna mine partially defeats the present paravane
as contact of the towing wire will fire the mine as well as contact
with the hull.
Another demand at the present time is a larger weight of ex-
plosive in each mine in order to increase its destructive effect.
The maximum weight of high explosive carried by moored con-
tact mines during the World War was approximately 300 pounds ;
and more recent underwater protection, principally on capital
ships, will require a larger weight of explosive in order to have a
destructive effect on capital ships at the desired radius.
One big weakness of the moored mine is its dip in a current,
causing great variations in the depth of the mine. Closely allied
with this weakness is the unsuitability of the ordinary moored
contact mine against surface craft in places where there is a large
rise and fall of tide. The mine case, in order to escape detection,
and in order to do serious injury to a large ship, should not be less
than fifteen feet below the surface. If the mine has a depth of
fifteen feet at low slack water this depth may be increased at high


  p. 2256 (#1220)                      

2256
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings [Dec.
water or in a strong current so that a ship of moderate draft can
pass over the mine field.
The foregoing discussion has dealt primarily with the moored
contact mines. The drifting contact mine, although having the
same characteristics in the firing mechanisms, differ radically in
the arrangement for depth taking. As regards depth taking, the
drifting inines are divided into two classes :
1) The fixed depth mine which has a slight negative buoyancy
and is suspended from a small buoy floating on the surface.
2) The oscillating mine which has no supporting buoy, but regu-
lates its depth by hydrostatic pressure or by vertical movement
of the mine in the water.
The advantage of the fixed depth type of drifting mines is its
simplicity. No elaborate or delicate mechanism is required to keep
the mine at its proper depth. The advantage of the oscillating
type is the absence of any indication on the surface of the location
of the mine. Drifting mines have been so little used in the past
that no line is clearly marked for their future development.
After the Russo-Japanese War certain limitations were placed
on the design and use of mines by Convention VIII of the Second
Hague Conference of 1907. This Convention is binding only when
all belligerents have ratified or adhered. The only principal naval
power which has not yet ratified the Convention is Italy. The
Convention prescribed :
a) It is forbidden to lay automatic contact mines off the coasts or
ports of the enemy with the sole object of intercepting commercial shipping:
b) Mines are to become inoperative within a limited time, precautions
must be taken to safeguard peaceful shipping, and the neutral nations must
be notified of danger zones as soon as military exigencies permit;
c) Anchored contact mines must become harmless as soon as they have
broken loose from their moorings;
d) It is forbidden to lay unanchored automatic contact mines except
where they are so constructed as to become harmless one hour at the most
after the person who laid them ceases to control them.
Manifestly, the first two conditions accomplish very little in
limiting the use of mines by a belligerent. The last two conditions
appear to have been quite generally disregarded in the World War.
except when observing them was to the interest of the side which
laid the mines. Our own anchored mines were so designed that
they became ineffective if they broke adrift, and our drifting


  p. 2257 (#1221)                      

1925)
2257
Naval Mining and Naval Mines
mines are designed with a sinking valve to sink the mines one hour
after they are laid.
In the design of all mines, the safety of the laying vessel is an
important consideration, and mines contain safety features to
make them inoperative while the mines are on board and for a
short time after they have been laid. The control over the con-
tact mine ceases, however, after the mine first becomes inoperative,
and a mine which combines the simplicity of the contact mine with
the safety of the controlled mine is yet to be found.


  p. 2258 (#1222)                      


U.S.N. Official Photo
THE PN9-I ON BOARD THE U.S.S. "PELICAN," EN ROL'TE TO PEARL HARBOR, T.H.


  p. 2259 (#1223)                      

NAVAL AIRCRAFT IN INTERNATIONAL LAW
By LIEUTENANT FORREST SHERMAN, U. S. Navy :
THE application of existing international law and agreements
I to the use of aircraft in maritime warfare presents many
questions of interest not only to naval aviators but to all
naval officers. The rapid increase in size and cruising radius of
aircraft and the limited number of precedents on record leave
many aspects of the subject open to contention and future settle-
ment.
For instance what is the position of an airplane in international
law? Is it a regularly commissioned war vessel like a submarine,
an auxiliary craft like a ship's boat, or is it merely a weapon like
a tank or an armored motor car? During the last war and in the
post-war settlements, where most of the points at issue arose over
the use of airplanes over land frontiers and in connection with
land warfare, the indication was toward the latter view, particu-
larly in the countries of continental Europe. A military single
seater may very easily be considered to be a flying machine-gun-
mount and the pilot to be the gunner. However, it is hard to
imagine a giant dirigible as being anything short of a regularly
commissioned war vessel, and it seems highly probable that the
future view will incline toward the man-of-war classification. A
large flying boat carrying pilots, engineers, gunners, and radiomen
certainly is as much a war vessel as a submarine, and if it so
recognized why not extend such recognition to all naval aircraft
and correspondingly accord to large civilian aircraft engaged in
international commerce the same rights, privileges, and obligations
now accorded to neutral merchantmen?
The principle of the sovereignty of the air has now become.gen-
erally accepted and during the World War the claims of neutral
countries that neutral atmosphere corresponded to neutral terri-
tory were recognized by all the combatant powers except Great
Britain. On the occasion of the bombing at Friedrikshafen by
airplanes of the Royal Naval Air Service, certain planes passed


  p. 2260 (#1224)                      

2260
[Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
over Swiss territory. Great Britain apologized for the incident
but added that the sovereignty of the air was not recognized. The
incident is noteworthy because history shows that a point of view
once adhered to in time of war and later changed during peace-
time settlements and readjustments is often revived and closely
adhered to in the stress of later wars, either as a measure of ex-
pediency or as a measure of retaliation.
At the present time the advocates of the so-called freedom of
the air over land and territorial waters are few indeed, although
the air over the high seas is as free as the high seas themselves.
Article I of the Convention of 1919 relating to International Air
Navigation reads as follows: "The Contracting States recognize
that every State has complete and exclusive sovereignty in the air
space above its territory and territorial waters.”
It is generally conceded that a neutral state has the right to have
the neutrality of its atmosphere respected by belligerents and to
prohibit the passage of belligerent military and naval aircraft over
its territories and territorial waters. With this right goes, of
course, the corresponding duty of enforcement.
The history of the last war affords many examples of such en-
forcement. The Dutch government enforced its neutrality by
seizing all belligerent airplanes found within its borders and did
not hesitate to fire without warning on belligerent aircraft found
in flight over its territories. On July 10, 1915, the Dutch govern-
ment stated to the German government in reply to a German pro-
test against the internment of an aviator who lost his way and
landed in Holland :
If an airplane is found over Dutch territory, it is immediately a target
for fire, this being the sole method of enforcing respect for the territory's
neutrality. If the aviator lands on the territory of the kingdom, whether
voluntarily or as the result of the firing or for any other reason, he is
interned with his aeroplane. The fact that the aeroplane has flown over
Dutch territory or even that it has merely landed there, suffices to justify
this measure.
On February 1, 1916, the German airship L-19, which was in
trouble and required assistance, flew over Dutch territory after an
unsuccessful effort to obtain assistance from a trawler. She was
fired on by Dutch troops. The German government protested the
action of the Dutch in firing without warning on the grounds that
the airship was acting under force majeure in approaching Dutch


  p. 2261 (#1225)                      

1925) Naval Aircraft in International Law
2261
territory. The Dutch government stated that belligerent aircraft
should "keep at such a distance from the land and sea frontiers
of Holland as to escape all possibility of being brought over Dutch
territory, even by error or owing to atmospheric conditions.” It
stated further: “A neutral state is justified in opposing by force
every passage of its frontiers by belligerent aircraft, unless they
indicate by a white flag, or other signal, their intention to land.”
In 1916 a neutral Roumanian aircraft was fired on by Bul.
garian troops. This is the only instance known of such drastic
action being taken against a neutral aircraft penetrating belliger-
ent atmosphere.
Danish and Roumanian airplanes were used to give chase to,
and thus warn off, belligerent aircraft which penetrated those two
countries.
In September, 1917, a German seaplane made a forced land-
ing in Dutch territorial waters. Another German seaplane at-
tempted to tow it away but was forced to cease the attempt by the
fire of a Dutch torpedo boat.
The internment of seaplanes was the subject of a lively contro-
versy between the Dutch and British governments. The British
made no protest against the internment of seaplanes which en-
tered Holland by air, but took the position that a seaplane which
either taxied in or was towed should not have been interned. A
number of British naval seaplanes were rescued at sea and taken
into Dutch ports. The British stated that the seaplanes "would
never have come into the possession of the Netherlands govern-
ment at all if they had been left alone by the Dutch subjects who
brought them into the Netherlands ports.”
Their internment was protested on the grounds that they could
have been salvaged by the British Navy if left at sea. It is to be
noted that in this case the British government insisted on seaplanes
entering territorial waters on the surface being treated as surface
craft and it is believed that this distinction will be adhered to in
the future.
Flying officers rescued by the Dutch from their damaged planes
at sea were treated as shipwrecked mariners and returned to their
respective countries.
It is now a matter of established precedent that belligerent air-
craft which land in neutral waters should be interned. The making
of such a distinction between aircraft and surface craft seems


  p. 2262 (#1226)                      

2262
(Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
most illogical. It seems probable that they will eventually be ac-
corded the same treatment but it seems more likely that neutral
ports will be closed to all than opened to all.
The question of whether an airplane is a ship or a weapon comes
up again in the case of the sale of airplanes and airships either
armed or unarmed to a belligerent power by the citizens of a neu-
tral state. If the airplane is considered to be a vessel such a sale
constitutes a decided breach of neutrality. If the aircraft is
merely a weapon it is a case of traffic in contraband. In the In-
structions for the Navy of the United States Governing Maritime
Warfare, aircraft are listed as contraband and no mention is made
of their character as vessels. It is fairly probable, however, that
the sale of one large rigid airship or of one large flying boat by a
private neutral corporation to a belligerent would be considered
an unneutral act and would create an overwhelming sentiment in
favor of rescinding the contraband classification and of consider-
ing all complete aircraft as vessels.
Another phase of warfare which raises questions of interest
is the use of aircraft in blockade operations. Existing rules ap-
plicable are few indeed and yet there are some precedents which
can be examined.
In the Washington Treaty of February, 1922, the signatory
powers agreed to the following as established parts of international
law:
A merchant vessel must be ordered to submit to visit and search to deter-
mine its character before it can be seized.
A merchant vessel must not be attacked unless it refuse to submit to visit
and search after warning, or to proceed as directed after seizure.
A merchant vessel must not be destroyed unless the crew and passengers
have been first placed in safety.
The American position on the application of the above rules to
aircraft was set forth at the Hague in 1923, although no common
agreement was reached, as follows:
Aircraft are forbidden to visit and search surface or subsurface vessels
without conforming in all respects to the rules to which surface vessels
authorized to conduct visit and search, are subject.
In view of the irregularities to which the use of aircraft against merchant
vessels might give rise, it is declared that aircraft cannot deviate a merchant
vessel from its course without boarding it; that in no event may an aircrait
destroy a merchant vessel unless the crew and passengers of such vessel
have first been placed in safety, and that if an aircraft cannot capture a


  p. 2263 (#1227)                      

1925]
2263
Naval Aircraft in International Law
merchant vessel in conformity with these rules, it must desist from attack
or from seizure, and permit such vessel to proceed unmolested.
Before accepting this position it would be well to review the
status of the right of maritime capture in general. This right to
capture and confiscate enemy merchant ships and cargoes wherever
found outside neutral jurisdiction and to capture neutral merchant
ships which offend against neutrality has been claimed for genera-
tions as a legitimate means of carrying on maritime warfare. At
different periods in history the general principle has been accepted
or denied depending on the relative strength of neutral and bellig- '
erents, the progress in instruments of warfare, the tendency
toward reprisals and the general character of the war.
In general the permanent restrictions on the exercise of the right
have been only those of humanity; if the safety of personnel can
be secured the exercise of the right by aircraft cannot be denied.
The tendency of modern warfare is more and more toward les-
sening the distinction between combatants and noncombatants and
toward a struggle between two entire peoples. It is certainly just
as humane for an aircraft to order the personnel of an enemy
merchant ship to take to their boats and then sink the ship, as it
is for other craft to bombard a defended port or to torpedo a trans-
port. The destruction of a merchant ship has, in these days of
universal insurance, become a blow not to the individual owner
but to the entire people, distributed in increased costs of insurance
rates.
The act of a merchant vessel carrying cargo to a belligerent
nation is very little different from that of a naval supply vessel
carrying the same materials from the belligerent port to the bellig-
erent naval force. It is therefore illogical to claim privileged treat-
ment for one which is not granted the other.
The distinction between attack by aircraft on merchant vessels
and the unrestricted submarine warfare of 1917-18 lies in afford-
ing personnel an opportunity to abandon ship. Moreover to quote
from a recent professional paper : "History affords no instance of
a nation losing a desperate war for its existence without using
every means at its disposal to win, and it is even more doubtful if
there will be such cases in the future.".
The visit and search of a surface craft by a seaplane is not im-
possible but will often be difficult due either to heavy seas or to the


  p. 2264 (#1228)                      

2264
[Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
loss of the seaplane's offensive power and also the loss of its
elusiveness as a target when taxying on the surface. The latter
consideration can be removed by operating seaplanes in pairs, one
to remain in the air while the other alights and acts as a boarding
craft.
During the war there were various instances of visit and search
by aircraft. A Dutch steamer was boarded by one of a flight of
three German seaplanes and forced to proceed into port.
The Norwegian bark Royal was searched by a boarding party
from the German airship L-23. The zeppelin ordered a ship's
boat sent to receive the boarding party, which after an inspection
of the cargo outside Hantsholm left a prize crew of three on board
which took the Royal into Cuxhaven under escort by L-23.
The German raider Wolf used a float seaplane in her operations
against allied commerce with remarkable success. The seaplane
dropped a message on the deck of the New Zealand vessel Wai-
runa which ordered her to cease using radio and steer toward the
Wolf under penalty of being bombed. The American sailing ship
Winslow and the Japanese steamer Hitachi Maru were captured
by similar measures. In the case of the Hitachi Maru it became
necessary for the seaplane to drop first a warning bomb and then
a second bomb which blew two men overboard before the steamer
obeyed.
The construction of large airships for commercial purposes
such as the Los Angeles or the ships of the projected commercial
airship line between Great Britain and India will bring up the
question of the status of commercial aircraft in the zone of opera-
tions. Such craft cannot be searched by any belligerent craft and
therefore a belligerent power would be forced to bar them from
the zone of operations under penalty of attack. Aircraft entering
such a barred zone would naturally be considered as enemies and
subject to attack without warning. In declaring any such zone,
however, it must be incumbent on the belligerent to restrict its
limits to an area in which he actually controls both surface and air.
This is a departure from the rules of surface blockade but a justi-
fiable one. In this case the operation of commercial aircraft would
be considered analogous to the movement of vehicles between the
lines of contending armies rather than to the operation of neutral
commercial vessels in the vicinity of contending fleets.


  p. 2265 (#1229)                      

CONTROL OF THE SEAS BY AN AIR
DEPARTMENT
By LIEUTENANT COMMANDER H. M. KIEFFER, U. S. Navy
IN AN economic sense, two extreme types of nations may be
recognized : the nation which produces and exports raw ma-
terials and imports manufactured articles; and the nation
which does not produce raw materials but imports them, manu-
factures from them, and exports the manufactured product. Of
course, no nation is a perfect representative of one or the other
type. Every nation represents a combination of the two, leaning,
however, toward one of the two extremes.
The first, or producing type of nation has nothing serious to
fear from isolation, provided she can defend her boundaries. Her
people can feed and clothe and house themselves, perhaps not with
the degree of luxury to which they have been accustomed, but at
least sufficiently to sustain life. The second, or manufacturing
type cannot stand isolation, whether or not she can defend her
boundaries. In war they must fight for free avenues of import or
export, failing which they are thrown into economic disorder
through the stoppage of manufacture and the resultant numbers
of people thrown out of work, and finally cannot subsist their
populations. .
During the first century of its existence, the United States was
primarily a producing nation. It is a producing nation still, to the
extent that with a degree of economic reorganization (forced, of
course) she could subsist and clothe her population. But she has
progressed rapidly in the matter of manufactures to the point
where this necessary reorganization would be a severe upheaval.
And this progress, to judge from the "go and get it” standard of
American salesmanship, will continue, rendering isolation in an
economic sense more and more serious a problem. A foreign cot-
ton expert, quoted in the press some time ago, said,
The capacity of the United States for raw cotton is incredible. It is
growing by leaps and bounds. Can you imagine a United States importing
cotton? That condition is a probability.


  p. 2266 (#1230)                      

2266
[Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
This cotton is not to be used, finally, by the people of this country;
it will be manufactured and a great part of it exported for sale
The United States is becoming an importer of raw materials.
As this importation grows, with its accompaniment of sales of
exports abroad, our problem of national defense becomes an in-
volved one. The policy of accepting isolation, and shutting our-
selves up, China-wise, behind an impregnable boundary, becomes
·more and more impracticable, if not impossible, because of the
grave economic and social disturbances which would follow in
its wake.
We face the problem of defense of our avenues of communica-
tion with our sources of raw material and our customers. The
very bulwarks of our defense as a producing nation, the oceans,
render our defense as a manufacturing nation difficult. Thou-
sands of miles of sea communications must be guarded, that is,
means of defense (or tactical offense) must be available all along
the trade routes. And then, of course, there is the problem of the
defense of, and the furnishing of supplies and munitions to, the
Philippines, Hawaii, Alaska, Porto Rico, and others. This prob-
lem merges with the first one.
In European countries these problems are faced in a matter-
of-fact fashion. The cost of building new cruisers is discussed in
terms of the cost of trade protection per mile of trade route, of
communications per mile of sea travel. Battles such as Coronel,
the Falklands, the Alabama vs. the Kearsarge, and the results of
such cruises as those of the Alabama and the Emden, have such a
powerful effect on the economic situation of nations at war that
they approach decisiveness much more than did Jutland, where the
situation after the battle was much the same as at the time of
mobilization of the two fleets. Coronel and the cruise of the Em-
den boosted marine insurance rates, fostered German support in
South America, and interfered with the precious food supply to the
Allies. The battle of the Falklands and the sinking of the Emden
had the opposite effect.
It will be noted that all these battles took place far from the
countries whose fleets were engaged. It is certain that the point at
which an enemy attempts to cut our trade routes or lines of com-
munication will be a point where we are weakest, that is, a point
farthest from our bases.


  p. 2267 (#1231)                      

1925]
2267
Control of Seas by Air Department
In the air service controversy now raging in the press, the words
"National Defense” are frequently used—apparently misused or
used with an appreciation of only a part of their meaning. The
ultimate idea of the proponents of a separate air service seems to
be a close girdle of air stations built around the country which will
attack any invading enemy who comes within their radius of action.
No ideas are expressed, usually, on the subject of the use of
aeroplanes in mid-ocean to defend lines of communication. The
best defense is a good offense, of course—seeking the enemy out
and fighting when we find him. If he is elusive we must at the
same time fall back on the passive defense—a waiting game—all
along our lines of communication. Defeating commerce raiders
is a long drawn out affair, involving the use of numerous dis-
persed forces. Can the aeroplane or airship, unaided, remain in
the air long enough to seek the enemy or can it remain in mid-
ocean doing convoy or patrol work? Not at present nor apparently
in the near future.
It will be noted that the one agency in this country which has
most consistently pushed the distance and duration element in
flying, has been the Navy, and that its recent attempts in this direc-
tion have been the target of attack by the leading proponents of
a united air service.
The aeroplane in protracted operations in mid-ocean must be
based on naval vessels or their equivalent. Now, supposing that
we have a separate air service and that it works in conjunction
with the Navy, the strategical and tactical elements in this coopera-
tion must be controlled by one or the other. Dual control is fatal.
Will the air force take charge or will the Navy? And if the
Navy, which has the strategic experience, takes charge, will there
be avenues for objection to naval strategical decisions via the Air
Department? Or, if the air force takes charge, will there be any
possibility of delay due to naval objections via Washington ? And
how about the well-known passing of the buck?
The largest program of actual military operations in which two
governmental departments took part during the late war was the
Gallipoli campaign, which was decidedly not a success. And suc-
cess was lacking, according to Churchill's World Crisis, because of
lack of coordination between the fountain heads of authority, the
War Office and the Admiralty. Dual control is a delicate, tricky
method of operation. History speaks for unified command, the


  p. 2268 (#1232)                      

2268
(Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
last great instance being Pershing's support of Foch and the re-
sulting unified command in France. The bare fact that an or-
ganized naval transport force carried our Army to France
successfully and smoothly—a task of magnitude but not of great
complication has been the subject of surprised comment. Am-
phibious operations are generally regarded as delicate subjects.
One department, one chain of command, should control naval
and aerial cooperation at sea.
The historical precedents for the establishment of separate
services point to the axiom that if an arm (as cavalry, artillery)
can be used without dependence on other arms, it stands by itself
and becomes a service. Take the cannon, for instance. It makes
its appearance in European history in 1346, in the battle of Crecy,
surrounded by a group of learned operators who are not soldiers,
and cooperates with longbowmen, arbalisters, pike-men, armored
knights, and so forth. Now if the cannon, unaided by these vari-
ous foot and horse soldiers, could have taken the field and fought
unaided, we would undoubtedly have seen the expansion of the
group of civilian gunners into an “artillery department" conduct.
ing its own strategy. The cannon on land, however, to this day
depends for its successful use on the cooperation of infantry,
cavalry, and recently, aeroplanes, and each of these arms depends
on it. (Artillery, properly speaking, cannot occupy, any more
than can the aeroplane. Discussion of this, however, belongs in a
military rather than a naval paper.)
Ships were once regarded as appendages of an army. The
known seas at that time were restricted and navigation* was just
becoming distinct from piloting.** Generals commanded fleets,
which furnished decks, as a substitute for land, upon which sol-
diers could engage in hand-to-hand fighting. Enter the cannon,
and the world is informed by the defeat of the Spanish Armada
that a new independent method of fighting—the gun on a ship
platform—has been evolved. There follows the divorce of army
and navy, because the navy, conducting campaigns independently
of the army, has no need of continuous army support. The navy
takes charge of the strategical control of its own affairs.
The same course of reasoning will hold good for the air forces,
if history is a guide. When aeroplanes keep the air and control
*i.e. cruising out of sight of land.
** i.e, cruising along coast.


  p. 2269 (#1233)                      

1925)
Control of Seas by Air Department 2269
areas of ocean by themselves without help from naval vessels,
then the time for a separate air department will have come. But
not now.
(It is the writer's personal opinion that in time, undetermined,
aeroplaning will become about as usual as automobiling, and that
a plane may some time be able to cruise about the Pacific or At-
lantic for weeks. When this time comes the navy will be found
to have changed. The change will not have been a sudden one, .
but will have been a growth, as was in a much more limited way
the change from sail to steam. The navy may then be mainly the
naval air service, applying the old strategical principles with new
gear.)
A veteran who had served in the ranks during the Civil War
said to the writer: "Esprit de corps starts at the bottom. At first
we had company spirit, exemplified in near-riots between com-
panies. Then came regimental spirit, with much parade of regi-
mental insignia. Next, after going through several battles, we
acquired an esprit d'armée, and then," he said earnestly, "we had
a wonderful war machine.”
Esprit de corps is a great thing. All branches of the Navy have
it-air force, destroyers, submarines, and so on. It is shown by a
love of, and deep belief in, the weapons the branch in question
uses. To the thinking man it becomes merged with what may be
called the naval spirit—the feeling of comradeship for the Navy
as a whole. This naval spirit, in peace-time, is a thing of slow
growth. Partisanship for one's branch is natural. The torpedo
school graduate emerges upon a cynical world, “breathing, eating,
and sleeping” torpedoes. And the better man he is, the better
work he does with his torpedoes, the more firmly does he believe
that the gun is an obsolescent weapon, and should be properly sub-
ordinated to the beloved "whale.” He argues, writes long screeds
to this end, and on occasion has been known to engage in fights
with other ensigns, caused by differences in opinion. His partisan-
ship renders him blind to the difficulties involved in a successful
torpedo attack, and to the progress being made in torpedo defense.
He either bends facts to do service to his theories or else ignores
the facts. Later on he leaves torpedo duty, is ordered elsewhere,
and sees the other side of the shield. He learns to discriminate be-
tween insurmountable obstacles and those which can be mastered.


  p. 2270 (#1234)                      

2270 U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings (Dec.
The guns and the torpedo and other weapons appear to him in
proper perspective. He becomes balanced, rounded out.
Esprit de corps in the air forces is at an extremely high level.
Numbers of officers in these branches have had no experience
other than in aviation. They exult in their ability as pilots, delight
in the feeling of danger involved in flying, and regard their ma-
chines with the same affection which the cavalryman bestows upon
his horse. A fierce pride renders them contemptuous of other
less spectacular methods of making war. They delight in the
mastery of engine technique, and this commendable absorption in
the details of their immediate duties, while making them excellent
pilots, renders them, to an extent, blind to the larger view of avia-
tion cooperating with other branches. They gladly accept arduous
tests as a form of athletic exercise, without seeing that the test is
dictated by a forward reaching strategy. These men have am-
bition. It was not with the idea of encouraging recruiting that
Napoleon made his famous remark “Every private carries a mar-
shal's baton in his knapsack.” It was with the realization that an
ambitionless man is little more good than a dummy. Every rank-
ing officer looks forward, or should, to command of a fleet or
army. Ambition burns within the breasts of these aviators, they
face the prospect of tours of duty with other branches, which is
the one thing to round them out and fit them for the coordination
required in the higher ranks, and they ask themselves, “Is there
not some way to avoid this additional study and work away from
our chosen specialty, and still hold our chances of high rank?"
And the united air service project shows them the way. “No
need to study the ways of the navy that floats or the army that
walks! Aviation can wage a war all by itself !” And an esprit
de corps so strong that a close analyst will find it used as a sub-
stitute for certain forms of discipline, comes to the aid of this
decision.
Self-preservation is the first law of nature. It works openly
in the lower orders of creation, but more quietly and surrepti-
tiously in man. One would say that the private charging from
the trench with his bayonet had conquered the instinct of self-
preservation. He has only smothered it. When he has crossed
no man's land and actually meets an enemy it comes forth all the
more sharply for its internment, and he fights like a tiger. Which


  p. 2271 (#1235)                      

1925]
2271
Control of Seas by Air Department
explains the fact that men usually timorous are often terrible in
action.
This instinct is present in our daily life. It colors our actions,
and inclines us to those directions in which an advantage to our-
selves may be found, though we may not be conscious of its
workings.
A man's opinions result from the workings of his reason, con-
stantly adding, substracting, balancing cause against cause, fact
against fact, effect against effect. A man's mind may be com-
pared to a cauldron in which are to be brewed his opinions. The
man himself adds various ingredients, and then, quietly, probably
without his knowledge, in slips the ingredient of self-preservation.
It colors the brew, the opinion, almost unconsciously.
In weighing the pros and cons of a separate air service, does this
instinct of self-preservation affect us? The writer is of the opinion
that it does. It takes a sturdy-minded man to see promotion, high
promotion, coming for himself with the advent of a separate air
service, and not be influenced by it. Generals will be created,
lieutenant generals, major generals, and brigadier generals, also
colonels of the air. And all to be selected from a body of com-
paratively young fliers. The prospect is enough to turn a man's
head, particularly those to whom the senior commissions will fall.
On the one hand, years of being a comparatively minor cog in a
military machine; on the other, immediate recognition as one of
the elect.
The hard part of all this for the Navy is that the ranking officers
in the proposed separate air service will practically all be out of
touch with the aims of naval strategy. To them the enemy to be
defeated at sea lies a hundred instead of possibly a thousand miles
off shore. National defense means to them shore defense, if their
chief advocate's arguments be interpreted correctly. But will the
Navy get the service it needs from a flying personnel trained to
think in terms of the land ?
The naval officer is of course also influenced by this instinct of
self-preservation. He is working for his advantage. He sees
himself at sea lined up against an enemy enjoying unified com-
mand, himself with what fliers and machines an air control on the
beach will allow him, and the best he can see in the situation is a
sort of “Alphonse-Gaston” relation between himself and the rep-
resentatives of the air department; the worst is that bane of the


  p. 2272 (#1236)                      

2272
L'. S. Varal Institute Proceedings
| Dec.
conference method, a divided council and a wavering decision.
He is revolted at the prospect.
The naval air service, fortunately, is full of officers who see eye
to eye with the rest of the Navy, who welcome their alternating
tours of duty afloat and in the air as a means of developing them-
serves broadly in the science of fighting at sea. The writer is in-
debted to several such officers for some of the ideas contained
herein.
In the recent attacks on naval administration of the naval air
service there is a great deal of what may be described as "bunk."
This includes the good, old-time barnacle-encrusted attack on an
alleged bureaucracy contained in the press reports of one of Gen-
eral Mitchell's statements, and, above all, the proposed remedy.
The bureaus of the Navy Department have been changed and
modified from time to time and may be again. Proposed changes
have been discussed in the Naval Institute. The writer is not
here concerned with them but desires to call attention to the fact
that if a person considers that there are too many bureaus or that
they are of the wrong type, that person would naturally suggest
decreasing the number or altering the type. The remedy suggested
is to establish a new department with undoubtedly many more
bureaus, perhaps called “sections" or "subdivisions," or some
other name, to lift the curse!
Again, the policy of the Navy in bending every effort to pro-
duce planes or airships which can remain in the air long enough to
traverse the oceans has been assailed. This policy is the only one
which in any way looks to the replacement of ships by planes, and
should receive the support of air enthusiasts. But no: the leader
of the movement for a separate air force brands the Hawaiian
flight as a bit of unnecessary risk. And so on.
There is one thing about these attacks: Whether or not they
obtain support for the untried method of control of the seas by
air, they undoubtedly, through their catchy phraseology and their
sensational appeal to a public mainly interested in other things,
weaken the support the country should give its Navy. The tested,
sure methods of far-flung national defense, which cannot be jetti-
soned casually, suffer. In fact, if any agency outside of the
country desired quietly to render our communications with foreign
countries unsafe, and to hold down our growing foreign trade in
manufactured exports, one method of doing so would be to cause


  p. 2273 (#1237)                      

1925)
2273
Control of Seas by Air Department
the United States by one means or another to weaken one sure
means of commerce and communication defense and to rely on
another means, as yet untested.
The proposal to take control of flying at sea away from the
Navy has yet to be presented in terms of strategic control. It is
presented in terms of production and training, principally. Pro-
duction is the first step in logistics and as such is entitled to great
consideration. But logistics, and production with it, is called in
as a subordinate aid to strategy. It is a necessary aid; logistics
failing, strategy must be modified. But, nevertheless, it is a sub-
ordinate part of the art of war-making. To establish control of
the war-making organization on a basis of production is to intro-
duce the mechanical element so dear to the inventive mind of the
American and so fatal, if carried to excess, to unified command.
Production is a very necessary element. It is properly represented
in war by the sub-organization to which the unified command turns
and says, “Produce tools of such and such quality in such and
such time.” Production does not say "you must use only these
tools selected by us.” It suggests new tools but does not dictate.
H. Q. may make a wrong demand, as when Kitchener stocked
France with shrapnel instead of high-explosive. Production may
fall down on the job, as when the Navy said "Give us a sure and
certain method of detecting the presence of a submerged sub-
marine in fairly rough weather.” When headquarters fails, an
unerring finger can usually be placed on the error, and headquar-
ters knows it. When production fails, the error is not usually so
apparent, and may be due, as in the above instance, to failure of
the scientific laboratories of the country to overcome natural ob-
stacles. Responsibility is much more clear-cut in the former case
than in the latter. Place production in the saddle and it carries
with it into the high places a weakened responsibility, a dulled
spur. Most of the objection to the present bureau system that has
been voiced is based on the belief that a mechanical subdivision
carried out too thoroughly tends to deify material to the detriment
of strategical (and tactical) requirements. The resonant shout
of “Bureaucracy! Bureaucracy!" is a most unusual reversal of
these objections. Not enough control by material—down with
strategy!
One great objection to the separation of the Navy and its air
service is the rather general apprehension that the Navy may de-


  p. 2274 (#1238)                      

2274 U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
(Dec.
mand a type of aeroplane with certain qualities deemed necessary
for use far at sea, and that the air department may reply, “Very
well, but not just now. All our funds are obligated for construc-
tion for boundary defense, which is our primary object. Bye and
bye, maybe, we will comply.” And that the Navy may find itself
charged with a certain duty without the means of performing that
duty, and will have to return unsuccessful with the alibi that its
requests for material were not granted. Nobody wants an alibi.
We now hear of the terrible risks to which the Navy subjects its
Aiers. Certainly there are risks—much greater than the additional
50 per cent indicated by the pay tables. Pioneering has always
been a risky business. But there are other risks, less spectacular,
being taken in the Navy. Here are some examples of cause and
possible effect which should surely stand or fall together :
CAUSE
EFFECT
The Shenandoah is destroyed Establish a separate Air Department
The F-4 sinks off Honolulu Establish a separate Submarine De-
partment
A gun explodes on the Mississippi Establish a separate Gun Depart-
ment
and so on ad infinitum. Risk is a burden of the naval profession,
always has been, and always will be; and as with the doctor, taking
chances in his germ-stocked laboratory, so with the naval officer in
his experimental work.
Training, like production, is usually carried on by an organization
subordinate to the head which will have the direction of the branch
of war-making concerned, in order that proper indoctrination pre-
vail.
The question of copying a foreign government in taking naval
aviation away from the admiralty can hardly be brought up as a
precedent. It is an experiment, as yet untried in war. Already
there are rumors of too crowded aeroplane carriers due to each
service carrying what may be called overhead personnel with it.
And a series of compromises seems to be going into effect tending
to place control of naval flying back in the hands of the navy. Of
the unified-command side of the experiment the writer has heard
nothing, and an authoritative pronouncement will probably be
heard only after a war test of the present arrangement.
Movement, investigation, controversy, all of these, prevent stag-
nation and are therefore healthy signs of activity. The Navy has


  p. 2275 (#1239)                      

1925] Control of Seas by Air Department 2275
so far in this matter welcomed investigation. The naval attitude
in the present controversy, as the writer understands it, is that it
is not concerned with whatever disposition outside the Navy the
powers-that-be desire to make of aerial affairs, any more than it
was with the single rank vs. double rank cavalry controversy which
raged some years ago in the columns of the service papers. How-
ever, with changes inside the Navy it is deeply concerned, espe-
cially with any change which deprives the Navy of full control
over all the weapons it requires in carrying out its appointed tasks.
May he paraphrase a well-known slogan? “When better im-
plements of war are used, the Navy will be found using them.”
As in the past, so, let us hope, in the future.


  p. 2276 (#1240)                      

DIRECT READING MANEUVERING DIAGRAMS
By COMMANDER RUSSELL WILLSON, U. S. Navy
IT IS probably true that the Mooring and Maneuvering Dia-
| gram in the hands of an expert, is the best all-round means of
solving the various problems of course and speed involved in
certain types of maneuvers. In close order formations and in an-
choring where allowance must be made for variations of speed,
tactical qualities of a ship, or scope of chain, there is no substitute
for the Maneuvering Board.
It is desirable that all line officers be adept in the use of the
Maneuvering Board. Unfortunately they are not. It is doubtful
if one officer in five, without some preliminary study, can give a
prompt and accurate solution of a mooring board problem. About
the only officers on familiar terms with the Mooring Board are
those with peculiar slants of mind who like to play with it, navi-
gators and ex-navigators, and officers taking their examinations.
The course and speed triangles are peculiarly elusive to those who
have not learned to know them well.
Then too, the importance of familiarity with mooring board
problems is increasing. Some years ago maneuvers involving
change of bearing, of distance, or of both, were generally required
only of ships in relatively close formations—ships which at least
were within sight of the guide. In fleet dispositions of today out-
lying vessels may be called upon to change bearing or distance, or
both, when many miles from the guide, and in changes of fleet
course different mooring board problems may present themselves
to each of a hundred ships of the screens. Any scheme that tends
to simplify these problems, or to direct attention to the importance
of the Mooring Board-particularly in fleet maneuvers, may well
be of interest.
It was with this end in view that there were evolved the cellu-
loid course angle cards now used to some extent in the fleet and
at the War College. They have been described in the Naval Insti-
tute. It is sufficient for the purpose of this article to say that these


  p. 2277 (#1241)                      

1925] Direct Reading Maneuvering Diagrams 2277
cards are used with the mooring board diagram, the center of the
card being placed at the plotted “present position,” an arm pointed
at the "new position," and the various combinations of course and
speed to reach the new position read off directly from a scale.
They are simple—relatively fool-proof, and do away with the
troublesome “similar triangles.” They require no parallel rulers.
But they do require the mooring board diagram and a clear place
to lay it, not always convenient on a destroyer or a submarine
COURSE
OF GUIDE
-
-
DIAGRAM NO.1
Partly from curiosity and partly from a desire to make these
problems simpler for smaller ships or for inexperienced officers,
the writer for some time has been trying to eliminate the mooring
boad, pencil and rulers from these problems and construct a small
diagram or table which may be printed in a signal or other appro-
priate book or pasted up in a convenient position on the bridge.
The results of this work is given in this article.
In the first place it is well to state the problem in its simplest
terms. Referring to diagram No. 1, a ship at Pi wants to pro-
ceed to P2. What are the various combinations of course and
speed—relative to those of the guide—which will put her there?


  p. 2278 (#1242)                      

2278
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings [Dec.
· On the mooring board the direction of line Pi-Pº is transferred
to QRS, with GQ representing to scale the speed of the guide.
Then GR, GS, etc., represent speeds of the maneuvering ship and
the angles between these lines and the course of the guide GQ, are
the corresponding changes of course for the maneuvering ships.
In other words, these are two of the many combinations of course
and speed which, if taken by that ship, will cause its plotted posi-
tion to move along the line Pi-P2. This is all there is to the
problem.
This brief explanation suggests that there are three inter-related
variables here. (1) the direction of the position line P1-P2 rela-
tive to the guide's course, (2) the change of course, and (3) the
ratio of the lines representing speed of guide (GQ) to speed of
ship, GR, GS, etc. It has been found that the relation of these
three variables can be reduced to a simple diagram (See Diagram
No. 2), in which the figures at the top represent inclination of
position line to course of guide, those at the left side the change
of course, and the curves the speed ratio—ship's speed to speed
of the guide. If we know the inclination of the position line we
can enter the top of the table, drop down to a speed ratio line and
moving horizontally to the left pick out the corresponding change
of course.
Having this diagram the next problem is to develop a ready
means of finding the inclination of the position line. Of course
we can plot our positions and measure this inclination but we want
to avoid plotting anything.
In these problems the present and new positions are generally
given us by bearing and distance from the guide. In some cases
the bearing of the new position may be given as representing an
increase or decrease in bearing. For our purposes we must use
only relative bearings.
Now looking at Diagram No. I again we see that the inclination
of Pi-P2 to the course of the guide equals angle P2-P1-B, which
in turn equals angle BPC (the present bearing) plus angle CP1p?
(inclination of position line to present bearing). In other words
if we can find a ready means of obtaining angle CP1pwe have
merely to add it to the present bearing to get the desired inclina-
tion of the position line to the course of the guide. But we have
found that our Diagram No. 2 is a graphic means of solving tri-
angles. Comparing triangles P1P²G and QGS we find that angle


  p. 2279 (#1243)                      

1925)
2279
Direct Reading Maneuvering Diagrams
PAGP² (the change of bearing) corresponds to the angle QGS
(the change of course), that the ratio of PPG to PiG (distance
ratio) corresponds to the ratio of SG to QG (speed ratio) and
that the angle CPip? (inclination of position line to present bear-
ing) corresponds to angle DQS (inclination of line QS to course
of guide).
Using Diagram No. 2 we may, then, enter the left column with
the change of bearing, move to the right to intersect the proper
distance ratio curve and thence up to the top of the diagram where
we find the corresponding value of angle CP1P2.
70
0 160'50 140 130 120 "o 100 90 80 0 60 50 40 30 20 10 o
TINNT
171TXT
27
DIAGRAM
NO.2
170
y
1801
We have therefore the rule that the inclination of the position
line to the course of the guide is the present relative bearing plus
or minus a certain angle according as the change of bearing is
toward or away from the guide. Given the change of bearing and
distance ratio this “certain angle" is obtainable from Diagram
No. 2.
Having obtained, as above described, the inclination of the posi-
tion line to the course of the guide we can obtain by again using
Diagram No. 2, the various course and speed combinations which
will take the maneuvering ship to its new position.


  p. 2280 (#1244)                      

2280
[Dec.
U. S. Varal Institute Proceedings
It now remains to combine Diagram No. 2 and a diagram rep-
resenting the present bearings so as to make one diagram for each
of the two cases, (1) increasing bearing and (2) decreasing bear-
ing. The complete diagram for increasing bearing is given as Dia-
gram No. 3. For simplicity when reduced in size some lines are
omitted. The diagram for decreasing bearing is not given, but it
is similar to Diagram No. 3 except that the triangular diagrams at
the right are inverted and the numbering on the “present bearing”
scale is reversed.

RATIO OF NEW TO PRESENT DISTANCE
36 CHANGE
40
OF
zuwwaywZW<->W OW CW-
Z
160 COURSE
x 6c AWAY
O FROM
UZE GUIDE
we
140
TO CHANGE
awowzOw co-ZU
OF
100 COURSE
TOWARD
GUIDE
DIAGRAM No. 3
In Diagram No. 3, the upper left triangle (Diagram No. 2)
gives the inclination of the position line to the present bearing.
The diagonal parallel lines are marked for "present bearing” and
diagramatically add the present bearing and the inclination of po-
sition line as obtained from the upper triangle. These two angles
combined give the inclination of the position line to the course of
guide. The triangles at the right are each a Diagram No. 2. They


  p. 2281 (#1245)                      

1925)
2281
Direct Reading Maneuvering Diagrams
use the angle of inclination in combination with the speed ratio
curves and give as an answer the corresponding change of course
(relative to the guide) and the direction of that change—whether
away from or toward the guide.
The construction of this diagram as above explained may appear
somewhat involved (it seemed so in working it out) but the rules
for its use are simple. To use this diagram:
1) Enter upper left side of table with "increase of bearing”
and move horizontally to right until intersecting “distance ratio”
curve corresponds to ratio of new distance to present distance.
2) From this intersection drop down vertically to the diagonal
line corresponding to “present bearing."
3) From this intersection move horizontally to the right to in-
tersect speed ratio curves in a right hand triangle.
4) From any one of these intersections move down or up ver-
tically and at the edge of that triangle read the change of course
(from course of guide) and direction of turn.
The heavy dotted line on Table No. I shows the path to be fol-
lowed for the following problems :
1) 40°, 5 miles on starboard bow of guide, to take station 15
miles on that beam. (Here increase bearing is 50° and distance
ratio 3.)
Answer: Maintain speed of guide and turn out 36°; or take
twice speed of guide and turn out 80°, etc.
2) 100°, 6 miles to port of guide, to take station 170° to star-
board of guide, distant 12 miles. (Here increase of bearing is
90° and distance ratio 2.)
Answer: Take two-thirds speed of guide and turn toward guide
27° or 87°; or maintain speed of guide and turn in 108°, etc.
The above rules and examples cover the most common use of
this diagram. It should be noted, however, that this diagram gives
the relation of the five variables :
Change of bearing
Distance ratio.
Present bearing.
Speed ratio.
Change of course.
It is therefore possible to obtain any one of these items when the
other four are given or assumed. Some of these cases are perhaps
merely interesting but they explain the flexibility of the table.


  p. 2282 (#1246)                      

2282
(Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Suppose a destroyer 60° on starboard bow, 5,000 yards from the
guide, changes course to right 60° and takes twice the speed of the
guide. The table shows she will have increased her bearing 26°
when at double her former distance.
As previously stated, these diagrams represent the general case
in which there are five variables. In the most common maneuvers,
however, there is no change of distance-only a change of bear-
ing—or there is a change of distance (opening or closing from
the guide) but no change of bearing. In the first of these cases-
no change of distance—the diagram gives the correct solution
using the distance ratio curve (in this case a straight line) corre-
sponding to a distance ratio of one.
In the second case-opening or closing distance without change
of bearing, the diagram gives the solution by using a zero change
of bearing and the zero distance ratio line for closing distance
and the infinity distance ratio line for opening distance. This
means that the intersection in the distance triangle for closing is
at its upper left corner and for opening distance at its upper right
corner.
While it is thus seen that the two diagrams cover all cases
whether simple or complex, it is possible and probably desirable to
construct special diagrams for these two most common cases—as
such tables can be made more simple.
Taking first the case of changing bearing without changing dis-
tance:
In this case it is apparent that the direction of the position line
is at right angles to a bearing half-way between the present and
new bearing—in other words, the inclination of the position line is
the mean bearing plus or minus 90°. If we take diagram No. 2 as
the basis for our new diagram, we may mark the "inclination of
position line” side, with “mean bearings," displacing the values
90° either way to allow for the plus or minus 90°. Now in Dia-
gram No. 2 the "inclination" angles run from oº at the point of
the diagram to 180° at the right angle corner. To cover the case
of subtracting 90° from mean bearing we should therefore mark
the corresponding points on Diagram No. 4, from 90° to 270° and
to cover the case of adding 90° we should mark them from minus
90° throigh oº up to plus 90°. Though not apparent at first glance
this is what has been done at the left side of Table No. 4. The
left column covers the first case of subtracting 90°. Reading


  p. 2283 (#1247)                      

1925] Direct Reading Maneuvering Diagrams 2283
from the top down this is apparent as far as the middle of the
column—180°. After that instead of going from 180° to 270°,
it is desirable and practicable to reckon the bearing on the opposite
side—thus 170° instead of 190°, 160° instead of 200°, etc.

MEAN
BEARING
COURSE S and SPEEDS
TO CHANGE RELATIVE BEARING
WITHOUT CHANGE OF DISTANCE
100/80A
O Owuowauw wc-Z0
NOTE: MEAN BEARING IS HALF THE
SUM OF PRESENT BEARING AND NEW
BEARING WHEN BOTH ARE ON SAME SIDE
OF GUIDE, AND HALF THEIR DIFFERENCE
IF NEW BEARING IS ON THE OPPOSITE
SIDE OF THE GUIDE
CHANGE OF COURSE FROM THE
ALL BEARINGS ARE RELATIVE
AND MEASURED FROM 0° TO 180*|
TO RIGHT OR LEFT OF GUIDE.
Aspeed of Gugat
COURSE
CURVES REPRESENTS
RATIO OF YOUR
SPEED TO SPEED
OF GUIDE
ro - Zuawenw
20
O
GUIDE
14
w CR-ZU
G 10080 A
Isolyo
180
0 10 20 30 40 50 60 70 80 90 100 110 120 130 140 150 160 170
CHANGE OF COURSE FROM THE COURSE OF THE GUIDE
DIAGRAM NO.4
The second of these columns covers the case of adding 90°, the
angles in the upper half really being minus angles (angles on oppo-
site side.) It is not necessary to consider the minus sign because
it ultimately concerns only the direction, not the amount of the
change of course, and in this problem we can make the simple rule
that the turn be always made toward the new position..
It is apparent that for each “mean bearing” there are two sets
of problems depending on whether we are increasing or decreasing


  p. 2284 (#1248)                      

2284
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
(Dec.
the bearing. Thus, if we are to go from 90° to 170° the mean
bearing is 130°. We are increasing the bearing and we must use
the lower half of the diagram, whereas, if we are going from 170°
to 90° we are decreasing the bearing and we must use the upper
half.
There remains the question of how most conveniently to obtain
the mean bearing. When the two bearings are on the same side, the

180,0
170ALOR
Speedok Guide
erwowzt war-zu FO UOMO-CZUW
35
X
Ill
0 10 20 30 40 50 60 70 80 90 100 110 120 130 140 150 160 170
CHANGE OF COURSE (FROM COURSE OF THE GUIDE
AWAY FROM GUIDE IF OPENING TOWARD GUIDE IF CLOSING
DIAGRAM NO.5
mean is, of course, half their sum. When they are on opposite
sides we could reckon both from the same side say 90° and 220°
and take half the sum, but as the new bearing will be given as left
140° rather than right 220°, it is more convenient to take half the
difference between the two bearings each reckoned on its own side.
This really gives the reciprocal of the mean bearing, but for our
purposes both are the same.


  p. 2285 (#1249)                      

1925]
- 2285
Direct Reading Maneuvering Diagrams
The rules for using Diagram No. 4 are very simple. It is merely
necessary to enter the left side at the appropriate point, move to
right to intersect a speed ratio curve and then vertically up or
down to obtain the change of course corresponding to that speed
ratio.
In the case of opening or closing distance without change of
bearing we again use the fact concerning Diagram No. 2, that if
we have the inclination of the position line to the course of the
guide, we can obtain the proper combination of course and speed
from a simple triangular diagram. Now in the case of opening
distance the position line runs in the direction which the ship bears
from the guide. In closing distance it runs in the opposite direc-
tion. It is necessary therefore only to make a No. 2 diagram in
the form given as No. 5. Enter this diagram with the present
bearing, using the right side when opening and the left side (where
the scale is reversed), when closing, move horizontally to intersect
a speed ratio curve and dropping down vertically, read off the
change of course corresponding to that speed.
This is the simplest of all these diagrams and possibly the most
useful as it can be used not only in maneuvers but in station keep-
ing, and in opening or closing the range while maintaining the
bearing
As stated in the beginning of this article it is not believed that
these diagrams can or should replace the mooring board, which
must be the basis of all accurate maneuvering. On the other hand
they may prove simpler for some officers. They do give a picture
of the relation of the various elements entering in a maneuver
which the mooring board diagram does not give and it may be
worth while to have them printed in some of the tactical books or
posted on the bridge.


  p. 2286 (#1250)                      

A DEVICE FOR SOLVING FOR TRUE WIND
By LIEUTENANT F. H. GILMER, U. S. Navy
IN VIEW of the fact that several of the new fire control in-
stallations call for the use of true wind instead of apparent
wind, it is expedient to have some method of quickly and
accurately determining this factor. The following device, designed
and originally used by Lieutenant O. Nimitz, serves the purpose
and has the additional advantage of being easily made.
Construction: On a thin piece of board about twelve inches long
and six inches wide paste a plain piece of white paper. Draw the
longitudinal center line and from a predetermined center lay off-
along this line-graduations to represent ship's speed in knots.
Any convenient scale may be used. Construct two dials graduated
in degrees. One is to be used as “True Ship’s Course Dial”; the
other as “True Wind Dial.” The compass roses, cut from old
charts, will serve the purpose very well, provided they are pasted
on light metal or cardboard in order to give them the requisite
strength. The Apparent Wind Arm and the True Wind Arm are
made of light brass or some other similar metal. It is essential
that the graduated side of these arms run through their pivot cen-
ters and that the graduations be laid off along this side from the
pivot center. The scale used must be identical with that previously
used for ship's speed. An excellent method of satisfactorily grad-
uating these arms is to cover the metal arm with a strip of
adhesive tape and to paste a piece of paper on the tape. The grad-
uations can then be made with India ink. Pivot the True Ship’s
Course Dial and the Apparent Wind Arm, the one above the other,
and in such a manner that each may be turned independently of
the other, about the previously determined center from which the
own ship's speed graduations were laid off. Pivot the True Wind
Dial and the True Wind Arm about a common movable center in
such a manner that each may be turned independently of the other.
If the ship's speed in knots is shown by mere line graduations, a
thumb tack may be used as a common center for these two. If


  p. 2287 (#1251)                      

SO
a
20
10
0
TRUE WIND DIAL
Oz! 011 001
o 330 340 350
iso 140 150 16
EE oze of
OLI 091 OS!
WYV ONIM 3181
5 ZTO 280 280 3o
20
230 240 250 26
Bo 200 210
210 220 230 240
=
15
SHIPS SPEED, KNOTS
10
APPARENT WIND ARM
70 80
ch
VIO
KC 20 so số
3500 10
120 130 i
ho 320 330 340 35
TRUE WIND SOLVER
140 150 160 iz
DESIGNED BY Lt. 0.Nimitz
DAAWN BY LT, F.H. GILMER
Taco 270 280 290 som
TRUE SHIP'S COURSE DIAL
SO 170 180 190
220 230 240 250
o 190 200 210 a


  p. 2288 (#1252)                      

2288
[Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
small holes are drilled for these graduations, it is possible to use a
peg of the proper size for a center pivot.
The scale to be used, the size of the dials and the length of the
arms can be made to suit the existing conditions. Under ordinary
circumstances it will probably be sufficient to allow for a ship's
speed of not more than 40 knots and for a wind of not more than
50 knots.
Operation.—Turn True Ship’s Course Dial until it gives the
ship's true course when read against the inscribed longitudinal
center line. Swing the Apparent Wind Arm around until its
graduated side gives the direction of the apparent wind when read
against the True Ship's Course Dial. Place the common center
of the True Wind Dial and the True Wind Arm over the grad-
uation representing the ship's speed. Turn the True Wind Dial
until its reading against the longitudinal center line is identical
with the reading of the True Ship’s Course Dial. Swing the True
Wind Arm around until its graduated side intersects the Apparent
Wind Arm at the graduation representing the force of the appar-
ent wind. Then the True Wind Arm read against the Apparent
Wind Arm will give the force of the true wind and read against
the True Wind Dial will give the direction of the true wind. In
the illustration the following factors are used :
Ship’s course 60°,
Ship's speed 25 knots,
Apparent wind direction 90°,
Apparent wind force 20 knots,
which give:
True wind direction 190° (-),
True wind force 127/2 knots.
The construction of this device can be somewhat simplified by
drawing the ship's course dial on the paper and graduating it for
relative bearing. The True Wind Dial and the True Wind Arm
can then be fastened together so as to move as a single piece. In
this case the zero graduation of the dial should coincide with the
intersection of the graduated side of the True Wind Arm and the
circumference of the True Wind Dial. When so constructed the
relative bearing of the true wind is read off of the True Wind
Dial against the longitudinal center line.


  p. 2289 (#1253)                      

THE DESTROYER ENGINEER IN BATTLE
By LIEUTENANT GEORGE R. FAIRLAMB, JR., U. S. Navy
D VERYONE will agree that the training of a destroyer's en-
gineer force in practical engineering battle casualties is essen-
tial. More than this, it is required by the spirit of our
regulations if not by the letter. But is it given the attention, the
thought, the actual time which it merits? Is it not instead rather
looked upon as a necessary evil to be avoided as conveniently as
possible? In many instances does it not exist in the minds of
engineer officers only hazily in the limbo of things which one is
always going to do sometime? Do commanding officers, having
their attention fully occupied with gunnery, torpedoes, and the
tactics of search, scouting, and destroyer employment, in addition
to normal routine, often think of it unless their engineers bring
it to their attention? Does not the employment schedule always
interfere with such practical training underway?
On consideration, why should especial emphasis be placed upon
drill in actually handling engineering battle casualties? Because,
first, with most of our destroyer installations, a well-drilled en-
gineer crew can keep its ship in line of battle in spite of bad casual-
ties, or at the worst can prevent her from drifting helplessly into
her mates or into the enemy gunfire-barring complete wreckage
to all boilers or to all turbines; and second, because the engineer
officer being usually the third in command and experience will
doubtlessly find that his battle station will eventually, if not in
the beginning of battle, be other than below.
That it is entirely practicable to have a reliable destroyer en-
gineer crew handle its plant without the immediate supervision of
its chief is proved daily at sea in the absence of commissioned or
warrant engineer watch officers below. If war were declared to-
morrow and it became necessary to man our entire destroyer force,
the experienced officer personnel would be scant, and the engineer
officer would probably find himself aloft helping to fight the ship
in battle. If the engineer personnel of all of our destroyers in


  p. 2290 (#1254)                      

2290
[Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
active commission are perfectly indoctrinated and competent in the
actual handling of battle casualties the destroyer arm has taken a
long step toward attainment of true battle efficiency.
Of the various accounts and stories of the Battle of Jutland, one
which appeals greatly to the imagination is that describing the
"burning torches and funeral pyres drifting past in the night."
The passage in quotation marks is an inexact quotation from a
German account of what the Germans did to British destroyers
that fouled their battle line during the night retreat-probably
worth less than most accounts, but still very expressive of what it
means to a destroyer to have shells come tearing through fire-
rooms, oil tanks, or engine rooms. Also there are records of that
battle which show that badly plugged destroyers limped off to
safety. We have the case of our own Shaw which steamed, stern-
to, a long way to port after a nasty collision.
The destroyer engineer, even though he have a sluggish imagina-
tion, if he sit in the quiet of his stateroom at night and ponder
these things a bit will unquestionably wonder what he should do
if a shell burst his starboard main steam line in the forward fire-
room. Well, what should he do? And suppose, to make matters
worse, a certain section of his engine-room auxiliary steam line
had gone also. What do? The more he sits and thinks of the
harrowing casualties that could happen to cause not only death to
his engineers but reduction in speed, or complete and entire break-
down and helplessness, the more he realizes the necessity for a
smart "black-gang" who know, every man jack of them, from
chief petty officer to fireman third class, the answer to every cas-
ualty that can be met. He begins to write down every casualty to
boilers, steam and water lines that he can think of. Opposite he
puts down the answer, for has he not made 28 plus knots on two
kettles, and once because the port Kingsbury thrust threatened
to strip his h.p. engine, didn't he make 20 knots on the starboard
screw with ennui and precision and keep the ship in formation?
But what is the answer when both main steam lines are gone yet
there still remain some boilers with steam and the necessary auxil-
iaries? He is not sure. So he goes down to the engine room and
right enough he finds that by closing this and opening that he can
make all the speed that the auxiliary steam line will permit. How
much speed would that be? He doesn't know, and he cannot find
out except by actual trial.


  p. 2291 (#1255)                      

1925]
The Destroyer Engineer in Battle
2291
It is an interesting subject. He finds that there are certain
hook-ups, the significance of which he had never really grasped;
that there are certain lines whose value in battle he had never fully
realized; that there is the subject of communication between fire-
rooms, between engine rooms; between engine rooms, firerooms,
and bridge. What probably happens when a shell blows the hell
out of the forward fireroom? How are the after fireroom and
the engine rooms to know exactly? All very interesting, what?
The net result of such pondering should be a list of every con-
ceivable battle casualty that could happen with the appropriate
remedies such as they are. Means of communication are of great-
est importance—and where communication probably will break
down. The symptoms such as steam pressure falling, and so forth,
should be studied. In doing all of this it is well not to be cursed
with a too vivid imagination for there are, alas, so very many
casualties which cannot be answered at all.
With his battle casualty scheme thoroughly worked out, the en-
gineer then takes his black-gang into his confidence and begins to
find out how extraordinarily ignorant of the fireroom leads the
engine room people are, and how very little the fireroom people
know about the engine room. They know enough for every day
work, to be sure, but the nicest points of the game they've missed,
for each gang is wrapped up in itself primarily. When all the
casualties have been discussed—and it is remarkable the interest
that will be awakened—drills are held at anchor. Then the interest
gradually subsides. Make-believe does very well for a time, but in
the long run no more benefit accrues from make-believe drill in
engineering casualties than from make-believe target practice.
So the engineer goes to the skipper and if the skipper be wise
something like this will happen. Whenever on independent duty
and time permits, engineering casualties are held while underway.
The engineer force are all on their battle stations. All clocks and
watches are checked and set together. The engineer officer goes
below and springs his casualties. Where possible, without any
spoken word, a valve is closed and the “symptoms” begin to speak
for themselves. Action becomes imperative. Boilers are cut in
and out. Every hook-up is actually used. Time studies of casual-
ties and communications are as beneficial here as in gunnery, and
the time of the casualty, time of notification to bridge, and the
time of "ready to go ahead" are taken. It is discovered that the


  p. 2292 (#1256)                      

2292
(Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
ship can make 12 knots, or whatever it may be, by taking steam
only through the auxiliary steam line to the port engine and so
forth. It is all very interesting and everybody has had a good
time, even the quartermaster who reports gravely to the officer-
of-the-deck that the after fireroom is on fire and has to be aban-
doned, all except the engineer officer, who when it is over begins
to wonder what effect his little game will have on "form H" and
the engineering competition.
Aye there's the rub. It costs him much laborious and tedious
work to figure out his conditions and his speeds, and when it is
over he has averaged much too little speed for the gallons of oil
burned. Though he has contributed in no mean way to training
his department for battle efficiency, his ship, if such exercises are
indulged in too frequently, will have a lower multiple than her
sisters, other factors being equal.
The world is divided into two types of people. There's "them
that do and them that don't.” Ships are the same way. But the
above scheme as outlined is practicable. It was carried out under
a recent squadron commander on the Asiatic station. It should be
required by all squadron commanders not only of destroyers, but
of other classes of unarmored vessels. It is required of command-
ing officers by the spirit of our regulations, yet how often is it
honestly tackled in the way it should be? Having been away from
the service afloat for the past two years the writer can only say
that it was not being done in his time.
Would it not be feasible to embody in the rules for engineering
performances, certain allowances for engineering battle casualty
drills and then, to clinch the matter, require all vessels upon com-
pletion of their annual full power trials to go through all con-
ceivable battle casualties that can actually be handled, and receive
a merit therefor? Such a scheme would tend to produce highest
caliber engine and fireroom crews. In destroyer captains at least,
it would breed greater confidence in both ordinary service and
battle conditions, and it would permit them without qualms to
assign engineer officers on the top side in battle where our per-
sonnel situation will probably in any case require them. Last but
not least, there will be fewer "burning torches and funeral pyres”
cluttering up no man's land between the battle lines.


  p. 2293 (#1257)                      

A DESTROYER DIVISION COMMANDER'S
INSPECTION
By LIEUTENANT V. H. GODFREY, U. S. Navy
VERY destroyer skipper thinks his ship is the most efficient
one in the squadron. Only one can be that, and at present,
despite many wardroom and café discussions, there is no
real system of designating that one. Of course we have the
“Battle Efficiency” trophy which combines engineering and gun-
nery—but shouldn't the name of that be changed to "Practice
Efficiency”—can it logically be claimed that battle conditions are
even simulated in any target practice or at any time in the engine
room or fire-rooms ? Preparation for battle? Maybe—but what
way have we of knowing if the organization would continue to
function under real battle conditions with the leading personnel
dropping right and left and casualties constantly occurring ? No
commanding officer wishes to see his target practice records
spoiled by insertion of arbitrary casualties, so the only relief
is another inspection, but a different one—a “simulated battle.”
There was one division commander's inspection, short and
snappy, which developed flaws in the prettiest looking battle prep-
arations—and discovered true merit in others not so ornate in
appearance. It afforded the whole division an opportunity to see
their shortcomings and incidentally kept them interested and happy
during a spell of very tiresome, monotonous duty.
Here is how it was run. To be sure it entailed a few hours'
extra work on the division commander's part, but the results were
well worth it.
The Inspection Board:
The division commander.
Two other destroyers' captains (same division).
Two other destroyers' executives.
Three other destroyers' engineers.
Two other destroyers' ordnance officers.


  p. 2294 (#1258)                      

2294
[Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
One other destroyers' torpedo officer.
Four other destroyers' first lieutenants and communication officers.
The above officers were notified by guard mail, confidential, of
the time to assemble on the boat to be inspected, furnished with
typewritten copies of instructions—sample below—and told to
bring stop watches.
The board assembled on the boat to be inspected, notified the
commanding officer, and repaired to chart house to start stop
watches at “zero hour.”
Procedure: A designated officer in a small boat near the ship
throws overboard a "dummy” (life preservers in an old uniform)
and calls “man overboard.” Time taken to get boat in water is
noted and a mark is assigned on smartness of crew, and so forth.
Other emergency drills are held in the same manner.
Allow commanding officer a few minutes to restore gear, then
blow "zero hour" on whistle—all hands start stop watches and
follow procedure as outlined in instruction sheet.
This inspection can be held either underway or at anchor, and is
capable of infinite variations.
Instructions for Inspection Board of DD 353:
A. Composition and stations of board:
DD 348 Commanding officer, at large; engineer, No. 2 fire-
room; ordnance officer, No. I gun.
DD 349 Executive, after control; ordnance officer, fire con-
trol; communication officer, bridge.
DD 350 Commanding officer, bridge; first lieutenant, amid-
ships ; communication officer, radio.
DD 351 Executive, bridge; engineer, engine room; first
lieutenant, ammunition supply.
DD 352 Commanding officer, bridge; engineer, No. i fire-
room; torpedo officer, torpedo tubes.
Each provided with stop watch and instruction sheet.
B. Procedure: Commanding officer (348) inform commanding
officer (353) that war is on between United States and Black.
The 353 is leading a division of destroyers acting as AA close
screen in position on engaged bow, speed (20). Enemy main
fleet 20,000 yards on starboard bow of United States fleet. Base
course oº true. Engagement about to commence.


  p. 2295 (#1259)                      

1925]
2295
A Division Commander's Inspection
C. Sound whistle when commanding officer (353) says he is
ready to go to general quarters. All observers start stop watches.
Whistle is zero time.
Note: Officer in “By Whom” column takes notes of handling of
casualty on his sheet.
Time
By Whom
Casualty
04-00 Commanding Officer (350 Navigator informed “Periscope"
submarine sighted, bearing 340°
true, distance 300 yards.
Communication Officer (349) Sees if correct submarine signal
made to AAs.
Commanding Officer (352) Commanding officer handles ship to
ram.
05-00 Engineer Officer (352) Steam to smothering line, port fire-
room tanks start leaking badly be-
tween auxiliary line and valve
water tender in No. I fireroom in-
formed.
06-00 First Lieutenant (350) No. 2 gun captain, “shell hit in gal-
ley, oil on fire."
07-00 Communication Officer (349) Flag hoist given meaning "Engage
enemy destroyers bearing oº true.”
Interpretation by communication of-
ficer.
Commanding Officer (350) Commanding officer gets message
above.
08-00 Commanding Officer (350) Informs navigator that a column of
enemy destroyers is ahead, steering
160°, speed 30, distance 6,000 yards.
(Note: Commanding officer should engage, leading division in by signal.)
09-00 Ordnance Officer (348) Gun captain and first pointer of No.
I gun killed.
10-00 Ordnance Officer (349) Director gyro stopped.
10-00 Engineer (351)
Running generator burned up.
11-00 Ordnance Officer (349) Spotter killed.
11-00 Engineer (348)
Oil line burst, No. 2 fireroom, oil
fire started.
11-00 Communication Officer (350) Main antenna carried away.
12-00 First Lieutenant (351) Forward magazines on fire. Notify
man in charge ammunition party.
12-00 Torpedo Officer (352)
Tell torpedo officer and commanding
officer, battle cruiser 6,000 yards on
starboard beam, parallel course,
speed 25.


  p. 2296 (#1260)                      

2296
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
[Dec.
Time
By Whom
Casualty
13-00 Communication Officer (349) Signal meaning "Break off action
with enemy DD's and take former
position."
Commanding Officer
Observe commanding officer's man-
(352-350)
euvers.
14-00 Engineer (351)
Port condenser hit by shell, out of
commission. Leading C.M.M. killed.
14-00 Engineer (352)
Forward fireroom main feed line hit
by shell, leaking badly. Leading
W.T. killed.
14-00 Engineer (348)
All hands No. 2 fireroom killed by
oil fire.
15-00 Commanding Officer (352) Commanding officer and helmsman
killed. Wheel shot away. (Com-
manding officer and helmsman retire
to emergency cabin.)
16-00 Executive (349)
Sightsetter, trainer and gun captain,
No. 4 gun, killed.
17-00 Torpedo Officer (352) Torpedo target starboard quarter,
parallel course, speed 20.
18-00 Commanding Officer (350) Navigator and all bridge personnel
killed. (Allow navigator to send
dying message, to after control)
20-00 Communication Officer (350) Radio room gets message from AA's
"Course-180º-execute."
21-00 Torpedo Officer (352) All torpedo men killed.
Ordnance Officer (348) All No. I gun's crew killed.
First Lieutenant (350) All No. 2 and No. 3 guns' crews
killed.
First Lieutenant (351) All ammunition party killed.
23-00 Executive (349) ·
All No. 4 gun's crew and after con-
trol killed.
24-00 Engineer (352)
All fires out, steam gone in No. 1
fireroom.
Engineer (351)
All steam gone in engine rooms.
Notify chief Engineer, he is com-
manding officer.
25-00 Engineer (351)
Notify chief engineer he must stand
or Commanding Officer (350) by to repel boarders. Enemy de-
stroyers approaching abeam. (Note:
anti-aircraft gun still in commis-
sion.)
27-00 Engineer (351)
Notify chief engineer to prepare
or Commanding Officer (350) ship to be taken in tow. (Destroyer
was friendly.)
(Note: An officer killed should be allowed to notify his relief.)


  p. 2297 (#1261)                      

1925] A Division Commander's Inspection
2297
This inspection is not meant to stir up hard feelings or give
anyone a chance to ridicule anyone else. The whole idea back of
it is to encourage initiative of subordinates and to broaden the
vision of everyone concerned by bringing before him the cold
fact that his professional interest should not be limited to the
scope of his particular assigned duty, but should extend to the
general working of the whole ship. It is intended to show that
navy men should be not only masters of one trade but jacks of all
trades as well; and so to promote real battle efficiency.


  p. 2298 (#1262)                      

THE WAR STAFF IDEA AFLOAT
By LIEUTENANT H. J. Wright, U. S. Navy
DROBABLY the most striking and significant lesson of the
World War is the realization that without the coordination
of all the resources of a belligerent, victory is impossible.
War today finds “nations in arms”—the idea of the professional
Army and Navy carrying on the fight while the civilian conducts
"business as usual" is no more, and the warfare of today and the
future envisages every last resource of a nation whether it be mili-
tary, commercial, or scientific, employed to its elastic limit in the
effort to win. Naturally the complications arising from many
varied and at times conflicting interests demand cooperation and
coordination to the greatest extent.
As the scope of civilian participation in war has increased, so
have the factors in the actual military and naval prosecution of
wartime activities become amplified. The necessity for expert
coordination of the multiplied weapons now available to the com-
mander is increased. The control and direction of all the elements
comprised in a force is the function of command and it is ap-
parent that the high command is faced, in the exercise of its func-
tion, with increasingly grave responsibility.
In the past, when war was a matter of small armies, small fleets,
and limited theaters of action, the commander was able personally
to exercise his command function aided by an administrative, tech-
nical, and supply staff, which busied itself with such questions as
the service of supply and administrative details incident to the
operations in hand. The commander was able to devote his time
and energy to the handling of his forces on the tactical field.
Then, too, he could have a more or less complete picture of the
situation, estimating the enemy's forces, their strength and dis-
position, and make his own plans and decisions.
War today presents a different problem. The increased size
of the fighting forces, the great extent of the front, the multitude
of new weapons; all these make demands on the commander


  p. 2299 (#1263)                      

1925]
2299
The War Staff Idea Afloat
which without adequate assistance, he could not meet. A com-
mander today would indeed be a superman could he but keep track
of his own forces and prepare orders for them, to say nothing
of enemy effort. Modern conditions of warfare have added such
a multiplicity of detail to the function of high command that it is
impossible for one individual personally to attend to the onerous
details required by his command responsibility and at the same
time to pay attention to the broader phases of it.
This condition has made apparent the necessity for a general
staff, in addition to the administrative, technical, and supply staff.
The Army found, in its participation in the World War, that its
organization was inadequate and that a general staff, to render
strategical and tactical assistance to the commander, was an abso-
lute necessity. To the credit of the Army, it evolved a staff idea,
based particularly on the German general staff system, and pro-
ceeded to train and employ general officers on staff duty. The mis-
sion of the general staff is to assist the commander in the exercise
of his command function. It is composed of a chief of staff and
four assistants and this staff idea is carried out, in form and
function, in all commands down to the division.
The chief of staff is the assistant, adviser, and representative
of the commander and is the coordinator of the whole command;
he transmits the commander's will to the staff and troops. The
four assistant chiefs of staff are assigned to the four distinct
functions of command-personnel, intelligence, operations and
training, and supply. Without going into a detailed analysis of the
army general staff system, it may be said that the general staff
forms a strategical and tactical service itself, especially trained
to furnish detailed assistance in its own specialty of troop leader-
ship, not to command the technical and administrative branches.
In this sense the staff officer is trained in the leadership of troops
of the combined arms, to coordinate the branches, not to perform
their functions.
Because the general staff solves the problems of war, coordi-
nates the various arms, and is, in effect, a part of the commander's
mind, its members must be trained for tactical command, and in
order properly to function, each member should be able to assume
any one of the four assignments on the staff.
In order to make clear the point that the general staff does not
perform the functions of the various bureaus, but is a separate


  p. 2300 (#1264)                      

2300
(Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
and distinct function, let us take for example the part G-4 (assist-
ant chief of staff for supply) plays in the planning of an operation.
The staff is informed as to the nature of the mission by the com-
mander and the situation estimated by the members of the staff.
G-4 collaborates with G-1, G-2, and G-3 in solving the problem
and from his training as a general officer is able to supply definite
information as to the logistic requirements of the contemplated
operations. Without his knowledge of, and experience in, similar
operations, his estimate of the logistic requirements for the pres-
ent problem would be inadequate. Once the decision is arrived at,
the quartermaster department receives definite and accurate esti-
mates of the needs of the forces involved and makes provisions
to meet them.
The outstanding features to be observed about the general staff
are: that its duties are those which the commander formerly per-
formed himself; that its duties are not at all those already assigned
to other staff agencies; that the general staff relieves the com-
mander of the burdensome details incident to the coordination of
the activities of the various elements of the command in further-
ance of his strategical and tactical plans; and that the general
staff is not within the chain of command.
Naval operations of the present era have gone through the
same amplification that army development has. World-wide sea-
borne commerce, outlying possessions, strategic waterways such
as the Panama Canal, increased tactical possibilities due to the
development of the air arm, and new and untried weapons: all
these have broadened the scope and complexity of naval effort
in war, so that the high naval command is faced with exactly the
same sort of problem as is that of the Army. The Army has met
the problem by the introduction and development of the general
staff system. The Navy, the writer believes, is faced with a simi-
lar situation and the answer is yet to be found.
Ashore, there exists, in a measure, an analogue to the general
staff idea. The office of the chief of naval operations is organ-
ized into departments whose heads are officers of flag rank, capa-
ble because of their experience and training in solving problems
of war. They are lobes of the brain, so to speak, of the chief of
operations. Certain high standards of service plus staff training
should be demanded in these advisers to the chief of operations
and undoubtedly are.


  p. 2301 (#1265)                      

1925)
2301
The War Staff Idea Afloat
But the staff afloat presents no such effective organization nor
is there, to the writer's knowledge, any system in operation in the
Navy which insures the assignment to the commands afloat, of men
trained in the exercise of high command and capable, because of
this training, to fill the billet of general staff officers. There exists
undoubtedly, in the service, some repugnance to the idea of a
general staff, probably because of its German origin. But call it
by any name, its effectiveness remains unimpaired and the neces-
sity for some such war staff is apparent.
In what direction this idea should be developed and what ten-
dencies should be stressed in the formation of a general staff
scheme in the Navy, the writer is not prepared to say. However,
it seems that inasmuch as the officers assigned to the general staff
of a commander of a fleet must possess the qualifications and
training for high command in order to help solve the problems
faced by the commander, they should be rear admirals in rank
and should have had the advantages of special training along these
lines in addition to actual seagoing experience as division com-
manders. This relation between the commander and his staff, i.e.,
similarity in training and experience, should be maintained down
through the chain of flag commands.
In smaller commands the war staff idea can be carried out by
officers of the technical staff in addition to other duties. However,
it should be borne in mind that the detail of a specialist to the staff
does not qualify him to discharge the duties of a general staff
officer. His tactical training, his knowledge of command func-
tions, experience, and professional qualifications, not his specialist
accomplishments, are the considerations which should determine
his fitness for general staff duty.
For the sake of discussion let us try to construct an organization
scheme for a general naval staff, with particular attention to its
application afloat, in view of the fact that any war service the
fleet may be called upon to perform will probably be distant serv-
ice with all its communication difficulties and consequent increased
responsibilities of the commander in the actual theater of oper-
ations.
The necessary characteristics of such a scheme are its adapta-
bility to the various higher commands, its practicability, and utility.
Any departure from present practice which will involve radical
changes in method, greatly increased personnel, and which is not
useful in effect must necessarily be discarded.


  p. 2302 (#1266)                      

2302
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
[Dec.
The naval commander's problems are closely associated with
the “Estimate of the Situation"; that is, if he is properly trained
he attacks every problem with the logical treatment indicated in
the standard form of the “Estimate.” If he correctly estimates
a given situation, his decisions are inevitably sound, and sound
decisions carried out bring victory. Hence, his two objectives are
sound decisions and the correct execution of them.
The integral steps leading to the decision are (a) a mission,
which is either derived or contained in orders from the higher
command. This is the commander's task; (b) an investigation
into the enemy's forces, their strength, disposition, and probable
intentions; (c) a complete knowledge of our own forces, their
strength, disposition, and a survey of the courses of action open
to us to carry out our mission, as affected by probable enemy
effort.
The correct execution of the decisions of the commander de-
pends on the clarity with which they are conveyed to the subordi-
nates, in orders, assuming, of course, that the necessary zeal,
loyalty, and professional fitness pervade the subordinate com-
mands.
As has been pointed out previously, the extent and complexity of
modern warfare is such as to make it almost impossible for a
commander to keep track of what is going on over the extent of
a modern battlefield. Therefore it becomes the logical duty of
his staff to supply the necessary details, and a natural division of
staff work is thereby suggested, as a basic idea for the organiza-
tion of a strategical and tactical staff system, which will be prac-
tical in application, easily adapted to the various grades of com-
mand and which will serve a useful function, i.e., the assisting of
the commander in the exercise of command.
Let us, then, organize a strategical and tactical staff along lines
suggested by the fundamental mission of such a staff, bearing in
mind the necessity of establishing a system which will be appli-
cable to all commands of flag rank.
Naturally we first have a chief of staff, whose function it is to
be the principal assistant, chief adviser, and representative of the
commander. He is the coordinating agent who insures the proper
functioning of the whole machine and is the medium for the
transmission of the decisions of the commander to the staff and
subordinate commands. The function of his assistants is to aid


  p. 2303 (#1267)                      

1925]
The War Staff Idea Afloat
2303
in the solution of the problem facing the commander, and a logical
division of this work might be to assign one to “enemy forces,”
one to "own forces," and a third to logistics.
Number one, in handling “enemy forces,” naturally performs
the related duty of intelligence officer and works in close collabora-
tion with number two, who, in handling "own forces," must of
necessity be cognizant of enemy strength and activity in determin-
ing the chances of success in the various courses of action open to
us. Number three, from his training and experience in command,
would supply the necessary data as to the logistic requirements
of the projected operations.
It will be seen that these tasks are not individual ones; they are
performed in collaboration and are coordinate in nature. In order
to forestall the natural inclination to enhance one's own task at
the expense of the other fellow's, these three tasks assigned to our
assistant chiefs of staff should be held in rotation by them. This
will also emphasize the necessity for cooperation among the staff
members.
For purposes of identification we might assign designating let-
ters to these three functions in accordance with the fleet or com-
mand to which the staff is attached. Thus for the United States
Fleet we designate the strategical and tactical staff as F-1, F-2,
F-3; that of the battle fleet as BF-1, BF-2, BF-3; that of the
scouting fleet as SF-I, SF-2, SF-3, and so forth. The function
of each remains constant.
From the solution submitted by these three officers, the com-
mander, advised by his chief of staff, makes the decision. This
solution will be adequate and worth the commander's attention
only if the members of the staff are adequately trained in com-
mand themselves and have the necessary experience to see the
problem in its larger aspects. This must be the fundamental
characteristic of the general staff officer.
Not every officer is equipped by nature to fill this sort of staff
assignment. Just as we recognize the need for ordnance and en-
gineering specialists, so should the necessity for trained strategical
and tactical specialists be admitted. We train our ordnance ex-
perts, our engineers, our aviators. By the same token our staff
officers should be trained. The Naval War College is striving
toward this end, it is true, but the War College does not assign
officers to the fleet, nor does it differentiate in its own sphere


  p. 2304 (#1268)                      

2304
[Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
between those who are mentally equipped for staff duty and those
who are not. Every officer cannot be so equipped; it is not "the
nature of the beast.” The writer is firm in the belief that medi-
ocrity is not our standard. We eliminate a certain percentage of
the applicants for aviation and submarine duty as unfit for this
particular sort of work and find places for them elsewhere. But
we employ no selective method in training our strategists and tac-
ticians, probably because we have not as yet a well developed
concept of the function of a war staff. One thing is certain, how-
ever; no matter what form our staff organization takes, training in
command, strategy, and tactics should be a sine qua non to staff
assignment. That training is given definite form and direction at
the Naval War College, and the completion of the course there
should be the preliminary without exception, to higher command
or staff duty.
The scheme outlined above for the organization of a strategical
and tactical staff to assist the high command is of course merely
a "feeler.” The writer realizes that it is open to many criticisms,
and that there are probably many better basic ideas upon which to
build a war staff scheme, but if it serves no other purpose than
that of a target for broadsides of criticisms, its mission will have
been achieved, for criticism implies attention and attention to
this vital subject will develop proper ideas.
The scheme suggested would be practical in that no great ad-
ditional personnel is required; no change in methods of attacking
problems is advocated. It is adaptable to all commands of flag
rank; it is consistent with the employment of officers now assigned
as staff technical assistants, provided they have had war staff
training; it is a uniform method of supplying adequate assistance
to all commands and therefore provides, in the lower commands,
a selective source of supply for war staff assistants in the higher
commands, and, what is most vital, it provides a group of men
fitted by training and experience to take up the burden of actual
command.
The problem of supplying trained assistants, experienced in
the art of war, to our commanders, must be be met eventually.
The Army found the answer in the crucible of war and had the
opportunity of applying it because our allies were fighting the
battle and we had time to install the system. We may never again
be so fortunate. The Navy was not charged with the defeat of


  p. 2305 (#1269)                      

1925)
2305
The War Staff Idea Afloat
an enemy fleet in the World War; nor with the patrol of the seven
seas and the guarding of our own shores and distant possessions.
The writer naturally believes that if these problems had arisen,
they would have been solved but that in the solution of them we
inevitably would have been forced to effect an efficient war staff
organization as were our brothers in arms, the Army. The hulks
of warships still visible at Cape Helles, the waste of life at Anzac
and on the hills of Gallipoli, and the whole failure of the cam-
paign to force the Dardanelles, bear eloquent witness to the lack
of efficient staff work. There is no need to go into more examples
of such a nature; it is not pleasant; but unless facts are faced in
a spirit of constructive criticism, we can logically expect like re-
sults from like causes.


  p. 2306 (#1270)                      

UNITED STATES OCCUPATION OF THE
DOMINICAN REPUBLIC
By COMMANDER C. C. BAUGHMAN, U. S. Navy
THERE have been published many and varied articles rela-
| tive to the condition prior to and after the occupation of the
Dominican Republic by the United States forces. Notwith-
standing these articles, I will endeavor to give a narrative of the
principal points and conditions leading up to the establishment of
the military government and a short account of some of the things
done by it. It is to be borne in mind that the method of establish-
ing quiet, of stabilizing conditions, and of aiding in the develop-
ment of the Dominican Republic was different from that which
had been used by the United States on previous occasions in other
places and was considered to be in the light of an experiment.
It is believed that in following this method, many obstacles, which
had been encountered by the United States in its helpful activities
· in other countries, were eliminated. This account covers, other
than some financial history of the previous few years, approxi-
mately the first two and one half years of the military govern-
ment's activity, during all but the first two months of which I was
on the staff of the Military Governor and administered the affairs
of the departments of "Public Works and Communications" and
“Agriculture and Immigration.”
In 1907 there had been created a public debt of over $30,000,000
This debt was caused principally by disturbed political conditions
with revolutions and resultant claims against the government. The
Dominican Republic was able to bring this indebtedness to
$17,000,000 by a political adjustment.
By what is known as the American Dominican Convention of
1907, the bond issue of 1908 was effected, whereby the sum
of $20,000,000 was realized by the Dominican Government. This
sum was used for the purpose of settling all claims, the purchase
of certain concessions and for public works projects. Among the
conditions under which this plan was accepted was that the United
States should lend its assistance in the collection of the public


  p. 2307 (#1271)                      

1925]
2307
U. S. Occupation of San Domingo
revenue of the Republic and that the Dominican Republic should
not increase its public debt without first obtaining the consent of the
United States. In 1912, with the consent of the United States
government, the public debt was increased by an additional loan
of $1,500,000. This loan was paid off in 1917.
Political disturbances and revolutions continued, however, until
by June, 1916, there had been contracted by the Dominican gov-
ernment additional claims of indebtedness amounting to over
$15,000,000. This indebtedness was contracted without the con-
sent of the United States, thereby violating Article III of the
Convention of 1907. This debt had been accumulated in various
ways from graft to real necessity; for the suppression of revolu-
tions, some for unpaid bills of the government, some for unpaid
salaries, and some for damages due to seizures by revolutionary
bodies.
In May, 1916, during a period of revolution and poor financial
management, the American government took action to establish
order. The marines landed and stopped the revolution. In June,
the General Receiver of Dominican Customs, (an American treaty
official), took over the collection of internal revenue. A special
deputy with three assistants was placed in direct charge of the
Dominican treasury, which was found to be in a chaotic condition.
The cash balance showed a deficit of $14,234.63, supply bills and
salaries had been unpaid for months and thousands of creditors
with accumulated accounts were clamoring loudly for their
money. Due to the fact that the government had been in disorder
for such a long period of time, the morale of the employees was
very low to the extent that continual fraud against the government
was practiced without fear either of detection or punishment. The
collections of internal revenue were irregular, and of the collec-
tions actually made only a part ever reached the treasury. No
effective check was made on disbursements and little, if any, notice
was taken of the budget in force. Since the people seemed to be-
lieve that there was little wrong in defrauding the government and
that public office was considered a license to take tribute, rather
than a sacred trust, it was very difficult to sift the legitimate pend-
ing current accounts from the fraudulent ones. A great many
claims which were presented to the government for payment were
certificates of indebtedness which had been given by the govern-
ment for debts in lieu of cash. These certificates had been bought


  p. 2308 (#1272)                      

2308
[Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
up by speculators at a very small fraction of their actual value.
At first an attempt was made to pay current accounts where their
correctness could be established, but this proved to be a greater
task than had been anticipated so that in August, 1916, those in
charge considered it necessary to suspend all payment under the
budget in force. This action was taken also as a matter of coer-
cion in an endeavor to force the Dominican government to meet
the wishes of the United States, but those affected most by this
suspension were not in a position to force the government and this
action consequently caused a great deal of real distress.
The Dominican Republic was placed under military government
by the United States on November 29, 1916, Rear Admiral (then
Captain) H. S. Knapp, United States Navy, issuing the proclama-
tion on that date. Although the republic was placed under mili-
tary government on that date, Admiral Knapp did not assume the
title of military governor until he was specifically ordered to do
so a few months later. The proclamation recited that,
The Dominican Republic had failed to live up to the terms of the treaty
of 1907, that the American government had patiently endeavored to aid the
Dominican government, but that the latter was neither inclined nor able
to adopt the measures suggested. Therefore, the American government be-
lieved the time at hand to take steps to assure the execution of the said
convention and to maintain domestic tranquility in the republic. The object
of the occupation was not to destroy Dominican sovereignty but to restore
order.
The military government thus established proceeded to reorgan-
ize and stabilize the activities of the different governmental de-
partments and to undertake a general improvement of the country.
It waited for some days after the proclamation for some indication
that the provisional government would in some way cooperate in
carrying on the ordinary administration of affairs. No indication
of cooperation or assistance was manifest however, and persons
familiar with conditions gave assurance that the military govern-
ment could expect no assistance of any kind, whereupon the offices
of the military government were established in the government
palace. Upon taking possession, it was found that the president
and cabinet had come to the palace after the proclamation, had
cleared out their desks, and had not since appeared in the palace.
Since it did not seem possible to get Dominicans of suitable char-
acter to accept the different cabinet offices for fear of criticism of


  p. 2309 (#1273)                      

1925)
2309
U. S. Occupation of San Domingo
their own people, and because of the attitude of the Dominican
governmental officials, it became necessary for the Military Gov-
ernor to place officers under his command in these offices in order
that affairs under the different departments could be properly ad-
ministered. This procedure met the hearty approval of politically
disinterested Dominicans, many of whom later requested and
begged the Military Governor not to think of appointing Domini-
cans in these offices, but to continue the administration of affairs
through the American officers whose work was giving such satis-
faction to them.
As noted above, payment under the budget of 1916 had been
suspended in August, 1916. Three days after the proclamation,
payments of all salaries with the exception of those of the presi-
dent, cabinet officers, congress, and major officials, appointed by
the provisional government, were resumed. This together with
the announcement that any check drawn, for payment of a salary,
would be made payable only to the individual in whose name it
was drawn, and would not be transferable by endorsement, had
the good effect anticipated.
After the proclamation there was no political disturbance of
any magnitude. Several attempts were made, but were unsuccess-
ful. The marine forces of occupation were stationed throughout
the republic and moved about as circumstances dictated. The
principal operations of the marines were directed against certain
outlaws and bandits but, as usual, the marines were able to meet
the situation. A very great deal of this banditry or outlawry was
really no worse than exists in certain parts of the United States
today, but, in view of the circumstances, was made much of by
malcontents in the Dominican Republic and, in our own country,
by critics of the United States government's action.
The populace was gradually disarmed, which of course tended
to the advancement of general tranquillity..
The holiday season, previously a period marked by shooting,
violent deaths, and so forth, was, during the 1916 holidays, quiet
and orderly throughout the country. Dominicans of wide acquaint-
ance and experience stated that the disarming of the people was
one of the best things that had ever happened to the country.
The Dominican congress, which had been sitting as a constituent
assembly, adjourned sine die on the day that military government
was declared. The next session was due on February 27, 1917.


  p. 2310 (#1274)                      

2310
[Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
The constitution, however, provided that the terms of one half the
deputies and one third the senators should expire every two years
and, since February 27 was the regular date for the expiration of
one quota, the provisional government had issued calls for an elec-
tion to fill the vacancies.
Under existing disturbed political conditions throughout the
country, it was considered out of the question to hold such an elec-
tion. This opinion was shared both by American officials and
Dominicans themselves. An executive order was, therefore, issued
which prohibited the holding of elections in the republic.
It therefore followed that owing to the constitutional termina-
tion of the services of certain senators and deputies, and to the fact
that elections were forbidden, and that a quorum did not exist,
the military governor issued an executive order suspending con-
gress as well as suspending from office all senators and deputies
whose terms had not expired. Like the order suspending elec-
tions, the suspending of congress met with almost universal
approbation as a measure that would go far in removing disturb-
ing political agitation.
When the military government was first established there were
a number of foreigners, particularly Americans, who appeared to
feel that the government was intended more or less to be a means
of facilitating or favoring their own enterprises rather than a
serious attempt to set the Dominican Republic on its feet. A ten-
dency was manifest in those early days to rush, through the mili-
tary government, measures that had apparently been hanging fire
with the Dominican government. Even some of the Dominican
people holding high office endeavored to use "pull” to get official
sanction to illegal gains on their part. One case in point was where
a judge wished to hold his judgeship and at the same time draw
salaries for other positions under the budget. He solicited the aid
of one of the principal political leaders of the republic and in com-
pany the two men visited the military governor. The request was
made of the governor who, of course, replied that such a thing
could not be done in accordance with the law, which fact the judge
no doubt knew. The political leader had, of course, carried out
his obligation to the judge, and when he heard the governor's
answer seemed to be secretly amused.
The military government always held it as an article of faith
that it was acting as trustee for the Dominican government in de-


  p. 2311 (#1275)                      

1925]
U. S. Occupation of San Domingo
2311
fense of the interests of the people, and it refused to be rushed or
to act on such measures without knowing their merits.
The government persisted in this attitude with the result that
the conviction became general that the military government, while
it would not stand in the way of, and would on the contrary aid,
foreign enterprises authorized and conducted strictly according to
Dominican law, would not permit them to have concessions of a
character that allowed them to exploit the country for their own
selfish ends at the expense of the Dominican people.
One of the first real problems confronting the central govern-
ment was the extinguishing of all claims against it that had arisen,
subsequent to the negotiation of the treaty of 1907, estimated at
about $15,000,000, as well as providing the means of paying them
off. This question was given immediate attention, but due to its
many phases as well as membership, powers and jurisdiction of
the commission to handle it, the executive order appointing the
commission known as the Dominican Claims Commission of 1917
was not signed until June 26, 1917. This commission had for its
purpose the investigation of all claims subsequent to the adjust-
ment made to conform to the American Dominican Convention of
1907 and prior to the establishment of military government, No-
vember 29, 1916, the making of awards of amount due each claim-
ant, and for the further purpose of recommending ways and
means for the settlement of such awards.
This commission was vested with all the power of Dominican
courts and from its judgments there was no appeal. It could sum-
mon witnesses, administer oaths, examine public or private papers,
impose fines or imprisonment for contempt, perjury, obstructing
its proceedings, or any other act tending to defeat its purpose.
Needless to say it was called upon prior to the completion of its
work to avail itself of practically all the powers with which it was
vested.
The work of the commission was completed in August, 1920,
having reviewed approximately 9,000 claims on which awards on
over 6,000 were made in amounts equal to approximately
$4,250,000. In order to take care of this allowed indebtedness,
the bond issue of 1918, amounting to over $4,000,000 was made.
On July 31, 1920, due to bonds redeemed and money in the amor-
tization fund there remained less than $3,000,000 of this bond issue
yet to be paid.


  p. 2312 (#1276)                      

2312 . U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
[Dec
It is quite evident as shown by the result of the commission's
activities that its accomplishments were of paramount importance
in removing the greatest of barriers to the country's progress.
Other than the larger and well-established claims against the gov-
ernment, many resulted from the lawless acts of former govern-
ments, whose highest officials would require personal service and
entertainment from individuals who could not afford them. Many
cases of poverty were the result. The adjustment of such legiti-
mate claims caused great relief.
On the other hand, as shown by the number of unrecognized
claims, there were many attempts to defraud. Shortly after the
commission began its sessions and the public at large realized the
possibilities in connection with false claims many withdrew their
claims which had been registered. Even then there were a num-
ber of cases where fines and imprisonments were imposed because
of absolutely false claims or perjury.
Since the United States had taken over the responsibilities of
government there was no apparent reason for the continuance of
the activities under the Department of War and Marine. Con-
sequently, activities under this department were suspended and
such unfinished business or questions as might arise were placed,
with one or two exceptions, under the cognizance of the Depart-
ment of Interior and Police.
It was under this latter department that the guardia or national
police force was reorganized. This force was given training by
the U.S. Marines and it was hoped that in the long run the people
would appreciate the advantages of stabler conditions, of good
order, and that with the aid of this police force they themselves
would not further permit revolutionary movements that had done
so much in the past to retard the country's development. Numer-
ous evidences of esteem in which the police force was held were
shown. One case in particular was where the captain of a com-
pany (Sergeant, U.S. Marine Corps), had been assassinated and
high civil officials as well as the citizenry of the town expressed
their grief and horror over the assassination, declaring a two days'
mourning in his honor, closing all business houses, prohibiting
entertainment in public and private, as well as the passage of
vehicles in the public streets during that period. This may have
been to a large degree a personal tribute, but it was felt to reflect
honor on the organization to which he belonged.


  p. 2313 (#1277)                      

1925] U. S. Occupation of San Domingo 2313
In the regular organization under the law existing prior to the
coming of the military government there was nothing which pro-
vided for an adequate public health service. There was authority
for a board of sanitation, but nothing at all was being done by
this board. A surgeon of the Navy was appointed as head of this
board and under his guidance and control the board's activities
were recognized and spread to all parts of the country. Later on,
the board of sanitation was superseded by the Department of Pub-
lic Health and Beneficence.
Every activity over which the central government had control
was given careful consideration by those concerned. I will later.
take up matters that can better be handled under the different
specific departments. From time to time different officials made
extensive trips throughout the country for the purpose of getting
first hand information on local conditions, meeting the different
civil authorities, and discussing personally with them subjects
which were of particular interest to those people concerned,
and also for the purpose of discussing generally the aims of
the government as well as letting them know that the central gov-
ernment had an interest in their welfare.
When the officers of the military government first assumed their
duties they were deluged by requests, suggestions, and petitions of
every sort from all parts of the country. Had they all been fol-
lowed or acceded to it is difficult to say what could have been the
result. It was therefore quite necessary to go slowly and follow
the iron-bound policy of first examining the state of the treasury,
estimating the minimum future income, determining on the most
desirable projects, and then attempting only those most desirable
projects which would in no way hazard a safe cash balance.
It can well be seen that it became quite desirable and necessary
for government officials to make the above mentioned visits in order
to sift the desirable projects from the undesirable ones as well as
to discuss the government's method of determining its operations,
thereby letting the people know that they were receiving every pos-
sible consideration, while the government at the same time was pre-
venting a repetition of the over expenditure of funds on hand as
well as possible future income, as had been done in the past.
One of the outstanding features of the proclamation was the
announcement that
The ordinary administration of justice, both in civil and criminal matters,
through the regularly constituted Dominican courts, will not be interfered


  p. 2314 (#1278)                      

2314
[Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
with by the military government herein established; but cases to which a
member of the United States forces of occupation is a party, or in which
is involved contempt or defiance of authority of the military government
will be tried by tribunals set up by the military government.
This attitude was zealously guarded by the military government
and every effort was made to lend aid to the courts and increase
their prestige. The salaries of the judges which previously had
been extremely meager were increased in keeping with the dignity
of their office. It was found that the courts greatly improved, that
the increased pay of the judges had resulted in greatly raising their
independence and efficiency, while the support of the military gov-
ernment stiffened them in the performance of their duty.
Educational matters in the country were in a deplorable con-
dition. The schools were inadequately housed, there being only
enough space to accommodate a very small percentage of the chil-
dren. The school furniture and equipment were badly wanting
both in amount and condition. It had been unfortunate that in the
handling of the schools so much graft had been practiced.
In the second month of the military government a commission
composed entirely of Dominicans and headed by the Archbishop of
Santo Domingo was appointed for the purpose of going thor-
oughly into the subject of education. The secretary of the com-
mission was appointed superintendent of schools and the work of
reorganization was immediately begun. Unworthy teachers were
weeded out and less attention was paid to higher education and
much more to primary and secondary education. One of the two
so-called universities was suppressed and an effort was made to
reduce illiteracy of the masses rather than to give a limited class
a professional or literary education.
Different from the method adopted in the Philippines and Porto
Rico, that adopted here was to carry on the education of the chil-
dren in their native language rather than to force the English
language on them. It was surprising how many American and
other foreign people condemned this policy and strongly advocated
the requirement of English. It is believed, however, that they had
lost sight of the proclamation which stated that the United States
had no intention of interfering with the sovereignty of the republic
and that perhaps in a very few years the military government
would be withdrawn and there would exist the unquestionable
problem of changing the system. Furthermore, the fundamentals


  p. 2315 (#1279)                      

1925]
2315
U. S. Occupation of San Domingo
of education could be given to greater numbers in their own lan-
guage by methods to which they were accustomed, with the same
total cost.
There was soon manifest a decidedly upward trend in the mat-
ter of education as well as an increased interest shown by educated
people and the directly benefited class themselves. Improvements
were shown in all directions from the matter of school buildings,
furniture, and equipment to rectification of courses, preparation
of school books, general reorganization, compulsory attendance,
teachers' qualifications, and compensation commensurate with
their work. The attendance during the first two and one-half
years increased about 120 per cent under more modern standards
and the appropriations for school purposes in 1918 doubled those
of 1917.
Public Works and Communications.—The operations under this
heading covered a great many activities such as public works, har-
bor improvements, post office, telegraphs, railroads, mining law,
patents and trade marks. The office of public works and the gov-
ernment-owned railroad were presided over by American engineers
nominated by the United States. All funds for public works
projects had to be first appropriated by the Dominican govern-
ment and this appropriation, if from the Dominican loan, had to
be approved by the United States Department of State before the
money became available.
Operations under public works were at a practical standstill
when the military government was established, but after a careful
study was made of the situation, funds were provided for the
prosecution of work already authorized and for certain new work.
There was laid out a broad scheme of projects upon which the
remainder of the loan available for public works might be spent
in a manner that would be to the greatest advantage of the country
as a whole. This plan was approved by the State Department and
steps were immediately taken to put it into operation.
Several projects under the plan were already in operation under
contract when the military government took possession, but as
funds derived from internal savings became available in the treas-
ury, other numerous improvements were undertaken. These com-
prised such projects as repairs to public buildings, roads, light-
houses, smaller items of new construction, and harbor improve-
ments. The entry of the United States into the war brought in


  p. 2316 (#1280)                      

2316
[Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
the difficulty of entering into contracts with American construc-
tion companies and of obtaining materials at a reasonable price
for carrying on the major activities. It therefore became neces-
sary for the military government to carry on most of the work
by administration and to use its influence through the Navy Depart-
ment in providing the necessary equipment and materials. Fur-
ther difficulty was encountered in obtaining labor, a common con-
dition in the republic, and this proved to be a great handicap in the
carrying on of road building.
It was believed that there was nothing more vital to the develop-
ment of the country than adequate roads and there was not a pass-
able road across the island in any direction. Communications
between the north and the south, across the central mountain
range, over a distance of less than one hundred miles, was pos-
sible only by trail, often impassable in the rainy season, or by a sea
journey of four or five days. There were several sections of
highway already completed which were eventually to be parts of
main highways, but there remained practically 200 kilometers yet
to be built. After the approval of the public works plan by the
United States, the construction of a highway connecting the north
and south was carried on as fast as adequate equipment and ma-
terials arrived and the necessary labor could be obtained.
Two other projects of importance undertaken by public works
were the building of a national leper colony and a penitentiary.
The need for these institutions was imperative since lepers, though
very few, could be found in the streets coming in daily contact
with other people, and as for the jailing facilities, the word inade-
quate is barely expressive of the condition. The jails were unsafe,
unsanitary, and too small.
In December, 1917, a national road law and accompanying regu-
lations for motor-driven vehicles were promulgated and placed
under the office of public works. Previously the only laws cover-
ing the subject were local ones, as there had been no need for a
uniform law, since there were no passable connecting roads be-
tween cities. As roads were opened up, however, the new law
became necessary, for, needless to say, the different municipalities
had handled this matter in divers ways.
The general policy was to concentrate all funds and energies on
opening up of highways and second class roads rather than to
deviate any money to the building of railroads. There are two


  p. 2317 (#1281)                      

1925) U. S. Occupation of San Domingo 2317
railroads in the northern part of the island, one, a privately owned
road extending through the northern valley, east and west, from
the most thickly settled portion in the north central part, to
Samana Bay. The other road is owned by the Dominican gov-
ernment and runs from the same north central section to Puerto
Plata which is in the northern part of the island. This latter road
crosses the most northern range of mountains, over part of which
it is necessary to use geared engines, and consequently it is inade-
quate to handle all the traffic that eventually will be demanded of it.
At first this road was in an unsafe condition due to the ravages
of revolutions but, under a new management, continual repairs
were made and all the freight which had accumulated was even-
tually moved. It soon was able to handle all the business presented
to it with the result that instead of its being a burden to the gov-
ernment it became a paying utility. The income during 1918 in-
creased so rapidly that it was deemed advisable to reduce the then
high tariff by 10 per cent gross.
The mining laws of the country were extremely poor. They
were not comprehensive in any manner and gave no protection to
the government especially as to concessions granted. They were
inadequate as was proved by the fact that concession holders
used the possession of a concession for personal ends along specu-
lative lines without even the expenditure of either labor or money
in their development. They exploited their concessions in any place
where a market could be found for them with the ultimate result
that the subject of Dominican concessions received a very bad
name not only in the Dominican Republic but in foreign countries
as well. Illustrative of the abuse of concessions to interested
buyers in the United States the following story is told as some-
thing that really happened in the days before the occupation. It is
about a so-called “Paint Mine.”
Mr. Jones owns a paint-mine concession in Santo Domingo near
Haina and, wishing to sell, he communicates with Mr. Smith in
the United States, sending him a sample of the raw paint ma-
terials. Mr. Smith, after having these samples analyzed, makes
the surprising discovery that they contain gold in good paying
quantities. Much elated over this discovery he secretly interests
several friends well able to finance such a "find,” proposing that
they form a combination with the intent of buying up the "paint-
mine” concession belonging to Mr. Jones. Agreeing to keep the


  p. 2318 (#1282)                      

2318 U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
[Dec.
discovery of gold in these samples secret, they decide to send their
own representative to Santo Domingo to obtain another sample in
order to verify their analysis. This, their representative does, and,
accompanied by Mr. Jones, returns to the United States. The
second sample also shows the presence of gold! By this time,
secretly convinced of their “find,” they enter into negotiations
whereby Mr. Jones receives $20,000 in cash for the option on his
"paint-mine," with the agreement that $10,000 more will be paid
upon the arrival of the purchasers in the republic, and a further
$20,000 upon the complete turn-over of the concession.
These financiers decide to combine business and pleasure. In
a yacht belonging to one of their party, they make a West Indian
cruise. Upon arrival in Santo Domingo negotiations are completed
on the payment of the $10,000, after which the party proceeds out
toward Haina to take possession. As they near the vicinity a great
deal of firing is heard and rumors along the road warn them that
another revolution is on, revolutions being a very frequent occur-
rence in the Dominican Republic at this time.
The revolution does not abate presumably, and after waiting
some days these men finally decide to return to the United States,
and leave their representative there to take possession as soon as
possible.
Upon their arrival home a cable is received which informs them
that they have been “sold”! The revolution ended the day after
the party had departed for the United States, there was no gold
in the mine, and both the original sample and the second one had
been “salted,” the latter accomplished by substituting the rep-
resentative's sample on board ship during his voyage north.
At no time was any other than a "paint-mine” concession offered
for sale by Mr. Jones, and Mr. Smith and his financiers bought
only a paint-mine, secretly thinking they had gold.
There seemed to be just enough prospect of future develop-
ments in the natural mineral resources of the country to justify
long chances in wild-cat exploitation. As a result the military
government believed it desirable not only to cancel and eliminate
all outstanding concessions on which no satisfactory development
had been made, but to frame a mining law which in the future
would properly control this activity.
The general policy of clearing up mining concessions where the
holders were not fulfilling their obligations was carried out.


  p. 2319 (#1283)                      

1925)
2319
U. S. Occupation of San Domingo
Through the courtesy of the bureau of mines in the Department
of the Interior of the United States one of the law examiners of
that bureau came to Santo Domingo City and made a thorough
study of the Dominican mining law and other laws on the subject
and, after careful personal survey and consideration of the situa-
tion, drew up a new law which was considered adequate to meet all
needs of the republic under that subject. After all points of this
law were discussed with different prominent Dominicans who had
the general welfare of the republic at heart, and had met generally
with absolute approval, the final draft of this law was drawn up.
This law became effective shortly after I left.
The conditions existing in the postal service could be termed
utterly inefficient. The method of handling correspondence was
very complicated, tedious and slow, with the result that it had be-
come very costly and irregular. The personnel seemed to be quite
indifferent in the performance of their duty and the vast majority
of offices and agencies seldom, if ever, kept stamps on hand for
the accommodation of the public. They kept detailed statistics
in large ledgers showing the number of pieces of each kind of mail
received daily from different points and rendered regular and
elaborate reports to the central office. The handling of registered
mail was needlessly complicated and involved, requiring too much
clerical work. There was in vogue a system whereby letters could
be mailed minus postage stamps and when delivery was made
double postage was collected. Every year thousands of such let-
ters accumulated because of either improper address or refusal to
accept. It was found that domestic mail was being transported
over mail routes by anyone who would do it at the least price, day
by day or trip by trip, and with no other contract than an oral
understanding. The extreme irregularity and unreliability of the
delivery of mail can be easily understood. The buildings in which
the post offices and telegraphs were housed were usually the most
dilapidated in any city or town and consequently were the subject
of grave concern.
It is quite evident from the above that there was a vital need
for a complete reorganization along modern lines in this service.
It was therefore determined to improve and broaden the service;
to use every means practicable to increase the revenue, to econo-
mize to the limit without lessening the efficiency, and to create an
efficient, expeditious, and secure system of transporting the mails.


  p. 2320 (#1284)                      

2320
[Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
One of the first steps in the reform of this service was placing
of the employees under civil service rules. There were no civil
service laws or regulations in the republic and it was believed that
its creation would be an excellent means of bringing the personnel
of the postal service to a much higher state of efficiency.
It was well known that one of the fundamental causes of politi-
cal unrest in the republic had been the possession of public offices
by virtue of political association and it was felt that with this cause
removed it would naturally follow that the future would hold less
reason for repetition of disorders. It was believed that the estab-
lishment of civil service would not only tend to maintain political
tranquillity, but would be a most stimulating factor in the develop-
ment of the public school system.
There was, of course, a certain class of mentally unqualified
political employees who opposed civil service and endeavored to
discredit its purpose, but this class as well as the public finally
grasped the idea that the only way to obtain and retain positions
under the postal administration, where civil service was in force,
was to possess the necessary mental qualifications proved by ex-
aminations, together with a reputation for honesty and industry.
The broad plan of reorganization was not put fully into opera-
tion until the service of a United States postal inspector of many
years experience, both in the United States and Latin countries,
was secured. It was through the courtesy of the Postmaster-Gen-
eral in Washington that he was released from the United States
postal service to the service in the Dominican Republic.
Under the supervision of the new director, things began to move
more rapidly. Parallel with the civil service establishment every
postal official whose responsibility warranted it was placed under
bond as well as under oath of office. Among other improvements
were the handling of supplies at reduced cost, the making certain
that an ample number of stamps were on hand at all times at all
offices, installing a more systematic and responsible method of
handling mails, the causing of actual investigation of complaints
(a thing that never had been done hitherto), and the establishment
of an office for the purpose of handling dead correspondence. As
these improvements began to show good results there was estab-
lished a postal money order system and special delivery section.
Both of these systems became very popular. In the ordinary
course of events it had usually taken from five to seven days to


  p. 2321 (#1285)                      

1925)
2321
U. S. Occupation of San Domingo .
transport mail between the north and south sides of the island, so
that it is needless to say the cutting of this length of time to less
than two days met with the hearty approval of the general public.
The national telegraph service was another victim of the times,
the lines having become in such poor state of repair that many
relays were required, the personnel was poorly paid and unreliable,
and the offices and their equipment were in such a dilapidated con-
dition that the whole service was demoralized. In addition to this
the offices were open for service but a few hours during the day-
time only.
This, like the postal service, was filled with political appointees,
some of whom never appeared at their office or place of employ-
ment. It can be readily seen that this service was an expense to
the government, whereas it should have been a source of income.
One of the first steps in the rehabilitation of this service was to
eliminate the undesirable personnel, open all offices through the
day, and all principal offices for twenty-four hours' service, with
a special rate for night messages, and to take drastic steps to re-
pair the lines so as to eliminate the necessity of relaying messages.
An index to the improvement in the service caused by the carrying
out of the above items was the doubling of the receipts in 1918
over those of 1917.
Under the old telegraph tariff law, the same charge was made
for any distance with no night service, which of course was quite
primitive. A new tariff was established which was more syste-
matic being based on the distance and class of message. These
changes brought gratifying results.
Besides owning the telegraph lines the government also owned
two radio stations. The larger of these stations was at Santo
Domingo and was of an old and obsolete type. It was replaced by
a modern installation purchased from the Bureau of Engineering
of the Navy Department of the United States. A special agree-
ment was entered into with the United States Navy Department,
whereby a specially low rate would be charged for commercial
traffic through this station.
The urban telephone systems throughout the country were
privately owned, but there were no connections between any of
these systems. They varied not only as to type, but as to value,
efficiency, and adequacy. Due to the building of roads and open-
ing up communication between cities and towns there would, of


  p. 2322 (#1286)                      

2322
[Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
course, soon follow the connection by telephone. It was realized
that it would be futile to attempt to connect the different systems
then existent. In order to accomplish this when the time should
appear, a law was passed authorizing the national telegraph service
to take over and modernize these different urban systems when
deemed advisable and to establish long distance telephone systems.
The first step in this direction was made when the government
purchased from its private owner the system of Santo Domingo
City.
On January 1, 1919, the postal and telegraph services were com-
bined under a director general of posts and telegraphs. By doing
this both services came under one controlling agency and made
possible the housing of both activities in the same office and under
one administration in the different cities and towns, thereby elimi-
nating much unnecessary expense.
The superintendent of telegraphs, a Dominican of prominence,
made the following statement in his report of June 30, 1919:
I want to state with patriotic enthusiasm that the program of reform
and improvements that is being carried out will bring this service to the
high standard of efficiency being achieved by the most important countries.
Agriculture.-Agricultural activities outside of the sugar estates
and a few plantations in the north of the island were quite lim-
ited, since there had been very little possibility or incentive for
advanced or scientific farming. The small grower cultivated only
what was necessary for his own particular use, because on nearly
all occasions his harvest would be reaped either by some of the
army or a band of marauders. Conditions were so unsettled that
permanent extensive cultivation was not contemplated by any
excepting those who were in a position to control such activity.
As a consequence the agricultural branch of the department had
little excuse for its existence. The laws had not been enforced
and few people knew of the provisions of the laws or even of
their existence.
The first definite steps toward the betterment of agricultural
methods and the education of agriculturists were taken in June,
1917, when the system of extension work was inaugurated. This
plan divided the country into agricultural districts where traveling
instructors and demonstrators moved about giving instructions to
farmers on methods of cultivation, draining, seeds, and so forth.


  p. 2323 (#1287)                      

1925) U. S. Occupation of San Domingo
2323
In the furtherance of this work experimental stations were estab-
lished and a director of agriculture appointed.
A further considerable handicap to progress had been caused by
the revolutions of former years when the man who had the least
was really the best off because nobody molested him. The interest
in the extension work was shown by the fact that during the first
year there were approximately 350 conferences held throughout
the republic, the attendance varying from 25 to 300 farmers. Due
to the prevailing world conditions at that time it was considered
of great importance that every effort be dedicated to the planting
of food stuffs so as to make the republic independent in that
matter.
To further the interest of farmers in the production of their
crops and to instill a sense of competition in the quality of their
production, exhibitions were held in different towns.
The country did not have a vagrancy law, but there was in-
augurated under the extension law the policy to insist that idle
country people put a definite amount of their land under cultiva-
tion, subject to the inspection of the instructor of the district.
This plan met with considerable success.
In the placing of sub-experiment stations it was endeavored so
to place them that the climatic conditions of no two would be the
same. It was found that one site situated in the mountains was
adaptable to the successful growing of northern plants. Among
the products of the Dominican Republic which are of importance
are cocoa, coffee, tobacco, sugar, cocoanut, honey, cotton, fruits,
vegetables, and fiber crops. Practically the only forage crops
grown are two kinds of grass and corn. The cotton which was
free from boll weevil was protected from this pest by appropriate
steps. Tobacco being one of the principal products, and one on
which prosperity depended to a large extent and from which
a great deal of revenue was derived, the value of peaceful and
secure conditions which allowed greatly increased production of
this plant can readily be seen.
Dominicans who had had the greatest amount of experience
were appointed as assistants to the different extension workers.
It was expected that these men would eventually be made instruc-
tors under this system and be given sections of their own.
On June 28, 1919, the corner stone of an agricultural college
was laid at the main experimental station near Santo Domingo
City.


  p. 2324 (#1288)                      

2324
(Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
The subject of agriculture was given a great deal of considera-
tion by those particularly concerned. By others it was treated
with more or less indifference. The Dominican Republic has great
possibilities agriculturally, and, while mineral wealth may be dis-
covered, thus far agriculture is the greatest source of riches in the
country, and it is a sure one under stable conditions. An attempt
was made to make this subject a familiar and popular one and to
show the Dominican people how to raise larger, better and more
varied crops, the proceeds of which would accrue to the Domini-
cans themselves and not go in a large measure to foreign corpora-
tions. It was introduced into the schools and, due to the fact that
enthusiastic school children are excellent propagandists, it was felt
that a great interest could be instilled in those at home. In the
majority of agricultural districts there were established under the
supervision of instructors demonstration fields which were worked
in connection with the schools and by the school children.
The relationship between the experiment station and the exten-
sion workers was that the station determined the proper seeds and
proper time in the year for planting, furnished seeds and necessary
data while the men in the field used the above in carrying out their
work. The extension workers also held meetings for the purpose
of stimulating interest, exchanging ideas, and making people
acquainted.
Finance and Commerce.—The general state of affairs existing
in the early days of the occupation made necessary some very
decided and early action in order not only to collect all revenues
due the government, but to expend only such funds as were prop-
erly authorized for legitimate purposes and at the same time in no
way to cause unnecessary fear of a deficit.
In the beginning of 1917 it was apparent that there was sufficient
data on hand from which a new budget could be prepared, so that
the 1916 budget was continued in force for another year. It is,
of course, quite obvious that a great many sums covered in that
budget were never expended during 1917.
Among other things accomplished were the appointing of a
depository for the funds of the Dominican government; the trans-
fer of the captain of the port from the department of war and
marines to that of finance and commerce; the granting of permits
for vessels flying the flag of foreign nations to engage in coast-
wise trade between Dominican ports in order to facilitate com-


  p. 2325 (#1289)                      

1925) U. S. Occupation of San Domingo
2325
merce; the establishment of a fidelity fund for the bonding of
employees holding positions of responsibility and trust; the passing
of laws regulating collections of consular fees; refunds of internal
revenue taxes on goods exported, and collection of import taxes on
alcohol and other articles; the enacting of a general revenue law, the
provisions of which did not so much alter the tax rate as they did
the methods of collection, this being a measure quite necessary in
order to have a reasonable certainty that the money collected would
reach the national treasury; the revision of the license law, thereby
trebling the income from this source, which income was used solely
for educational purposes and the passage of a law which, for the
first time in the history of the country, placed a direct tax on
property.
In some instances it was found desirable and necessary to re-
place Dominicans who held positions of trust by Americans. One
case in point, was that of the collector of taxes on alcohol. When
the Dominican holding this office resigned he stated that he could
not, with his Dominican connections, withstand the pressure
brought upon him to act illegally in the collection of taxes. He was
relieved by an American with the result that within a very few
days one distilling company was hailed before the courts and fined
over $100,000 for keeping false records.
General Effect of the Military Government.—The general effect
upon the country caused by the mere fact of the occupation
and all the activities under the different departments can easily be
imagined, especially if one had ever been present during the days
of topsy-turvy conditions. The internal strife soon stopped; busi-
ness improved and fairly boomed; agriculture became active not
only on the larger estates but on the small farms of individuals
who never before had attempted to plant a crop; schools were
built and filled; roads and means of communications were opened
up and improved, and there was a general atmosphere of increased
activity.
The revenue of the country increased substantially as evidenced
by the fact that when military government was proclaimed the pro-
visional government had just borrowed several thousand dollars
for daily needs, salaries had been unpaid for a considerable period,
and a debt of several hundred thousand dollars had accumulated
by overpayments on the budget. By January 1, 1918, all these
back salaries had been paid, current salaries paid as they became


  p. 2326 (#1290)                      

2326
(Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
due, the overpayments on the budget had been liquidated and
$500,000 set aside for the first year's expense of the guardia. Sub-
stantial sums were devoted to such matters as education, public
health, maintenance of public works, and general projects for the
benefit of the country and there then remained on hand about
$1,500,000 unobligated.
As a comparison of the amount of internal revenue collected it
can be noted that the collections for May, 1916, amounted to about
$25,000 while those for June, 1917, amounted to over $125,000.
This showing was due to the fact that the money collected was
being turned into the treasury and into substantially increased
business.
The customs collections, which had been under the supervision
of American officers for some time increased due, to a large ex-
tent, to the confidence felt in the stability of conditions by reason
of the presence of the military government, resulting in an in-
crease of business. During the first month of military government
(December, 1916), the customs collections amounted to about
$420,000 and by June they had risen to $545,000, which up to that
time was the largest ever made.
Such a showing as indicated by the increased receipt of revenue
would have been impossible under the old conditions and illustrates
the possibilities under conditions of tranquillity and economical
administration.
As the republic became affected by the United States' entry into
the war, however, there was a falling off of the customs receipts,
but this was offset by the continued increase in the amount of
internal revenues collected, so that the government continued to be
able to administer its affairs within its income and at the same time
devote a great deal of money to general improvements. Among
such further projects was the topographical and natural resource
survey of the country for which the sum of $300,000 was set aside.
This project was actually started in 1919, the United States Geo-
logical Survey undertaking the work. The government also made
provisions for loans to municipalities in order to encourage them
to undertake public works which would improve living conditions
of the people and add to their health, comfort, and convenience.
The following statistics are taken from the report of the gen-
eral receiver of customs, for the thirteenth fiscal period:
The foreign trade of the republic during 1919 was the largest in the
history of the receivership. Merchandise valued at over $20,000,000 was


  p. 2327 (#1291)                      

1925)
2327
U. S. Occupation of San Domingo
imported through the custom houses during the year, an increase over the
preceding year of nearly $2,000,000.
Exports during the same period amounted to practically $40,000,000, the
increase over 1918 being over $17,000,000, which clearly indicates increasing
industry and progress and the healthy condition of the country.
The most gratifying feature of the increase in foreign commerce is the
large balance of trade in favor of the republic amounting to over $17,500,000,
nearly double that of 1916.
The conservative policy maintained resulted in the accumulation
by the end of 1919 of a surplus from which it has been practicable
to make special appropriations for public works totaling
$3,270,203.97. These appropriations were for building of roads,
schools, public buildings, and port improvements. If it is borne
in mind that when the United States intervened the treasury
balance showed a deficit of over $14,000 and current salaries
and supply bills had been unpaid for six months the effect of the
change in the management is quite clear. At the second Pan-
American financial convention held in Washington, D.C., in 1920,
the conference committee of the Dominican Republic composed of
bankers, economists, and business men of large affairs, in its reso-
lutions stated that from a study of reports and information sup-
plied by the official delegation it had been established:
a) That the financial condition of the Dominican Republic as
a result of the currency reforms and fiscal system described in the
annex report is excellent and that the finances are established on a
sound basis which will permit the further growth and development
of the republic.
And Resolved that this committee takes pleasure in endorsing
the policy heretofore and at present pursued in establishing cur-
rency reform and a fiscal system which has resulted in the present
satisfactory financial growth of the republic and which will per-
mit of the further growth and development of the public resources.
Note: The government of the Dominican Republic was turned
back to a provisional government composed of Dominicans in
October, 1922, in accordance with the plan which was mutually
agreed upon by representatives of the government of the United
States. The provisional government so inaugurated administered
the offices until the regular elections were held, November, 1924,
and a constitutional government was inaugurated.


  p. 2328 (#1292)                      

ARE YOU WORTH IT?
By LIEUTENANT COMMANDER WALTER E. BROWN, U. S. NAVY
TUST how much are you worth to your wife? Not in a senti-
mental way, but in terms of dollars and cents? It would
seem a simple question to answer, but actually, because of the
way the future enters into the problem, it is far from simple.
If we suppose you are an ensign receiving $2,200 a year, of
which (neglecting insurance) approximately $600 a year is spent
on yourself with no benefit to your wife, then her income from
you is $1,600 a year. To be sure some of this goes for overhead
that benefits both of you, but whether you are at home or on the
China Station that overhead is necessary for her comfort. Capi-
talized at 6 per cent this $1,600 represents an investment of
$26,700. That is what your job is apparently worth to your wife.
It is worth some $10,000 more to you.
However, should she cash in on her investment in you for
$27,000 she would be making a big mistake. For as soon as you
become a lieutenant (junior grade), you will be worth $44,000 to
her; as a lieutenant, $60,000; as a lieutenant commander, $79,000;
as a commander, $103,000; and as a captain, $107,000. Even if
you retire as a commander, you are worth $50,000 for the rest of
your life.
In other words as long as you remain in the Navy you are of a
constantly appreciating and easily calculated present value, at your
maximum being worth about four times your minimum. So even
as an ensign, because of your future expectations, you are worth
considerably more than $27,000. It is impossible to calculate
just how much more, for neglecting the fact that you may die
tomorrow, your wife, because she is married to you, can expect her
unavoidable expenses to increase as children arrive and the family
responsibilities increase.
If, on the other hand, we suppose you have now become a com-
mander, your wife would be foolish (in a strictly business sense
of course) not to grasp the opportunity of cashing in on you for
$103,000 if she has the chance. For if you should happen to die


  p. 2329 (#1293)                      

1925]
Are You Worth It?
2329
today your value has dropped to six months' pay, perhaps $2,500,
and a small, a very small, pension, if you have been fortunate
enough to die in the line of duty, while that $103,000 would bring
her an income of over $6,000 for the rest of her life, and for the
rest of the lives of her children and grandchildren after her.
You, as an investment, don't fulfill for your wife one prime
requisite of a good investment. You are not safe. She stands to
make big capital gains with you, but she also stands to lose every-
thing, and as your value increases her risks increase also. In order
to' make yourself an absolutely safe risk you have to make sure
that her income continues unabated after your death. And this
in practice means that you have to insure your life for what you
are worth to her. What she will receive from you while you live
will be less than before, because your expenses have been added
to by the insurance premiums that you have to pay. And by the
same token they have to be deducted from what she would other-
wise receive.
Again let us suppose you are an ensign, twenty-four years old.
Your personal expenses are $600 (and if you think that excessive
just figure out what you actually do spend for food, clothing, car-
fare, amusements, and incidentals for yourself alone). You carry
a Navy Mutual Aid policy which will pay $6,000 and costs you a
trifle over $45 a year. Straight life insurance will cost approxi-
mately $14.50 a thousand. A little figuring will show that if you
pay $276 a year for insurance your wife will have about $1,320 a
year as her part of your pay, and will receive on your death
$22,000. This, if invested at 6 per cent, will yield her the same
amount that she gets now, and if put into an annuity may give her
more. (There is not much advantage in an annuity taken out un-
Pay & Personal Navy
Age | allowances expenses Mutual
Straight Wife's Total
life income insurance
$600
600
600
Ensign
Lieut. (g)
Lieut.
Lt. Comdr.
Comdr.
Captain.
$2,200
3,260
4,040
5,460
6,825
7,200
$ 236
452
607
956
1,408
1,504
$1,320
2,160
2,780
3,730
4,630
4,790
$22,000
36,000
46,300
62,200
77,200
79,800
700
87
700
800
106
Amount of insurance that must be carried to assure your wife her present income


  p. 2330 (#1294)                      

2330
[Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
der fifty.) You are an absolutely safe investment for her up to
$22,000, and in addition you still retain all your appreciative
values.
If now as you advance in rank you cover your increased worth
by insurance (which of course grows more costly as you grow
older) your permanent safe value is, as shown by the above table,
$36,000 for lieutenant (junior grade); $46,300 for lieutenant ;
$62,200 for lieutenant commander; $77,200 for commander; and
$79,800 for captain. Your wife meanwhile receives about two-
thirds of your total pay, or for commander and below within
one hundred dollars or so of what a bachelor officer at sea receives.
These amounts represent, therefore, the theoretical value of the
life insurance that you should carry in one form or another to
assure your wife a steady income whether you live or die. Any
savings that you may accumulate, any property that you or she
may have, can fairly be deducted from it. If your private income
is equal to your naval pay, then no insurance is required to
guarantee the value of your naval position to your wife, though
insurance is required to guarantee her the continuance of the in-
come she receives while you are alive.
But a very brief inspection of the figures will convince anyone
that for all practical purposes the insurance as thus arrived at is
too high, especially in the lower grades. You may agree that only
$1,300 of your ensign's pay of $2,200 should go to your wife, but
it is doubtful, what with two-room apartments costing $50 a month
and up, whether she will agree with you. As a matter of fact no
life insurance agent that knows his business will advise you to carry
so heavy a load. Considering you as an investment, your wife will
have to take in return for the great increase of value she will get
from you (if you live) a less degree of safety.
Budgets issued by professional budget-makers allocate a mini-
mum of 10 per cent of the income to life insurance. This per-
centage rises to 25 per cent in the $7,500 salary class. That mini-
mum is all right provided that the income is above a certain
minimum amount. But anyone with a position to maintain, as
every officer's wife has, and but a small amount of money to main-
tain it with, as every junior officer's wife also has, will question
the figures. Being young, both she and her husband discount the
future for the benefit of the present. Altogether too much so, if
you listen to any older officer, let alone any life insurance agent.


  p. 2331 (#1295)                      

1925)
Are You Worth It?
2331
A compromise between the viewpoints of your wife and the budget-
maker is plainly in order.
When you married, you, to all intents and purposes, undertook
to support your wife for the rest of her life. In consideration of
this she tacitly agreed to run your home and act as managing
superintendent of your family for the same period. She also agreed
that an ensign's pay, or rather the part of it she got, was enough
to provide for the overhead and running expenses of the home
besides supporting herself. If you were so unfortunate as to
marry when you were further along than an ensign, then we must
assume that it was not the lack of a sufficient income that deterred
you, but the fact that you had not as yet met your wife. With
these assumptions we have a starting point for determining the
amount of insurance that every officer should, we might almost
say “must,” carry.
To start out with we will admit without argument that an ensign
should allocate at least $100 of his salary to insurance, even if he
has to cut out smoking to do it. Your personal expenses (you
are an ensign again) are $600 and your wife is going to receive
$1,500 a year. She may not think it enough to pay the rent, the
butcher, the baker, and the candle-stick maker, but an ensign's
pay is inelastic, and it will admit of no more. Besides, even if you
married immediately on graduation, she has only three years to
carry on before she will get more. Unless you die first.
So we can reasonably fix $1,500 as the absolute minimum that
your wife is entitled to receive after your death. This represents
a capital investment of $25,000, and this, therefore, is the absolute
minimum amount of insurance that any officer should carry in
one form or another. Below this amount it is not a question of
how much you can afford to carry, but how much you can afford
not to carry.
We have kept $100 of your ensign's pay for insurance pre-
miums. Approximately $45 goes to the Navy Mutual Aid for a
$6,000 policy. This is term insurance and is not to be recom-
mended as a form to be taken out in any line company. (Inci-
dentally this $6,000 instead of costing $45 is actually costing
around $35, but that is another story, and you have to pay the
$45.) There is left $55 to be placed with a regular insurance
company. For this you can buy about $4,000 of straight life
insurance. The total of the insurance you carry and the six


  p. 2332 (#1296)                      

2332
(Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
months' pay that your widow will receive amounts to $10,750.
A very respectable start toward the $25,000 at which we are
aiming. It is to be noted that we have arbitrarily decided because
of your youth and the fact that you will receive an increase of pay
within a year or two that you can afford not to carry $15,000
worth of insurance. But we have stretched a point to do it.
When you get to be a junior lieutenant your salary takes a
jump of slightly over a $1,000. Here is where you catch up on
your contract with your wife, perhaps over her strenuous ob-
jections. She will want that $1,000 a year, and you can't blame
her. Still you had better get that insurance while you are young
and can get it cheap. Every policy has a cash surrender value of
something less than the amount paid in, so it is in no sense money
thrown away in case your wife should die and you have no other
dependent for whom you wish to provide. We would better ac-
cept the budget-maker's minimum figures and allow 10 per cent
of your total income to life insurance. For a junior lieutenant
that amounts to $330 a year or $230 more than you have been
paying. This will buy about $15,000 more insurance, which with
the six months' pay makes a total of $26,500 for your widow. We
have reached our minimum of $25,000 and your wife is getting
$750 a year more than she was. No matter whether she thinks it
enough or not, you cannot afford not to take your full coverage.
And it will cost so much more later that it would be poor business
if you could afford it.
Your wife is now assured of at least $26,500 on your death even
if you should die tomorrow. That means that, if that money is
safely invested, she will be getting what she did when she was
first married, and perhaps in addition a small pension. She is
thus assured of a livable income for herself and her children.
Your premiums are not over 10 per cent of your salary, and you
are young enough to have your insurance cost almost as little as
insurance can cost anyone. (It is of interest to note that your
insurance is costing less per year than the upkeep of even a very
cheap automobile.)
Now, if by logical reasoning we have arrived at the absolute
minimum estate that you should leave your widow, we should by
similar processes of reasoning be able to determine what the
reasonable minimum is if you are to play fair with her.
You are practically certain of promotion to lieutenant com-
mander, though you may be a long time getting there. You are


  p. 2333 (#1297)                      

1925]
2333
Are You Worth It?
reasonably sure of promotion to commander, but you are far
from certain of promotion beyond that point. If after twenty-
eight years of service you retire at fifty as a commander, you will
receive as your retired pay $3,550 a year. Provided that you have
taken out no additional protection since you were a junior lieu-
tenant you will be paying premiums of about $390 a year on
$25,000 of insurance. (Your Navy Mutual Aid has gone up
about $50 in the last twenty years.) Your wife will receive as
her share of your pay about $2,400 a year. If, on the other hand,
as you go through the grades of lieutenant, lieutenant commander,
and commander you take out additional insurance up to 10 per
cent of your income, you will be carrying around $39,000 and pay-
ing as premiums about $680. Your wife will get $2,100 as con-
trasted to $2,400 a year, and her income after your death will
exceed her income while you are alive. Clearly our figure lies be-
tween $25,000 and $39,000.
A half hour's calculating will show that if you carry $36,300,
taken out as you were promoted, you will be paying $617 in pre-
miums and after you retire your wife will receive close to $2,180
whether you live or die. The premiums are perhaps a little high
for your retired pay. But then no one expects you to sit around
and twiddle your fingers just because you are fifty. You can
certainly earn enough to pay your insurance premiums.
Logically, then, $36,000 is the reasonable minimum insurance
that you should carry. The first $25,000 is taken out within three
years of graduation whether you intend to get married or not.
(For, as to that, you never can tell when you may get married.)
The last $11,000 is taken out at a rate that never exceeds 10 per
cent of your pay as you rise in the naval hierarchy. There may
be circumstances that may cause you to decide that you can afford
not to carry all of the $36,000, but the circumstances will be rare
indeed that will justify you in deciding that you cannot afford to
carry it all.
Now how much are you worth to your wife? Are you worth
a lot alive and nothing or next to nothing dead? Or the next
time that your wife, in an unjustifiable burst of ire, tells you
just how worthless you are, can you look her square in the eye
and tell yourself that she is all wrong; that you are not worthless ;
not by a long shot; no, and never will be, least of all when you
are dead?


  p. 2334 (#1298)                      

DISCUSSION
Possible Improvements in Our Gunnery Training
(See page 1696, September, 1925, PROCEEDINGS)
COMMANDER H. K. Hewitt, U. S. Navy.—The suggestions made by
Lieutenant Commander Blandy in his article “Possible Improvements in our
Gunnery Training" may be summarized as follows:
1) The elimination of the present Short Range Battle Practice from the
gunnery program of active units.
2) The establishment of a gunnery school for the purpose of elementary
gunnery training.
3) The establishment of a two year cycle in the gunnery training of
the fleet.
4) A change in the system of awarding prize money.
5) A change in the method of computing gunnery merit, and
6) A revision of target sizes.
The first two of these suggestions are inter-related, since Lieutenant
Commander Blandy himself admits that some form of elementary practice
should be fired every year, if there be no gunnery school of the type he
proposes. It seems logical, therefore, to discuss first the desirability of the
gunnery school.
The Gunnery School.—The proposal of a gunnery school is not al-
together new, but has usually taken the form of an advanced school for
officers, and leading ratings, rather than an elementary school through which
all recruits must be passed. The gunnery school of the British Navy is a
school for gunnery specialists, officer and enlisted, who have already had
fleet experience, and have demonstrated their aptitude.
Any school requires both student and instructor personnel, and a certain
amount of material. In our case these would have to be furnished at the
expense of the fleet. Since one or more gunnery training vessels would be
required, and since the complements of active fleet units are already at a
minimum consistent with proper upkeep and training, the establishment of
a gunnery school large enough to train all deck force recruits would result
in a considerable reduction in the number of vessels operating with the
fleet. The advisability of such a procedure is seriously open to dispute.
There is no question but that all gunnery officers would welcome, with
open arms, recruits who were graduates of Lieutenant Commander Blandy's
school. But they should consider also that the available period of service
of these men on board ship will have been shortened by the time spent at
the school, and that reducing the average time of a man on board increases


  p. 2335 (#1299)                      

1925)
Discussion
2335
the annual turnover of gun stations. Our short enlistment is a great handi-
cap in this respect.
Lieutenant Commander Blandy states: “The elementary training received
at the gunnery school would be standardized, and since the officer and petty
officer instructors, through constant practice, would become expert in their
work and the instruction given would be uniformly excellent." It is diffi-
cult to see how elementary gunnery training can be made more standard
than it now is, nor how officer and petty officer instructors can have much
more constant practice than at present. As to uniformity, the instructor
personnel of the school would be subject to the same changes as are general
throughout the service. It is believed that the elementary training of re-
cruits on board ship, under the present system, is more thorough than it
could be under the proposed system. In the former case, crews are made
up of a large percentage of trained men; in the latter, at the gunnery
school, they would be composed almost entirely of green men. The atten-
tion that can be devoted to the individual recruit is manifestly greater when
he receives his training on board a regular vessel of the fleet.
It is therefore believed that recruits should be sent to the fleet as soon as
they have learned the rudiments of naval discipline, and that their training
in gunnery, as well as in other important branches, should be carried out on
active units. A gunnery school, if established, should be devoted to the
advanced gunnery training of officers, and of special enlisted ratings.
Short Range Battle Practice. If there be no elementary gunnery school,
it is agreed that some form of elementary practice must be held each year.
It is an axiomatic principle of training, that individuals must be trained as
members of a small group before that group can become an efficient unit
of a larger group.
The form which the elementary practice should take is open to consider-
able discussion. The present Short Range Battle Practice is a development
of many years, when “pointer fire” was the only system used. Now, "pointer
fire" is only an auxiliary system for directing guns. In fact, it is some-
what doubtful whether "pointer fire," as the term is generally understood,
would ever be used except for broadside and anti-aircraft guns. It is
probable that turrets using individual control, particularly if reduced to
storage battery power, would fire director fashion.
The short range battle practice, in its present form, accomplishes the
following:
1. It trains individual gun crews, and tests materials, for short (but not
for long) bursts of fire.
2. It trains members of the pointer group in an auxiliary system of
directing the battery.
3. It eliminates those men who are temperamentally unfitted for im-
portant gun stations.
4. By intense competition between individual units of the battery, it
arouses great interest in gunnery on the part of the enlisted personnel.
The present practice fails in that it:
1. Does not train gun layers and director pointers in the primary system
of gun direction.


  p. 2336 (#1300)                      

2336
(Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
2. Gives no training, or at least, no normal training, to the fire control
party.
3. Does not train guns' crews for a sufficiently sustained period of fire.
Short range battle practice was eliminated several years ago. Immedi-
ately afterward, the fleet showed a lowered gunnery efficiency. This may,
or may not, have been a coincidence, but the immediate result was a return
to the old form of practice on the following gunnery year. Three years
ago a modified practice was fired by battleships, which consisted of a fairly
long uninterrupted string, half of which was fired by director, and half
by pointer fire. As a matter of training, my personal experience was that
this practice was far superior to the present practice. It trained director
pointers, gun layers, and gun pointers. It exercised the loading crews in
a reasonably extended burst of fire, and permitted the fire control party to
function almost normally. It was unsatisfactory in that (1) the short
range introduced many artificialities in procedure to care for extraordinary
parallax in the director system, and (2) the method of determination of
hits by camera was most inaccurate, and very slow, causing loss of interest
and extreme dissatisfaction on the part of the personnel. The criticism of
the practice was so severe, that on the following year, another return was
made to the original practice.
It is my opinion that some form of elementary practice is absolutely
necessary each year, unless our whole personnel system is changed.
One criticism is that too much time is given to the preparation for short
range battle practice. This happens to be the case because the practice is
usually fired in the fall, and the whole summer is available for training.
Ships, naturally perhaps, concentrate on the first practice to be fired, and
do not look beyond to those which are to follow. This is really a short-
sighted policy. The summer training period should be devoted to general
instruction and training, and only one or two weeks to special preparation
for short range battle practice. The reduction made by the Department in
the weight of this practice should help to remedy this condition. The evo-
lution of a less artificial practice would most certainly do so.
The Two-Year Gunnery Cycle. It is not believed that ships carry out
too many practices in one year. Ships may take too much time in “practice
runs,” rehearsing the special procedure for a given practice, but they do
not do too much firing. General gunnery training may, and should, be
carried on contemporaneously with tactical and strategical exercises, and
other activities. A two-year cycle, without material reduction in the number
of practices per year, would provide opportunity for advanced gunnery
training of all units, and would result in a great increase of efficiency, were
the personnel sufficiently stable to carry over the lessons and experience
of one year to the more advanced problems of the next. It is officer
personnel which is mainly concerned with advanced gunnery, and it is
officer personnel which suffers the greatest turnover, an average of more
than 33} per cent. For this reason the two-year cycle, even with one ele-
mentary practice each year, appears inadvisable.


  p. 2337 (#1301)                      

1925)
2337
Discussion
Prize Money.—The purpose of prize money is to stimulate competition
and to reward individual excellence. The smaller the group considered as
a unit for the award of a prize, the greater is the incentive, and the greater
the justice to the individual, for each contributes a proportionately larger
share toward the final result. Conversely, the larger the group, the greater
the number of inefficient individuals who might be carried to success by
association with more efficient mates. As an example, it might be the case,
and, in fact, has happened, that the battleship standing one in long range
battle practice had the poorest secondary battery score. Why should the
secondary battery crews receive a money reward just because the main bat-
tery happens to be very efficient?
The healthy competition between battery units, stimulated by the promise
of prompt reward, makes for a ship spirit which produces results for the
ship as a whole. It is believed that prize money should remain the reward
for small groups, while trophies and pennants remain the reward of the
ship.
It should be noted that prizes for fire control parties are no longer paid
as a result of short range battle practice, where the fire control party has no
primary function, but are paid as a result of long range practice. Further-
more, the secondary battery fire control party is made separate and distinct
from that of the main battery.
Computation of Merit.—Lieutenant Commander Blandy suggests a change
from the present "graded merit" system to a "standard score" system.
Briefly, the present system adopts the score of the high ship in each prac-
tice as the standard for that practice, and grades the others accordingly.
In the proposed system, the Department would set an arbitrary standard,
on which the merits for each practice would be based.
Theoretically, the standard score system would be ideal, could the score
which should be made by the “perfect" ship be accurately determined. Prac-
tically, this is not possible. Practices are modified from year to year, and
new practices are introduced. Improved methods produce higher scores.
There is never any way to evaluate accurately what this improvement may
be. Ships have been known to make merits of 200 to 300 on the basis of
standard scores which were thought, before the practice, to be high. Had
the standard score system been in use, these ships would have had points for
these practices two or three times the weight assigned the practice. Mani-
festly this would be most undesirable, and unfair to vessels who did well
in practices that were of more importance.
Lieutenant Commander Blandy argues that a particularly high perform-
ance by some ship reduces the value of scores made by other vessels, and
that this, in effect, actually reduces, for them, the weight of the practice.
This statement is true, but it should be borne in mind that, in theory at
least, the high score is a mark attainable by all, and vessels should be graded
accordingly. Under the present system it is not possible for any ship to re-
ceive a greater number of points for a practice than the relative importance
of that practice warrants.
Apparently, the principal fault found with the graded merit system is
that, in the absence of knowledge as to high scores, it is not possible for


  p. 2338 (#1302)                      

2338
(Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
two ships to determine their relative standings accurately. This objection
is now eliminated, as far as it seems possible to do so, by the Department's
policy of prompt publication of high scores to all vessels concerned.
Target Sizes.—Lieutenant Commander Blandy says that the targets used
should have approximately the same size as the objectives in battle. There
can be no argument on this point. However, material targets as large as an
actual objective are, in most cases, impracticable. It becomes necessary,
therefore, to use constructive targets, which is done insofar as camera
facilities permit. It is manifestly not possible to obtain accurate observation
of fall of shot at night, and the amount of camera work necessary to record
the fall of shot for the daylight practices of all vessels is prohibitive. Where
triangulation cameras can not be employed, the use of material targets
becomes necessary. For these, our battle rafts are used to represent prob-
able objectives, as clearly as possible, considering their size limitations.
The criticism which is directed at the size of the destroyer target is
understood to apply only to the targets which are used for a certain division
practice. These targets, owing to conditions imposed by the practice, were
designed to present approximately the same target area when viewed from
any bearing. In size they are not comparable to probable objectives, unless
the presentation be end on, a situation which is possible, but which would be
most difficult to handle.
Possible Improvements in Our Gunnery Training
(See page 1696, September, 1925, PROCEEDINGS)
LIEUTENANT COMMANDER T. M. SHOCK, U. S. N.—The interesting points
brought out by Lieutenant Commander Blandy in this article are particu-
larly apt and well taken, in these days of strenuous gunnery work. How-
ever, to me, the great defect of our gunnery training system lies in the
fact that it lacks continuity, to a certain extent, and it is not sufficiently
progressive. One year's work does not advance to another year's work.
Each year, in the battleships, after the college work of gunnery, the advance
and long range practices, we needs must return in the fall to the kinder-
garten, the short range battle practice. This is undoubtedly due to the
large annual shift of personnel. It is possible to dispense with short range
battle practice, with a few modifications of the yearly schedule.
Of course, the best remedy for the present congestion would be the adop-
tion of the two-year gunnery cycle. Barring this radical change, the short
range battle practice could be abandoned. In addition to the reasons enumer-
ated in the article, this form of practice is highly artificial, and is productive
of bad gunnery habits and ideas. It is mainly apt to cause a neglect of
the director and plotting room crews during the period of training for
short range battle practice.
As a substitute for this practice, for the qualification of pointers and
their training, Lieutenant Commander Blandy proposes a Naval Gunnery
School, separate from the fleet. It is doubtful, however, if the formation of
such a school, separate from the fleet, is entirely practicable in these days
of large personnel turnovers. It is not thought that the fleet could stand


  p. 2339 (#1303)                      

1925]
2339
Discussion
the segregation of large quantities of men for such special training. Since
short range battle practice is for the sole purpose of training and qualifying
gun pointers and gun captains, the abolition of this practice would necessi-
tate the substitution of some other means of training and qualifications. A
satisfactory qualification could be obtained by examination and observation
of individuals during the practices of the gunnery year. The yearly re-
qualification of pointers and gun captains should not be necessary. Can we
not safely assume that “once qualified always qualified" is a safe principle
to adopt, as long as the qualified man is serving satisfactorily in the capacity
for which qualified ? Unsatisfactory work would terminate the qualification
by the removal of the individual from the gun at which serving. Thus the
situation is always in the hands of the gunnery or division officer. The
qualification partakes of the nature of a “rate.”
The prize money, now given at short range battle practice, as suggested
by Lieutenant Commander Blandy, would be well expended at the more
advanced practices during the year, without sacrificing the keen competition
and interest that goes with the “money" practice of the year. The awarding
of prize money to battleship and fire control parties at the real big "show"
of the year is a big step in this direction.
The congestion of the schedule could be a bit relieved by continuing active
gunnery work through the summer months. Of course this would cause
howls of protest from the first lieutenant, the chief engineer, and others
too numerous to mention, but it would give us all a more leisurely gunnery
year, which cannot help but be productive of increased efficiency and con-
tentment. Is it an unalterable law of nature that guns must be fired "in
the spring and in the fall”? In the San Diego-San Pedro area much time
is wasted each year, especially in the spring, due to poor visibility. The
gunnery schedule is so finely timed that any delay, due to low visibility,
causes considerable trouble and confusion. The summer, from all reports,
is ideal for gunnery purposes in this vicinity, especially as to visibility.
I have wandered a little from the main subject of Lieutenant Commander
Blandy's article, but it is my earnest opinion that anything done to ease the
present day schedule, whether it is the elimination of unnecessary practices
or the use of other seasons for gunnery, will produce greater efficiency and
contentment.
A Mooring Board Problem
(See page 1716, September, 1925, PROCEEDINGS)
LIEUTENANT COMMANDER GEORGE E. BRANDT, U. S. Navy.—Good. A
troublesome problem greatly simplified. Lieutenant Commander Gatch has
done a real service in placing this where we can find it in that hour of need.
A few bits of navigational wrinkles like this would be very helpful if
printed in the back of the gunnery instructions.
It seems to me that the actual mooring board work can be even further
simplified by omitting that portion of the drawing about the point O. That
is, instead of drawing OD why not draw Bm to represent the course and
speed of the target. Then draw ME, to represent own ship's course and
speed. Draw BE, and on BE, lay off BE equal to 4,000 yards.


  p. 2340 (#1304)                      


THE CURTISS ARMY RACER, WHICH WON THE PULITZER RACE, AND LIEUTENANT Brrris, U'. S. ARMY, THE PILOT. A NEW
WORLD'S RECORD OF 248 075 Muks PER HOUR WAS ESTABLISHIFT)


  p. 2341 (#1305)                      

PROFESSIONAL NOTES
PREPARED BY
LIEUTENANT COMMANDER H. W. UNDERWOOD, U. S. Navy
FROM SEPTEMBER 3 TO OCTOBER 3
PS
............................................
2342
2356
The New Bress and Par
e........
GENERAL ARRANGEMENT
SOME BRITISH VIEWS ON DIRIGIBLES AND FUTURE CONSTRUCTION OF
SURFACE SHIPS ......
FRANCE
The French Naval Renaissance.....
..... 2352
French Destroyer Trials.....
2354
French Light Cruisers and Flotilla Leaders ......
2355
GREAT BRITAIN
Navy Progress and Pacts......
The New Battleships .........
2357
The British Navy's Needs and the Mosul Issue..
2360
The Airship Controversy.........
2361
JAPAN
A Peace Protest from Tokyo.......
2362
America, Let's Reason Together.....
2365
UNITED STATES
Ships Building.
2370
The Air Board Personnel...
2370
The Mitchell Plan.........
2372
The Aeronautical Crisis. ......
2377
AVIATION
The Pulitzer Races...
2379
The Progress of Civil Aviation (British)..
2382
Anti-Aircraft Defense ...
2383
ENGINEERING
The Wing Rotor ......
2390
The Position of British Marine Engineering ......
........2391
Thornycroft Shallow-Draught Ships for China
2394
The Stability of Ships.......
2396
MERCHANT MARINE
The Shipping Board and Admiral Palmer .........
2397
The Shipping Board Controversy....
MISCELLANEOUS
The Trade and Industry of Persia...
2401
Amphibian Operations
2403
A New Industry.........
2405
CURRENT NAVAL AND PROFESSIONAL PAPERS..
2406
.......................
...............................
2400


  p. 2342 (#1306)                      

2342
Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
SOME BRITISH VIEWS ON AIRSHIPS AND FUTURE NAVAL
CONSTRUCTION
Editor's Note: Although the following may not disclose anything new
on the subject matter which has occupied the front pages of the press the
past few months, it may be of interest to our members to know some
British viewpoints. In addition to the following the reader is advised to
refer to pages 1756-1758, Professional Notes of the September, 1925, PRO-
CEEDINGS of the Institute, and to the article in the Saturday Evening Post
for October 24, 1925. See also "Secretary's Notes," this issue.
The following correspondence sent to the Editor by Admiral Sir W. H.
Henderson, (Retired) Royal Navy, is printed with his permission.
Sept. 4, 1925
Following up my letter to you enclosing an article on "Airships," pub-
lished in the Evening Standard, I am sending cuttings of some correspond-
ence that has taken place in the Morning Post between its naval corre-
spondent and me.
By an extraordinary coincidence my last letter was published in yester-
day's issue, the day of the loss of the Shenandoah, which I regretted very
much to hear of, especially accompanied as it was by the loss of so many
good lives. Pray accept this, my expression of sympathy.
I feel sure I am on the right track on this question of airships and that
soon it will be realized in the United States that they are fair weather craft
only, and, as such, may be used in some selected positions for reconnaissance
work, but that for commercial purposes they will never be a paying propo-
sition or to be depended upon.
Please make any use of the cuttings you like.
Are Airships Futile?
Need for Charting the Upper Air; The New Navigation, Morning Post,
22 June, 1925.-Two of the sailor's greatest assets in navigating from port
to port are his compass and his charts. The first gives him a sense of
direction when there is nothing else to guide him, while the latter show him
not only the depth of the water, the configuration of the land, and rocks,
shoals, or other dangers, but also there are special charts indicating the
prevailing winds, ocean currents, and tidal streams.
The use of these navigational appliances has become second nature to the
mariner; he steers by his compass in mid-ocean with the same confidence
that a man walks a well-known track in the dark; he reads his chart as the
motorist consults his road map, but with this difference: the motorist wheels
his way on solid earth, the seaman has to be ever on the alert for being
set out of his course by winds and currents.
As an old seaman, it has occurred to Admiral Sir William Henderson
that the airship is likely to find itself in a sorry plight because it may
encounter wind currents of 100 miles an hour against which, even with a
speed of 70 m.p.h., it could make no headway at all.
Writing in an evening contemporary he has elaborated this argument and
other disabilities which he maintains are inherent in the lighter-than-air
craft. He arrives at the conclusion that the airship "disregards the first
principles of transport, which are that a ship .... must have a power of
motion of its own greatly in excess of the medium in or on which it moves."
From this he argues that airships can never be more than fine weather craft
and that the country is wasting money in producing them.
This is a serious charge, for airships are costly things, and we cannot
afford "fair weather" luxuries which cannot pay their way in peace, and
would have very limited value in war. The revival of a government policy
to build airships has been largely due to the fact that the Admiralty has


  p. 2343 (#1307)                      

1925)
2343
Professional Notes
strongly emphasized their potential uses for commerce protection in war.
If airships are to be used by the navy they must be able to operate under
far more arduous conditions than those to be encountered on a set route in
favorable weather.
If there is no answer to Admiral Henderson's arguments, the future of
these aircraft would indeed seem gloomy, but he appears to have viewed
everything from the plane of the ocean's surface. He, doubtless, has in
mind the monsoons, hurricanes, gales, and storms which prevail in various
parts of the world according to the times and seasons. Moreover, he
stresses the fact that whereas the ship of the sea can generally find a
natural shelter, the airship is at the mercy of the elements until once more
safely housed in its shed.
It is natural that these influences should present themselves to the
seaman as formidable objections to this new means of transport, and no
one will appreciate better than he the need for investigating this problem
fully before being unduly optimistic about the future of airships. Unless,
however, "seasense" and "airsense" are combined, the one is liable to lack
imagination and the other experience in reviewing this matter.
If airships are to navigate safely it is essential that the upper air should
be charted in the same way that sea currents and surface winds have been.
It is impossible to exaggerate the importance of this work. When we
know with reasonable accuracy the prevailing winds and air currents at each
successive strata of the world's atmosphere from 1,000 to 30,000 feet, air-
ships may be able to navigate with the same degree of security as ships of
the sea.
At 5,000 feet there may be a raging gale against which an airship would
battle in vain; at 10,000 there may be a flat calm, and at 15,000 a favorable
breeze. In fact, airship routes, out and home to the Far East, may become
established at regular altitudes corresponding with the season of the year,
just as sailing ships and, to a less degree, steamships vary the latitude of
certain of their routes.
The Meteorological Department, which is coordinated at the Air Ministry,
is known to be investigating this big problem, but the means at present at its
disposal would seem to be quite inadequate.
The subject is an international one, for it affects all civil aviation, and it
is essentially one in which the navy should assist, and in which the aid of
the mercantile marine should be enlisted. Observations of the upper air are
taken to a great extent by releasing small free balloons and observing their
behavior. Here again the seaman with his aptitude for using a sextant
must prove invaluable. The navy is vitally interested in the future of air-
ships. It is therefore to be hoped that the Admiralty will take an active
hand in charting the upper air.
For the rest one cannot but think that Admiral Henderson is unduly
pessimistic. In arriving at his conclusions he recalls many of the misfortunes
which have occurred to airships, but makes no allusion to their achievements.
The United States Naval airship Shenandoah has been out in fair weather
and foul for well over a year now. During that time it crossed the Rockies
in a gale, sailed down the Pacific coast, and returned in safety to its base
on the Atlantic side.
Our own R-34 crossed and recrossed the Atlantic safely, and R-33 made
a notable trip across the North Sea and continent. The Atlantic has more
lately been crossed by ZR-3, now the Los Angeles. These are not the
achievements of fragile craft incapable of facing the elements. Little air-
ships were out constantly in bad weather patrolling the coast during the war.
The airships now building, which Admiral Henderson regards as "un-
wieldy monsters," but mark the logical progress of events. The giant
liners of today would have seemed "unwieldly monsters" to Columbus, yet
they are the outcome of the brave endeavors of those who set forth, fear-


  p. 2344 (#1308)                      

2344
(Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
ing neither winds, currents, nor uncharted seas, and with no certainty of
finding shelter.
In the same spirit pioneers of this new means of transport will launch
their craft into the blue, but, today, science makes it possible to investigate
in advance the obstacles and perils which await them, and to provide resting
places in the form of mooring masts, so situated that an airship can always
run for safety, as a ship makes for harbor.
The seaman has done battle with the elements for countless generations;
to him should be entrusted all that appertains to this new navigation.
Airship Problems
Difficulties of Navigation, Morning Post, 8 August, 1925.—To the Editor
of The Morning Post.—Sir:-Your Naval Correspondent in your issue of
June 22 makes the grave and inevitable admission that if an airship has
not a speed comparable to, or even greater than, the current in which she
happens to be immersed, and if she cannot extricate herself from this cur.
rnt by rising to a higher and possibly safer region, then air navigation by
an airship is difficult if not impossible.
To escape from this dilemma he asserts that "it is essential that the upper
air should be charted in the same way that sea currents and surface winds
have been." Sea currents, which are subject to little variation, are well
known and accurately charted. The prevailing winds, however, except in
the tropical regions of the trades and monsoons, which vary within con-
siderable limits and are subject to dislocation by hurricanes, cyclones, and
typhoons, are only given as an average of an enormous number of direct
observations, extending over a long period of time. They vary daily and
even hourly, both in speed and direction, and can only be used as possible
approximations. It would be impossible to obtain even such approxima-
tions by any known means of observation in the upper currents of the
atmosphere.
The lifting power of an airship depends upon the buoyancy of her gas
bags. This lifting power is dependent on the pressure of the atmosphere in
which the ship is immersed, and taking the extreme height mentioned by
your correspondent of 30,000 feet as an example, where the mean tempera-
ture is 50°, and no human being can exist, the pressure is less than one
third of that at the surface of the earth, and her lifting power would be
inadequate to support her own weight, it being assumed that gas has been
released to reduce the internal pressure to that of the surrounding atmos-
phere. If gas is retained the lift is still further reduced, and the gas bags
may burst.
Whatever the height at which the ship is navigated these relative condi-
tions hold good; gas, which is a valuable and expensive commodity, has
often to be released, and must be replaced as soon as possible for naviga-
tion in the lower regions, therefore, filling stations must be available.
As a matter of fact, an airship is totally incapable of rising to the heights
mentioned. The maximum possible rise of one, assuming that the weight of
her hull, machinery, and other items is only two thirds of her total lift, is
under 10,000 feet. This disregards the dynamical lift of her rudders, against
which has to be set a safe margin to be allowed for increase of weight
caused by such ordinary contingencies as a fall of snow, a shower of rain,
a heavy fall of dew, on her enormous surface. A normal fall of the
barometer, even, affects these conditions, so the height to which an airship
can attain carrying a full cargo is relatively small.
When the limitations of "lift" of an airship are understood, it will be
realized that the proposed establishment of a "network of ship stations in
the Atlantic for daily attacks on the atmosphere with pilot balloons, kites,
registering balloons, and aeroplanes" and "the investigation of the whole


  p. 2345 (#1309)                      

1925]
2345
Professional Notes
region of the atmosphere up to 30,000 feet,” would be futile, and an un-
warrantable waste of money, for in view of the impossibility of an airship
ever reaching more than a fraction of these heights, the precise value of
these expensive investigations from an airship point of view appears to be
nil. A chart of the upper air would be out of date in a short time, whereas
one of the sea holds good for centuries.
The “logical progress" of events is referred to. The history of our air
fleet cannot be regarded as logical or in any way analogous to the gradual
and continuous development of primitive seagoing craft to great ocean
liners. Our present air fleet, R-33, R-36, R-37, R-80, L-64, and L-75, have
all been in their hangars since 1921, except for the brief and checkered
career of R-33 in April last.
After this period of inertia arising presumably from incapacity for use-
ful employment, two gigantic airships with correspondingly large and ex-
pensive paraphernalia are in process of construction, notwithstanding the
fact that these ships are in every respect subject to the like conditions of
current, to the same inability to rise to the heights which your correspond-
ent has himself stated to be essential, and liable to the identical dangers
which have ended the careers of most airships since 1910.-Yours,
W. H. HENDERSON, Admiral (Retired)
3 Onslow Houses, S.W. 7.
Airships of the Future
Increased Interest; Commercial and War Requirements, Morning Post,
15 August, 1925. (By Our Naval Correspondent.)—The continued success
of the United States' naval airships, and the progress being made on the
designs of our new big lighter-than-air craft are leading to increased atten-
tion being paid in both countries to the future of airships, both for commer-
cial purposes and as units of the fleet.
Admiral Sir William Henderson, in his letter published in the Morning
Post of August ii, returns to his attack on the policy of building airships
which he started in a contemporary a couple of months ago. Referring to
an article of mine on the subject, which appeared in these pages on June
22, he entirely misconstrues my meaning when he says I make "the grave
and inevitable admission that if an airship has not a speed comparable
to .... the current in which she happens to be immersed, or if she cannot
extricate herself .... by rising to a .... safer region then airship naviga-
tion is difficult if not impossible.” This is the basis of his own contention
that in building airships we are wasting money. I do not agree that it is
necessary for an airship to have a speed comparable to any current in which
she may find herself, and his deductions as to lifting powers are misleading.
In the article referred to I was reviewing the future of airships largely
from the point of view of their utility to the navy, and I pointed out that
for such a purpose they would have to operate under far more arduous
conditions than those appertaining to a set route in favorable weather
The ideal naval airship should be able to remain several weeks in the
air in any part of the world where ships are wont to sail the seas, and to
maintain her station in any weather. This may be asking too much of such
craft, and is certainly beyond their capabilities at present, but it is quite
possible that in time we shall see war airships and commercial airships
as distinct in design as men-of-war and merchant ships of today.
At present it certainly will not pay to run commercial airships capable
of ascending to heights of 15,000 or 20,000 feet. Commercial work will
doubtless be done at well under 10,000 feet.
Commercial airships will be able to select their routes according to sea-
sons and prevailing winds. The fact that they can shape course over the
land or over the sea gives them a far wider choice of routes, especially to


  p. 2346 (#1310)                      

2346
(Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
the East, than a ship has; moreover, and this is a vital matter which I
think Admiral Henderson has overlooked, their high speed will enable them
to run rapidly out of the path of a local gale or storm.
As to the general endurance of airships, this has steadily improved, and
the Shenandoah and Los Angeles have already given proof that they are
not merely fair weather craft. In the war, airships were in their babyhood,
but even so, they were stouter infants than many people realize.
Airship Problems
Some Elementary Facts, Morning Post, 3 September, 1925.—To the Editor
of The Morning Post.-Sir:-The article of your Naval Correspondent
in your issue of the fifteenth ultimo deals much in generalities, which can-
not be replied to except by a simple exposition of elementary facts for
which I could not ask space.
No improvements of design or expenditure on research can alter the laws
under which airships have to exist, relating to the currents of the air, the
lifting power of lighter than air gases, which can easily be worked out by
referring to the tables giving the density of the air at various heights, the
danger from lightning, and at mooring masts from gales, which are in-
creased by increase of size; the difficulty of maintaining their trim while
moored, and their extreme vulnerability. No airship can be made to rise
to higher regions except by reducing her own weight, which can only be
done by valving gas, discharging fuel, cargo, or ballast which may have
been taken on board in substitution of either. The difficulties of manipula.
tion have been illustrated over and over again by the history of every air-
ship that has existed, and especially so by a critical examination of the per-
formances of the Shenandoah, R-34, and the Los Angeles, which you could
not give me space to collate from the available material.
Size does not overcome nature's laws, but merely accentuates the diffi-
culties; its great disability is decrease in handiness and security. There
will be great difficulty in mooring these monsters in strong winds, and in
gales they will not be able to remain at their mooring masts.
Your correspondent states that "their high speed will enable them to run
rapidly out of the path of a local gale or storm." In some cases possibly,
yes, but I take the following from the China Sea Pilot, Vol. III, which is
authoritative:
“The area covered by typhoons is very variable, some are quite small,
twenty to thirty miles across, while others extend over a region of hundreds
of miles in diameter. The mean diameter of the dangerous part-this it
must be remembered is wind to ships, but currents to aircraft-of a typhoon
may be taken as 100 to 200 miles. With increasing north latitude typhoons
tend to increase in size and diminish in intensity. The rate of progress of
the center of the typhoon varies from five to forty miles an hour, the speed
of the wind often reaches 26 to 31 m.p.h. at 500 miles from the center, in-
creasing to as much as 75 m.p.h. at thirty miles from the center."
The above is a correct description of all revolving storms.
Your correspondent quotes from an article in the current number of the
R.U.S.I. Journal. To be of any value the number of casualties and fatalities
should be shown as a percentage of the numbers of the personnel who flew
those miles, not of miles flown. A dispassionate examination of the work
done by these small craft would now show it was wasted effort.-Yours,
W. H. HENDERSON, Admiral (Retired)
September 2.
October 10, 1925
Thank you for inserting my short article on airships in your September
number. I sent you while I was away my correspondence in the Morning


  p. 2347 (#1311)                      

1925]
2347
Professional Notes
Post on the same subject. I much regretted the loss of life entailed by the
loss of the Shenandoah, but so far as one can at present judge, her loss
supports all the conclusions which I have advanced against the practica-
bility of airships from a constructional, navigational, transport, and financial
point of view. They are fair weather craft, and their disposable lift, when
all stresses are provided for, will be exceedingly small.
I hear a small book is coming out before long which will give a history
of all the American and British airships built since 1918, and thoroughly
shows up their disabilities. If it is printed I will send you a copy. It is
just as well the public of both countries should know the facts concerning
them.
I see you have also reprinted an article from the Army, Navy and Air
Force Gazette, which in its concluding paragraph sums up opinions that
have been expressed by me over a good many years, and which are strongly
emphasized by existing conditions.
I see that one of my letters on the 2,000-ton cruisers was in The Times
of November 25, 1921.
I am enclosing a cutting from the Naval and Military Record of June 24
which gives some later views; but I think you must take in the Naval and
Military Record and will have seen, also, Sir Herbert Russell's articles
on the same subject. I enclose a cutting of one of them. Others were
"Problems of Economy," September 16, and “The New Battleships," Sep-
tember 23. I consider Sir Herbert Russell by far the most advanced and
liberal minded of our naval journalists.
Commenting on the launching of the Nelson, both the Times and the
Daily Telegraph stated that she and the Rodney would probably be the last
big ships ever built. Opinion against these unnecessary and costly monsters
-monstrosities really-is growing over here; and it only wants comprehen-
sion and united action with the United States to bring matters down to more
simple conditions and save the waste of enormous sums of money.
I am a strong advocate for simplicity generally, and of function, in par-
ticular. The complexity of a 35,000-tonner is such that every function with
which she is endowed impairs her fighting value as a gun armament vessel
which is her primary, and with its necessary concomitant, her only func-
tion. In the same way a cruiser is a gunship only, torpedoes are no use to
her for attempting to fight battleships or new cruisers. She requires guns
to fight her kind and to resist destroyer attacks, while the destroyer's
primary function is torpedoes for attack of battleships and cruisers, but
she also must have guns for fighting her own kind.
I deprecate an airplane's being carried by any fighting ship. The ship
cannot be made subservient to her planes, which she is; directly they go
off her, functions must not be interfered with, and a sporting chance must
be given to the crew of the planes for their lives.
You are, of course, quite at liberty to make use of any of my ideas.
Sincerely yours,
W. H. HENDERSON
Editor's NOTE.—See "Secretary's Notes” this issue; also pp. 2356-2359
this issue.
Capital Ship Problems
Admiral Sir W. H. Henderson's Views, The Naval and Military Record,
24 June, 1925.—To the Editor of The Naval and Military Record.—Sir:
In your issue of June 10 Sir Herbert Russell propounds and answers the
question, "Will the Battleship Pass?"
With his conclusion I have for long been in agreement, and stated in the
press during the Scott controversy that a 10,000-ton cruiser could perform


  p. 2348 (#1312)                      

2348
(Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
all the functions of a battleship, provided there was an international agree-
ment that ships should not be built of greater size.
I can only hope to supplement the able reasoning by which Sir Herbert
has, I think, proved his query. I have always thought Admiral Sir Percy
Scott would have carried his case against the battleship had he only been
then able to take wider grounds. His conceptions did not go beyond the
dreadnoughts of 1914-18, built to compete with German dreadnoughts, all of
which were constructed for use in the narrow scas of Europe, with the con-
comitant weapons then brought into use.
He was naturally taken up by the advocates of the battleship, who saw
no further than he did, and who knew the naval architects said a duplica-
tion of size was possible, and that there were still available weights that
could be made use of protectively against the mine and torpedo. It was the
old battle of guns v. armor over again, and would have like results.
If it had not been for the Washington Conference we should have had
ships of 50,000 tons and over, for competition would have been open and
universal. The Conference at least limited size and the caliber of guns,
although even the signatories did not have their eyes opened to the new
strategical conditions which were the result of the war, or they would
still further have reduced the size and simplified the conditions of the agreed
capital ships.
The naval lesson of the war is that the construction and composition of
the fleets of 1914-18 was such that they could only be used in narrow
waters; that many bases of every kind were essential to them.
The powers of resistance of the new ships "have immensely increased,"
but this can only be for a period, until the powers of attack have developed
proportionately. Meanwhile, the strategic fields have shifted from the
narrow seas to the oceans, particularly the Pacific Ocean, where there are
no bases except at such distances as prohibit the use of fleets as now con-
stituted. Nothing can be altered so long as the Washington Treaty re-
mains in being. That is till 1936, and even were it abrogated before that,
and competition and rivalry reintroduced, it is impossible to conceive that
bases could be provided or maintained in sufficiency over its vast militarily
unproductive areas.
The corollary to this is that fleets must be constituted to fit the strategic
fields in which they may have to act. This, to take the question of the
battleship only, will need the elimination of the big ship, and necessitate
the use of smaller, simpler, and more mobile craft. The nation that first
takes the lead in building that of 17,500 tons for that of 35,000 tons, as it
is stated the French propose to do, will have the advantage. During the
Scott controversy I publicly stated that a 10,000-ton cruiser could perform
all the functions of a battleship, provided there was agreement that no na-
tion should have ships of greater size; it is a question of agreement only.
There is also another factor. Everything, whether it be organic or in-
oganic, and especially the productions of man, reach in their development
a point of maximum efficiency at which they become stabilized, or are super-
seded by new and more efficient forms, which eventually take their place.
There can be no question but that, judged by this standard, the 35,000-ton
battleship has long passed this point, and that in size, cost, and complexity
she is much too monstrous for the purposes for which she can be usefully
employed.
We have already begun with the 10,000-ton mobile cruiser, and I believe
we are on the verge of a reconstruction of all our ideas concerning the com-
position of fleets.
W. H. HENDERSON, Admiral (Retired)


  p. 2349 (#1313)                      

1925]
Professional Notes
2349
Smaller Fighting Ships
The Reaction from Colossal Displacement, by Sir Herbert Russell, The
Naval and Military Record, 5 August, 1925.—Broadly speaking, there are
at the present day two schools of opinion regarding the value of the capital
ship. There is the school which holds that she has outlived her utility,
and there is the school which believes that she still maintains her traditional
place in the general principles of sea war. But between this broad division
of thought there is a large body of indefinite opinion which, while unpre-
pared to express any conclusion as to the future of the capital ship, would
compromise with the question by greatly reducing her size.
The Washington Conference, of course, took a specific step in this direc-
tion. The original proposal was that no ship-of-the-line laid down sub-
sequently to the signing of the treaty should exceed 30,000 tons displace-
ment. The technical experts, wedded to the idea of progressive develop-
ment, resisted this limit, and the figure was increased to 35,000 tons. At
this time we had in commission the Hood, 41,200 tons; the United States
were building the Saratoga class of battle cruisers of 43,500 tons; and
Japan had in commission the Nagato, of 40,000 tons. But the Hood is un-
questionably the biggest warship ever yet designed or laid down.
The material school was rather dismayed by the Washington limitation:
it was already talking of the 55,000-ton battleship, and the famous Hadfield
firm had built and tested a 20-inch gun which, presumably, it was proposed
that she should mount. On the other hand, the tactical school, which is only
impressed by size and power to the degree in which these conform to sheer
utility, was disappointed with the Washington limitation in that reaction
was not carried nearly far enough. Agreed that the heaviest gun, the
stoutest armor, and the greatest speed should have the best chance of vic-
tory, there still remains Nelson's dictum that "numbers alone can annihilate."
Bigger ships must necessarily mean fewer ships, and the logical issue of
such a policy would ultimately be so few ships as to reduce war to a sort of
duel between champions.
The late Sir William White laid it down that there can be no finality in
warship design, and this is obviously true. But in every product of human
invention there is a point of maximum efficiency beyond which it is im-
possible to go, and at which evolution has to seek a new direction, or else
become stabilized, and consequently cease to be evolution. The sailing ship
reached this point, and was superseded by the steamship. The reciprocat-
ing engine reached this point, and was superseded by the turbine. The
cylindrical boiler reached this point, and was superseded by the water-tube
boiler. It would not be difficult to almost indefinitely extend the list, but
these examples illustrate the truth of this principle.
The tendency in warship design—or at any rate in capital ship design,
which we are now considering—is to develop complexity during progress
toward the maximum point of efficiency. I am not referring to complexity
of detail, which is inevitable to progress, but complexity of purpose. Pri-
marily, every type of warship has a definite offensive function, but the
modern aim seems to be in the direction of rendering her capable of various
performances. The weapon of the battleship is the gun. Why, then, fit her
with torpedo tubes ? Did the Great War produce any evidence that the
battleship could be used for torpedo attack? Simplicity in any given rôle
assuredly gives the highest efficiency of result, and to multiply that rôle by
imposing other purposes upon it is to reduce efficiency by diffusing it, so to
speak. Yet we shall find that the chief factor in the great growth of dis-
placement lies in this multiplication of purpose. The Hood carries the same
main armament as the Queen Elizabeth.. Why, then, should she be 13,000
tons bigger? Because it was decided to enable her to carry out the func-
tions of the cruiser as well as of the ship-of-the-line. If such a combination


  p. 2350 (#1314)                      

2350
(Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
were practicable without involving the violation of other important prin-
ciples, the possible advantages of it would form their own justification. As
it is, we have to consider whether these possible advantages are worth the
price. In order to attempt to answer this let us consider the price.
The first point in this connection, by the natural association of ideas, is
economy. Here on the face of it the big ship appears to score. When
simplicity is departed from, and a great increase in capacity is demanded,
relative saving in cost is effected by size. To build and maintain a 40,000-
ton ship would be more economical than to build and maintain two 20,000-ton
ships, presuming the collective fighting value to be identical in both cases.
It is quite probable that the question of cost was a very prominent factor
in the general conditions of competition which forced the rapid growth in
displacement. But when we come to the heavy collateral expenditure upon
harbor accommodation, dry-docks, and the like involved in this policy, the
purely economic aspect begins to wear quite another aspect. To use a
homely metaphor, the fewer the number of baskets you use the less it will
cost you (for baskets) to distribute your eggs, but if you are presently
obliged to enlarge your shop window in order to display your baskets at
all the saving may easily vanish. The money that has been spent and still
remains to be spent, at Portsmouth, Devonport, and Malta simply as con-
sequence of the growth of battleship dimensions would probably absorb, and
possibly more than absorb, the saving effected by the constructive principle.
But while money is the chief sinew of war we cannot always reckon war
values in terms of money. So we have to consider the question as to
whether the big ship is worth her price in other aspects than the purely
economic one. Assuming that we can mount half the number of heavy
guns, employ armor of equal protective effectiveness, and attain an equal
speed in a ship of 20,000 tons, what is the advantage of the 40,000-ton ship?
She will be a better gun-platform; she can deliver heavier salvoes; and she
will possess a wider sea-keeping radius. It is a debatable point as to whether
these advantages are not rather more apparent than real. In weather con-
ditions under which a 20,000-ton battleship cannot make effective shooting
a vessel of double the displacement is not going to do very much better.
Given efficient fire control, two ships with six guns apiece shooting at an
enemy vessel should be able to do at least as much damage as one ship with
twelve guns, while the risk of suffering crippling damage is practically
halved. Since battleships are designed to operate at no great distance from
a base, and not for sea cruising purposes, the question of radius of action-
of course within reasonable limits-is really not of supreme importance.
To no other sea service is the question of numbers so important as it is
to the British Navy. It is true that battleships do not figure in our over-
seas distributions outside of European waters, but there are clear indica-
tions that they may do so at no very distant date. At any rate, Singapore
is being developed as a capital ship base. Therefore, the principle of con-
centrating the greatest degree of power in the fewest number of hulls is not
a wise one for the British Empire. Rivalry must always be a dominant in-
fluence in naval design. We could not afford to reduce the size of our
capital ships, if such reduction involved a corresponding loss of fighting
power, while other nations maintained the full permissible limit. But need
such a reduction necessarily involve anything approaching a corresponding
loss of fighting power? Need it, in fact, involve any appreciable loss at
all if we eliminate the element of complexity which is primarily responsible
for the rapid growth in tonnage, and stick to the definite function of the
definite type ?
Take, for example, the question of defense, which nowadays makes such
a heavy demand upon displacement. A great many naval men share in the
opinion of Admiral Sir Reginald Custance that the best defense is offense,
and that two more big guns would be worth very much more than their


  p. 2351 (#1315)                      

1925]
2351
Professional Notes
weight in broadside protection. I believe that one result of overhead attack
and underwater attack will be a radical modification in the long-accepted
principles of armor distribution, and that, except for vital positions such
as magazines, armor will be gradually reduced to the proportions carried
by cruisers. No doubt the suggestion will be resisted, but the fact remains
that the want of armor did not prevent hard fighting during the war on the
part of the cruisers and destroyers. At least half the naval personnel is
expected to fight in vessels without any armor protection at all, and in the
case of the destroyers to fight principally against armored ships.
Reductions of the burden of armor may well prove a preliminary step
to reduction of displacement. If we arrive at international agreement to
limit the size of battleship guns, as has been done in the case of cruisers,
then we may see a reaction that will not only result in a very much smaller
capital ship, but a capital ship which will partake very much more of the
character of a big armored cruiser than of a battleship as we now under-
stand the term. It is quite conceivable that we may have reached such a
modification of constructive principles before the time arrives at which we
should resume the building of capital ships under the Washington agree-
ment. As far as it is possible to read the future, by that time we shall be
the only European power maintaining battleships at all. If the United States
and Japan continue to maintain a battle fleet, I suppose we shall have no
alternative. At the present time strategical considerations are centered in
the Pacific. Here the Washington limitations with regard to bases would
render it impracticable for the United States battle fleet to operate. Quite
a different type of ship is required for service in remote seas from that which
is designed fo narrow waters, and the 10,000-ton cruiser is a vessel which
I suggest represents perception of this fact. The bigger and more complex
a fleet, the greater the need for bases: during the last three years of the
Great War there was never a fighting unit from Scapa to Palestine operat-
ing more than 300 miles from a base.
The gigantic battleship appears to me to be of even less use to the United
States than to ourselves, for that country has to contemplate much greater
distances in her strategical outlook. Temporary bases are a poor com-
promise with the necessities of a modern fleet. America would be much
better served by a type of big ship especially adapted to ocean work. Prob-
ably she quite recognizes this herself, but finds a difficulty in consequence of
her rivalry with Japanese sea power. But as Japanese naval policy is de-
fensive, it would probably suit her very well to come into line with any
international proposal to limit displacement and gun power in her future
construction. It is certainly not improbable that the destiny of Japan may
bring her to war, but in this event she would wait to be attacked, and as
near to her own base as possible.
The tactical advantages of the smaller ship are, I believe, generally
realized. The primary cause of the result at Jutland was that, as in the
eighteenth century, we remained bound to the principle of the line-of-battle
formation. The Grand Fleet was too big for such a formation, which could
be (and actually was) rendered impotent by an unsuspected or disconcerting
maneuver. The lesson of Jutland is the necessity for greater flexibility
and more opportunity for initiative, and to this principle numbers certainly
contribute. Smaller ships imply greater numbers; they likewise mean a
“spreading out” of risk, with the result of encouraging a commander-in-
chief to follow the Nelsonian doctrine very much more effectively than was
attempted at Jutland.
The bigger weapon only calls forth the more formidable response. We
are now able to claim that the bulge makes the battleship reasonably safe
against torpedo attack. The answer will be a bigger and more devastating
torpedo. The danger of the mine is certainly not going to lessen-offense
never does. Development designed to counteract it means an unending


  p. 2352 (#1316)                      

2352
(Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
process of growth in displacement. The inevitable result is the production
of a ship too costly, and representing too large a proportion of total fighting
power, to be lightly risked. She is stultified by virtue of her superlative
qualities, and spends most of her career in a boom-closed anchorage
FRANCE
The French Naval Renaissance
The Engineer, 16 October, 1925.—The naval power of France has been
very considerably augmented during the present year by the completion of
new vessels that were laid down in 1922 and 1923, under the first section oi
the postwar building program. Delay has occurred in almost every case,
owing in part to alterations in the original designs and in part to technical
difficulties, but the Ministry of Marine is hopeful that thirty new units
will be commissioned before next spring. The most important of these ves-
sels are three cruisers-Duguay-Trouin, Lamotte-Picquet, and Primauquet,
sister ships of 7,873 tons displacement, engined for a speed of 34 knots. The
design is frankly experimental, for it is nearly a generation since the last
high-speed cruiser was built in France and the present staff of the Section
Technique-corresponding to our Royal Corps of Naval Constructors-has
had no practical experience in this branch of construction. It is, therefore,
not surprising to learn that the preliminary steam trials of the Duguar-
Trouin have failed to give complete satisfaction. Full details are not yet
to hand, but it appears that the power developed by the turbine machinery
at given pressures did not result in the speed expected. Pending further
information, we shall ignore the unofficial reports which are current in
regard to this matter. It is not only in the French Navy that recent ships,
designed for extremely high speeds, have failed to justify expectation. We
observe that two American cruisers, which were acclaimed not long since as
the swiftest vessels of their class in the world, have just been withdrawn
from service to have their turbines "modified," a euphemism which appar-
ently implies radical changes in their propelling machinery. In Japan, also,
the 33-knot cruiser Kinu broke down badly on a recent trial, and engine-
room troubles have been not infrequent in others of her class. It says much
for the courage of French constructors that they undertook to build a
cruiser with a higher legend speed than that of any existing ship of this
type. The Duguay-Trouin, of 7,873 tons, has machinery of 100,000 shaft
horsepower, while H.M.S. Emerald, of 7,600 tons, is designed for 80.000
shaft horsepower. Bearing in mind the unequalled experience of British
naval constructors in the design of very fast ships, and the admitted pre-
eminence of our engineers in the construction of steam machinery for marine
purposes, the discrepancy between these figures is significant. At the same
time, it is but fair to add that the French ship, in contrast to the Emerald
is virtually destitute of armor, and, in effect, represents an extreme ten-
dency to sacrifice every other attribute to speed. The same principle ap-
pears to have inspired the design of two later and larger ships, Duquesne
and Tourville, which were laid down during the summer. They are to dis-
place 10,000 tons and to have machinery of 130,000 shaft horsepower. The
utmost speed attainable, combined with adequate gun power and little or
no protection, would appear to be the tactical policy which now governs
French naval construction. The armament of the Duguay-Trouin class
consists of eight 6.1-inch guns paired in splinter-proof turrets at bow and
stern. These guns are a high-velocity model, with a length of 55 calibers.
The weight of the projectile is unknown, but in range and precision the net
weapon is said to surpass the 7.6-inch gun mounted in older French cruisers.
Of equal interest are the torpedo craft which are now running their
trials. Six of them are flotilla leaders, unprecedented in size and power, all
of which were laid down in private yards in 1922-23. The Jaguar and her


  p. 2353 (#1317)                      

1925)
2353
Professional Notes
five consorts are ships of 2,359 tons displacement, with a length of nearly
400 feet, a breadth of 36 feet, and machinery of 50,000 shaft horsepower for
a speed of 35.5 knots. Drawings which have been published show the lines
of the hull to be extremely fine, and this fact, taken in conjunction with the
heavy armament carried, lends a special interest to the behavior of these
vessels at sea. As first designed, they were to have had six 5.1-inch guns,
but it soon became evident from tank experiments that the weight of this
armament would seriously prejudice their stability, and one gun was accord-
ingly deleted. They also have two 75 mm. anti-aircraft guns and six 21.7-
inch torpedo tubes on triple mountings. Two different types of turbine-
Rateau and Breguet-are represented in this group of ships. There are
five small-tube boilers, burning oil, and sufficient fuel is carried for a voyage
of 2,500 miles at 18 knots. The Jaguar, which began her trials two months
ago, has developed condenser trouble, though it is said to be of a minor
nature. The Tiger, of the same class, attained a speed of 32 knots, with
only 26,000 shaft horsepower, and subsequently worked up to full power,
maintaining 35.5 knots with ease. Bad weather was encountered on this
trial. When running at full speed the bows of the ship tended to lift out of
the water unduly, but otherwise she behaved admirably, and showed herself
a better sea boat than had been anticipated. Good reports have also been
received of the initial trials of the Leopard and Chacal. The two remain-
ing vessels, Lynx and Panthère, have not yet reached the trial stage, but
will probably do so before the end of the year. It is proposed to form the
Jaguar, Tiger, Leopard, and Chacal into a division légère rapide, which,
after a three months' course of training, will make a cruise in northern
waters, calling at ports in Great Britain and Scandinavia. Fifteen more
flotilla leaders are included in the program, for completion by 1931, and
several of them have already been ordered. They will be slightly larger
than the Jaguars, and will carry 5.5-inch guns in place of 5.1-inch. The
British Navy has no torpedo craft comparable with the Jaguar, to say noth-
ing of the latest French design. Our largest flotilla leaders are lighter by
600 tons, and are armed with five 4.7-inch guns. On the other hand, they
are at least I knot faster. It is, however, very improbable that this new
development in foreign naval construction will be overlooked when the
methodical replacement of obsolete destroyers is begun, two years hence. In
addition to the flotilla leaders described above, twelve destroyers are being
completed for the French service. Laid down in 1923, they have a dis-
placement of 1,434 tons, engines of 30,000 shaft horsepower for a speed
of 33 knots, and are armed with four 5.1-inch guns and six tubes. Six other
boats of the same class are on the stocks, and fifteen more are projected.
They are simply a smaller edition of the Jaguar type, but a lower speed has
been accepted for the sake of a heavy armament. If the current building
program is adhered to, France will eventually possess fifty-seven torpedo
vessels of post-war design, all of large dimensions and high speed, armed
with 5.1-inch and 5.5-inch guns, and carrying torpedoes more powerful than
the standard model in our navy. She will have, besides, nine fast cruisers-
including six of 10,000 tons, mounting 8-inch guns—and more than one
hundred submarines, fifty-nine of which will be of the very latest con-
struction.
In view of this formidable array of light naval craft, which could be em-
ployed with telling effect in the narrow waters of the Mediterranean, French
naval strategists do not appear to be greatly concerned about the weakness
of their battle fleet. No attempt has been made to replace the Dreadnought
France, which was wrecked three years ago, nor apparently is there any
intention of doing so. The six remaining dreadnoughts have all been thor-
oughly renovated since the war, and even the three Dantons still on the
active list have been modernized to some extent, though their fighting value
is small. It would seem therefore that French naval opinion still cherishes


  p. 2354 (#1318)                      

2354
(Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
a certain respect for the battleship, despite the almost supreme influence now
wielded by the Jeune Ecole, in whose philosophy of warfare the great ship
has no place. Yet it is exceedingly improbable that France will ever build
another battleship. For some months past the Ministry of Marine has had
under consideration the design of a croiseur de combat, which is highly
commended by distinguished naval critics. It is, in effect, a light battle
cruiser of 17,500 tons, capable of steaming at 34 knots. The armament of
eight 12-inch guns is disposed in two quadruple turrets, en échelon amid-
ships, thus commanding-in theory—an all-round field of fire. Vital parts
are protected by armor strong enough to resist all except the heaviest pro-
jectiles. Room is provided for eight aeroplanes, and the forecastle or the
quarterdeck is fitted with a flying-off platform. Under the Washington
Treaty, France is at liberty to utilize her allotment of capital ship tonnage
as she may consider advisable. No objection could be raised therefore if
she decided to build two of these 17,500-ton battle cruisers in lieu of one
35,000-ton battleship. Since they would, of course, completely overshadow
the 10,000-ton cruisers now building for all the major navies, their appear-
ance would introduce a novel and disturbing factor into calculations of
relative strength. For the present, however, the design remains in the paper
stage, from which it may never emerge. Ships of this type could hardly be
built for less than £4,500,000 apiece, and their value as a tactical or strategic
factor is entirely conjectural. Even without them, the revival of French
sea power is assured. When the building program now in hand has fully
matured, France will be in a position, if not absolutely to control the
Mediterranean, at least to deny the command of that sea to any rival fleet.
She may reckon with some confidence on her ability to safeguard the vital
lines of communication with northern Africa, which has become an indis-
pensable reservoir of manpower for her army, and the defense of her mari-
time frontiers will no longer cause her anxiety. A naval policy which
promises to yield such fruitful results cannot be adjudged extravagant or
unsound.
French Destroyer Trials
The Naval and Military Record, 23 September, 1925.—The destroyers
Tiger and Jaguar, of 2,400 tons, have both accomplished off Lorient highly
successful preliminary trials at 18, 20, and 32 knots, their Rateau turbines
developing more than the stipulated power and speed during their cruising
and two-third power tests. They are this week undergoing their final
official trials before hoisting the pennant for commission. Next month will
be the turn of the Leopard, completing at the Chantiers de la Loire (St.
Nazaire), which has already undergone successful stationary trials, her
Breguet turbines giving satisfaction. The Panthère (Lorient) is expected
to be ready at the end of October, the Chacal (Penhoet, St. Nazaire, that
has also Rateau turbines) is being pressed forward and ought to run her
trials next November. The Lynx, the last of the series, in hand at St.
Nazaire (Chantiers de la Loire), is only shipping her funnels and super-
structures, and is not likely to be ready before next year. She has on board
her Breguet turbines. It is to be noted that the six French super-destroyers
have only French turbines. This keen competition between French yards and
turbine makers lends additional interest to the forthcoming trials, which are
expected, besides, to demonstrate to the world that France possesses anew
the speed supremacy, the most important of all strategic assets.
Both French types of turbines, that are very different in shape, con-
ditions of working, and installation on board, have, of course, their respective
qualities, the Rateaus aiming at robustness and reliability and at simplicity
in the working and controlling, permitting easy supervision and repairing.
Up to the present, if anything, superiority has been on the side of the Rateau


  p. 2355 (#1319)                      

1925]
2355
Professional Notes
type for speed, fuel consumption, and returns for the indicated power. In
these respects the 450-ton Voltigeur, for instance, that had Rateaus, excelled
her sister ships Tirailleur (Breguets) and Chasseur (Parsons). In the
850-ton series the Breguets gave good results in the Cimeterre and Dague,
but in the matter of speed and reliability they did not quite come up to the
Parsons turbined Boulier and Casque (that exceeded 35 knots in 1913), and
Mehl, that was reputed for her speed endurance.
The turbine fight will be keener still in the torpilleurs d'escadre series.
These so-called 1,500-ton torpedo boats, thus modestly nicknamed "cats”
on the official lists, are in reality small "tigers,” equal or superior to British
flotilla leaders in armament and all-round power for mischief. In the
Italian fleet boats of the same size and power are proclaimed to be esploratori
leggeri (light scouts). Parsons turbines have here the lion share, these
being fitted in the Simoun, Sirocco (Penhoet), Bourrasque (Dunkerque),
Cyclône, and Mistral (Normand), Tempête (Nantes), and Tornade (Bor-
deaux), while Ovage Ouragan (Caen) have Rateau turbines, and the
Tramontane (Bordeaux) has Zoelly. It will be a stiff and interesting fight,
all the more so as the Parsons turbines fitted in those overgrown torpilleurs
are partly of British make and partly of French make. The Simoun and
Siocco, for instance, though constructed by the same firm (Penhoet), have
the former French-made Parsons, and the latter English-made Parsons.
Trials alone can decide as to quality, but, curiously enough, it has been re-
marked that English-made turbines, though outwardly rougher and lacking
in polished finish, turn more smoothly and noiselessly than French-made
turbines. Appearance is nothing. “The proof of the pudding is in the
eating."
The nominal motorpower of the 1,500-ton class of torpilleurs d'escadre
is 30,000 h.p., supplied by three boilers giving 210 tons of steam per hour,
against 35,000 h.p. for the 1,600-ton British Abdiels, and 30,000 h.p. for the
1,350-ton Viscount series of English destroyers; but, although trials have
not yet commenced, higher figures are being confidently announced: namely,
34,000 h.p. in the case of the Rateau-turbined boats and 36,000 h.p. in the
case of a few Parsons vessels. Boiler trials have shown that one fifth more
power may in practice be obtained above contract stipulations; in truth,
there is nothing exaggerated in 36,000 h.p. for 1,500-ton boats. It is only
right to say that robustness, speed endurance, and fighting capabilities were
the points aimed at in the French torpilleurs.
French Light Cruisers and Flotilla Leaders
The Naval and Military Record, 30 September, 1925.—The Paris Com-
mission des Essais, under Rear-Admiral Pugliesi-Conti, has arrived at
Lorient for the purpose of passing through their official trials the 2,400-ton
destroyers Tiger, built at Chantiers de Bretagne-Nantes, and Jaguar, re-
cently completed by the Lorient arsenal. Both these fine vessels have
Rateau turbines, and their preliminary trials have been successful. They
have their armament on board and are fully ready, and their wide shields,
much more conspicuous than in British destroyers, heavy gun-mountings,
and relatively big guns give an impression of cruiser-like strength. Impor-
tance attaches to these first trials of a totally new type of torpedo vessel,
as the data collected in the course of the forthcoming program of exhaustive
tests may serve to modify the designs of the 2,650-ton boats just ordered
at Caen and at Lorient. Similarly, the data gained in the 1,455-ton Simoun
will be used in the case of the four 1,500-ton boats on the point of being
ordered.
These eighteen 2,400-ton and 1,500-ton boats, if their speed capabilities
should come up to expectations, will be a good fighting investment and go
some way toward restoring France to a position of supremacy in that im-


  p. 2356 (#1320)                      

2356
(Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
portant class of flotilla units. No rival fleet, not even the British, com-
prises destroyers quite so powerful and fast at sea. Yet some divergence
of views prevails among Paris experts as to their relative merits; it is
agreed, especially among gunnery specialists, that a 1,500-ton Simoun,
carrying four 130-millimeter guns, shows for the money a superior return to
the 2,400-ton Chacal, that mounts five 130-millimeter weapons, and has the
same number (six) of 550-millimeter torpedoes (each weighing 1,600 kilos);
and it is contended it would have been wiser, for the same amount, to con-
struct three 1,500-ton units in lieu of two 2,400-tonners, especially as the
smaller vessels are, strange to note, rather superior to the larger ones in the
matter of habitability. The five boilers and Rateau turbines of the Chacal.
for instance, occupy forty meters longer space than the three boilers and
Parsons turbines of the Simoun, which means that the quarters reserved to
the crew in the last named vessel are longer by twenty meters, and this for
sixty men less than in the Chacal. The crew of the Simoun only includes
sixty-five ordinary seamen (matelots), but fifty quartier-maitres (petty
officers), twenty-four maîtres et second maitres, and seven officers. This
large number of warrant and petty officers, most of them long-service men,
provides the means to obviate, to a certain extent, the incredible instability
of crews that are perpetually being changed from one ship to another with-
out due consideration to the interests of efficiency.
What is the ideal destroyer gun? This question has not been settled by
the advent of the 130-millimeter gun, the tests of which have been successful
in the matter of range and accuracy, the power of the 5.5-inch gun (140-
millimeter) now in the service being exceeded, which means the new gun
would have a say at over 18,000 yards, all the more so as its shell with its
special caps has a weight of 80 pounds, with a good percentage of explosives
that renders it highly effective against lightly-built ships even at extreme
range. French shells are of superior quality ; war experience showed them
to be at least equal to the excellent projectiles of the Germans; and post-war
ammunition is in several respects superior to war projectiles-a result of
the strides chemical science made in recent years. So far so good, but
many gunnery experts consider the caliber of the new French destroyers
as being rather heavy and unnecessarily powerful and robust. In destroyer
actions, so fragile will be the target that it will not matter much whether
the hit is by a 5.1-inch or by a 4.7. Results in practice will be very much
the same, and what will tell will be the volume of fire and the number of
hits. Officers professing these views favor the armament of the Italian
Leones: namely, eight 4.7-inch weapons. Still, the teachings of the war.
and especially the Emden-Sydney and auxiliary cruiser duels, by no means
justify such contentions. Victory is the apanage of the bigger gun and of
the first blows, especially when speed is combined with caliber, notwith-
standing the fact that in the eyes of younger French officers the secret of
the undoing of the Germans at British hands was more in their systematic
running away than in the inferiority of their calibers.
GREAT BRITAIN
Navy Progress and Pacts
The Army-Navy and Air Force Gazette, 10 October, 1925.—The idea of
a second Washington Conference continues to be canvassed, but the project
seems no neare realization. It is often called a Bonrerence on Nayal Dis-
armament, but misarmament would be a better description to apply to some
of the objects which it is suggested the assembly, if it ever comes about,
should aim at. One suggestion is that submarines should be declared illegal
and entirely abolished. There would seem to be two strong reasons against
such a plan being agreed to. One is that the submarine is regarded as the
weapon of the weaker powers, and practically every nation in the world


  p. 2357 (#1321)                      

1925)
2357
Professional Notes
would need to be consulted about such a proposal. Even if all the nations
sent delegates to a conference, and each country had a vote, it is hardly
likely that the smaller powers would accept the view of the larger ones.
Nor are the latter in agreement on this matter, for when it was put forward
at the last Conference, France's opposition to the British proposal was
sufficient to prevent its adoption. Another point which is overlooked is that
the submarine is not only used for attacking ships, whether men-of-war
or merchantmen, but for purposes of defense, intelligence, and so on. The
wider its uses, the more is it favored by the powers, even though not always
for the same reason.
Another thing hoped for by some of the advocates of a new conference
is that a limit will be placed on the number of cruisers to be built, as well
as on their size and armament. This is by no means so easy as it sounds,
for Great Britain could not with safety consent to the cruisers needed for
the protection of her far-flung trade routes being limited to a ratio de-
termined by the strength of powers who are by no means so entirely depend-
ent upon ocean supplies. Relative strength in cruisers for commerce
protection is a different thing to comparisons of battleships. At one period
in the late war, forty allied cruisers were chasing one German raider. The
Washington Conference, too, has taught us that to limit tonnage does not
necessarily have the effect hoped for. The ingenuity of the naval architect
is at once exerted to obtain an extra gun, or an extra knot's speed, on the
standard displacement, and so the competition is merely diverted into another
channel. At the moment, far-reaching results are anticipated from the
vessel which Messrs. William Denny and Brothers are to build for Turbine
Steamers, Ltd., of Glasgow, in which the steam pressure will be double
that of any existing marine installation, the step forward being spoken of
by engineers as the greatest taken since the advent of the turbine. What-
ever may be thought of the matter politically, the proposals which have
been made for a new naval conference are not only untimely, but im-
practicable.
The New Battleships
By Sir Herbert Russell, The Naval and Military Record, 23 September,
1925.-The launch of the Nelson naturally served to attract public atten-
tion to the two new battleships, of which she is the first to take the water.
The spectators at the ceremony were left to gather as much about the
vessel as their eyes could tell them. Apart from the unfamiliar and alto-
gether symmetrical arrangement of her funnels and topworks an external
view at the present stage gives no criterion to the fighting value of the
ship. The Admiralty have confined details to the admission that the new
ships will displace 35,000 tons and are 702 feet long. Since no more battle-
ships can be laid down until 1931 by the only powers which are likely even
to think of perpetuating the capital ship, the reason for this official in-
scrutability is not very clear. It is certainly "according to custom," but
there are times when custom becomes merely ridiculous.
However, there it is, and beyond the particulars of tonnage and dimen-
sions, for which we have to thank official condescension, the rest of our
knowledge (if knowledge it can be called under the circumstances) regard-
ing these ships is pui. Neculative. Most of it, indeed, has come from the
United States. ,
I imagine it is quite reasonable to assume that the description of these two
vessels as "the most formidable fighting ships in the world" is justified.
This means that in hitting power, and the quality of resisting attack from
the sea-surface, from below, or from above, they are unequalled. Their
tactical mobility is very doubtful; if it proves true that they are only en-
gined for 21 knots (and since the United States can tell us this definitely,


  p. 2358 (#1322)                      

2358
(Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
it very likely is true), then they are inferior in this respect to anything built
since the Collingwood class.
But does this matter? I observe, with some surprise, an admission from
quarters whence I least expected it that these are probably the last battle-
ships that will ever be built. I observe, with some satisfaction, a résumé of
the self-same arguments I have ventured to put forward for a very con-
siderable time past as forming a reason for this conclusion. Certain didactic
writers are now laying down, with the finality of sage discovery, the very
points they were so emphatically controverting not more than a year ago.
Good luck to their sagacity-only they need not pretend to a monopoly in it!
The Nelson and the Rodney are, in fact, in a very literal sense the “last
words” of the material school. The material school argued that since the
Washington Conference allowed the United States to keep four post-Jut-
land capital ships, and Japan two, and that since we had only got the pre-
post-Jutland Hood—why, we must obviously have two more battleships
unless the 5-5-3 ratio was to be a farce. Apparently they did not realize
the possibility that it would become a farce in any case.
The material school carried its point, for the tactical school was still
musing hard, and had not made up its mind. The late Sir Percy Scott did
much to obscure clarity of thought upon this subject. His condemnation of
the battleship was on quite wrong lines—so wrong that in rebutting his con-
tentions, people forgot all about the right lines. In fact, without in the
least meaning it, he sidetracked the whole question until after the Nelson
and Rodney had been laid down and the material school had won.
Sir Percy Scott argued that the capital ship had been completely eclipsed
by the submarine and the aircraft, and that, simply on these grounds, she
was "no damned good.” Being incorrect, this contention could not prevail.
The capital ship is quite capable of very effectively taking her own part
against the submarine and the aircraft, and distinctly more so today than
she was during the war. The issue raised brought into being a very small
Percy Scott school and a very large anti-Percy Scott school. For some
time before his death the well-known Admiral had abandoned his crusade.
We need not question the perfect sincerity of his belief; the only point with
which I am concerned is the effect of the controversy upon the whole ques-
tion of the value of the battleship. By general agreement the battleship won
in this controversy, with the result that both professional and public opinion
was misled into the view that her war value was vindicated.
This is what I mean by sidetracking the essential point. Sir Percy Scott
was much too limited in his view, and, moreover, that view was a wrong
one. If, instead of taking the line that the capital ship is hopelessly out-
classed by the submarine and the aeroplane, he had raised the much broader
question of her tactical utility, I believe he would have carried a preponder-
ance of qualified opinion with him.
The Nelson and the Rodney are the most formidable sea weapons in the
world, but what are we going to do with these stupendous sledge hammers?
Send them into the Mediterranean on completion to join the lesser sledge
hammers. Both these vessels are essentially battleships. They do not
possess the high speed of the battle cruiser. They perpetuate the tradition
of the fleet action, and the necessity for the easily accessible base.
France and Italy still possess a few pre-war battleships, but they are not
maintaining these in regular commission. They have openly renounced the
intention of building any more battleships. At the Washington Conference
they reserved the right to use their ration of capital ship tonnage in such
form as might best suit their respective policies, in building, instead, cruisers,
destroyers, or submarines. Therefore, it is true to say that we are the only
naval power which now maintains a battle fleet in European waters. I take
it that there will be general agreement in the assertion that there is no
visible possibility of our employing that battle Aeet in European waters.


  p. 2359 (#1323)                      

1925)
2359
Professional Notes
Bluntly put, there is nothing for it to fight. Naval war with any European
power capable of going to war on the sea at all, would resolve itself into
purely defensive tactics on the part of the opponent, coupled with the em-
ployment of all available resources to attack our trade.
We might, and probably should, respond by attempting a close blockade.
Battleships are not a suitable type of warship for blockade service under
modern conditions, especially when there are no enemy battleships left to
blockade. The form of war I am visualizing would demand cruisers, de-
stroyers, and submarines in overwhelming numbers. It would be a form
of war without the possibility of a decisive fleet action; in fact, it would
be eminently a war of attrition. Battleships might, indeed, be used to bom-
bard enemy ports. I say "might," but I should certainly hesitate to say
"would.” Defensive tactics would foresee and provide against such an
obvious contingency. We never attempted to bombard the German ports,
not because the High Seas fleet lay within them: that fact would have been
a direct incentive to do so had it not been for other considerations which
combined to make it too risky a project altogether.
The "strategical zone" now lies in the Pacific, because it is in that ocean
that the only other two battle fleets of the world are concentrated. Ten
years hence Singapore will be completed, and then we can send our battle
fleet into the Pacific if we want to. It is true that we could send it to
Australia forthwith were there any necessity, but there is no naval repair-
ing base in Australia capable of dealing with battleship defects, and, stra-
tegically, a fleet based on any Australian port, or ports, would not be
favorably placed.
These two new battleships will have cost the nation between thirteen and
fourteen millions by the time they are finished. Of course, it is too late
now for regrets or reproaches, but do not let us be misled by heroic talk
about the magnificent addition to British sea power. These ships are a
legacy from the unreasoning progressive doctrine of the material school.
That doctrine was obscured by the mistaken controversy started by the late
Sir Percy Scott. The tactical school, not then clear as to the perspective of
the late war, did not raise its voice. It is raising is voice now, and the
material school is not pressing its answer.
To say that we were obliged to build these two ships so as to keep level
with the United States and Japan is one of those truths by which it is
often sought to justify a blunder. The Washington Conference proved
abortive of designed result because the politicians did most of the talking,
and the technical experts resented the idea of dictatorship altogether. If
the battleship is no longer of visible tactical value to ourselves, she is even
less so to the United States and Japan, which are faced with very wide
ocean distances in their every strategical outlook. I admit it is not a pleas-
ing prospect to any country to feel that a hundred million pounds' worth of
perfectly good warships have gone out of fashion, but the development of
war methods takes no account of the cost of weapons. In the Napoleonic
wars naval victories were won by fleets of the line. In the Great War the
fleets of the line only met once in four years, and then by accident. We
have been treated to a lot of academic talk about the decisive influence of
silent pressure, most of which is academic rubbish. War means fighting,
not glaring across a deserted ocean from behind boom defenses. Principles
remain, but methods change radically. In Nelson's day the ship-of-the-line
was built to fight the enemy, and was pretty sure to fight him, because he
was building a corresponding vessel for the purpose. Today the battleship
is built simply because the three great sea powers are all waiting, one for
the other, to cry halt! And since the United States is too busy debt col-
lecting to attend to the matter, we might very well call another naval con-
ference ourselves.


  p. 2360 (#1324)                      

2360
[Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
British Navy's Needs and the Mosul Issue
By Hector C. Bywater, The Baltimore Sun, 30 October, 1925.—London,
October 8.—Britain's firm stand against Turkey in the Mosul dispute is
widely attributed to her interest in the oil fields of that section. Foreign
critics ridicule the suggestion that her attitude is in any way dictated by
considerations of honor or sentiment. They make light of the Colonial
Secretary's reminder that Britain has solemnly pledged her protection to
the Arab populace of Irak, who would be exposed to the vindictive fury of
the Turk if that protection were withdrawn.
It is oil and oil alone that keeps the British in Irak, these critics declare,
and the pretense that any other motive weighs with them is sheer humbug.
French journalists, in particular, appear to know so much more about
the hidden mainsprings of British policy than British statesmen do them-
selves that it would be useless to argue with them on this question. It is,
however, a curious phenomenon that France (according to French writers)
should be the only country in the world whose foreign policy is free from
sordid aims.
The Paris newspapers discovered long ago that Britain was exploiting
her mandate in Irak for the purpose of consolidating her naval supremacy.
In lengthy articles they prove, to their own satisfaction, that the future
existence of British sea power is more or less dependent on the oil fields
of Mosul. If the Turks regained possession of that territory all the British
Admiralty's plans for building up a war reserve of oil fuel would fall to
the ground, and the very integrity of the empire would be threatened.
Echoes of this argument are heard even in the American press. It may
therefore be opportune to examine the matter from a naval point of view.
Since the British feet now consists almost exclusively of oil-burning
vessels, the provision of adequate oil supplies in war has become a problem
of capital importance. At one period of the World War the oil reserve be-
came dangerously low. It was the rule that this reserve should be sufficient
for five or six months, yet in the spring of 1917 there was barely enough oil
left to supply the fleet for eight weeks, and orders had to be issued forbid-
ding ships to steam at high speed except in cases of the utmost urgency.
For a few months the situation was extremely grave, for German sub-
marines were sinking tankers by the score. Eventually the crisis was over-
come by furnishing more destroyers for escort duty through the danger
zone, and by the expedient of bringing in oil in the double bottoms of
merchantmen coming from American ports.
This lesson has not been forgotten. In 1919 the British cabinet authorized
the creation of an Admiralty oil reserve at home, to be completed in 1929.
It was further decided to establish a series of fueling stations along the
main ocean routes, at points such as Sierra Leone, the Cape of Good Hope,
the Falkland Islands, Jamaica, Gibraltar, Malta, Hongkong, Rangoon, and
Singapore. Owing, however, to recent retrenchment in the navy budget,
this work is proceeding rather slowly, and it will be years before the scheme
is complete.
But it is one thing to create a chain of navy oil depots, stretching from
England to the farthest confines of the empire, and quite another to insure
that they shall be kept filled under all circumstances. Fundamentally the
problem is one of supply rather than distribution.
Let us suppose Great Britain had to fight a strong continental adversary
whose naval power was centered in the Mediterranean. Many strategists
are convinced that in such an event the British battle fleet would be driven
out of the Mediterranean by the swarms of mosquito craft let loose against
it. Be that as it may, it is certain that British ships would be in constant
peril of attack by submarine, torpedo boat, airplane, or cruiser, while voyag-
ing from Gibraltar to the Suez Canal or vice versa.


  p. 2361 (#1325)                      

1925)
2361
Professional Notes
Even for men-of-war the Mediterranean route would be highly dangerous;
for merchantmen it would be impossible. We have only to recall what
happened there during the late war to appreciate the truth of this proposi-
tion. At no time did Germany and Austria have more than eight or nine
submarines operating simultaneously in those waters, and to cope with these
marauders the Allies employed practically the entire naval strength of
France and Italy, supported by strong contingents of British and Japanese
patrol craft. Yet, to the very end of the struggle, the Mediterranean re-
mained unsafe, the losses suffered in that area being by far the heaviest
in proportion to the volume of shipping.
In the hypothetical war we are considering British merchantmen would
certainly be debarred from using the Mediterranean. This means that all
traffic to and from the East would have to be diverted to the Cape route.
Tankers bringing oil from the Persian Gulf to England would have a voyage
of some 11,500 miles, which could hardly be covered in less than six weeks.
If the British Navy had to depend on this precarious line of supply it would
be in a bad way, indeed.
In the circumstances pictured the oil wells of Irak would be a factor
of quite negligible importance. The navy would have to import most of
its oil from America, as it did in the last war.
If, on the other hand, Britain's next conflict is to be staged in the Far
East, the oil resources of Irak would naturally be of much greater value-
provided they were accessible and secure, which they would not be if Turkey
saw fit to make trouble. All things considered, however, the value of the
Mosul oil fields as a British naval asset in time of war is decidedly prob-
lematical.
The whole question of fuel supply is naturally one of paramount con-
cern to the British naval authorities. With the transition from coal to oil
the navy has become dependent upon outside sources for its very means of
movement. Ten years ago the major part of the fleet was still composed of
coal-burning ships. Today there are only five capital ships which use solid
fuel. As all the remaining vessels, from battleships to destroyers and sub-
marines, consume oil only, any failure in the supply would inevitably
paralyze the entire fleet.
For a protracted war the largest reserve that could be accumulated and
stored in time of peace would prove inadequate. It follows, therefore, that
the uninterrupted arrival of fresh supplies from abroad would be absolutely
vital to the maintenance of British sea power in a future conflict. Hence
the government's anxiety to develop every possible source of oil production,
both inside and outside the Empire.
We are, therefore, justified in concluding that the petroleum fields around
Mosul are responsible in some degree for the government's decision to hold
on to Irak, although, for the reasons outlined above, it is difficult to believe
that oil is the sole motive, or even the dominant motive, behind their policy
in that region.
The Airship Controversy
The Naval and Military Record, 30 September, 1925.—That the disaster
to the United States airship Shenandoah would result in a revival of the
airship controversy was inevitable. Thus far, however, we have come
across nothing new in the contributions to the familiar arguments. The
disciples of the dirigible are asking us not to infer too much from the loss
of the Shenandoah. They point out that she was a comparatively old craft,
that her design was not well suited to resisting any sudden stress, and that
this has been much improved upon in the latest examples. An attempt is


  p. 2362 (#1326)                      

2362
[Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
made to demonstrate that she should never have been caught in the dis-
astrous storm at all, and that had the meteorologists really known their
business she might easily have avoided it. Such an argument appeals to
us as the last ditch of defense. Although the course of big storm depres-
sions may be followed with reasonable accuracy, the atmosphere is always
liable to sudden local disturbances-particularly in cyclonic parallels—which
no degree of meteorological vigilance can forestall.
The mere admission that an airship must be shepherded by meteorologists
amounts to a confession of inherent defect. If it were not for the weather
she would be a perfect form of flying machine. But the “if" is such a
tremendous and insuperable one as to defy effective answer. What happened
in the case of the Shenandoah has happened before, and will happen again
so long as the airship remains in existence. It was not wholly on account
of their military vulnerability that the Germans withdrew their zeppelins.
One of the biggest airship raids over London ever planned ended in the total
destruction of half a dozen of these craft over various parts of France in
consequence of a sudden and unexpected northerly gale. One correspondent
states that although the zeppelins were not of much use for land operations,
they proved of the "utmost value" to the German Navy. It would be inter-
esting to know on what material evidence this opinion rests. Did airships
operating with the German fleet ever do anything which aeroplanes could
not have accomplished very much more effectively?
JAPAN
A Peace Protest from Tokyo
From the Japan Times and Mail (Tokyo English-language daily).
weekly edition, August 26.—The Living Age, 17 October, 1925.—The Great
Pacific War, by Hector Bywater, will be long discussed in all parts of the
world. It, in brief, depicts Japan and America at war in 1931 ; the war
lasts for two years and results in a. drawn fight. Japan, in the book, is
awarded the role of aggressor and picks a quarrel with the greatest, richest,
most powerful, and most advanced of the nations that are making their
imprint on the civilization of today. The whole thing is purely imaginary,
and in many an instance is utter nonsense.
For example, why should this empire fight at all? If she must, why pick
on the rich and powerful United States, which has friends all over the hem
of the Pacific Ocean? Why commit economic suicide right from the start
by quarreling with Japan's best customer? There are many other ridiculous
assumptions, but to deal with them all is impossible because of the limitations
of space.
This talk of an "inevitable" conflict between the Rising Sun and the Stars
and Stripes has been permitted too much latitude; and, strange to say, this
talk has come mostly from war-torn and semiprostrate Europe, suggesting,
it would seem, that the wish is father to the thought.
Three years or so ago, The Aeroplane, a British publication, had an
article by C. G. Grey, editor of that periodical, which contained the
following:
"In the light of Japan's equipping a great army and a great navy with
adequate flying services, it is necessary to consider how and where they are
likely to be used. The enemy is the United States and there is never any
difficulty in finding cause for war if the two nations are fated to fight.
"If a fight comes at all, it must come soon. The best opinion in Great
Britain places the date of a Japanese-American war at the beginning of
1924, for by then the Japanese war forces will be ready."
That year was selected because it was supposed to be a "fighting” year,
popular superstition making out that Japan was fated to fight in every


  p. 2363 (#1327)                      

1925]
2363
Professional Notes
year which contained the figure four. These self-important alarmist pub-
licists argued thus : Japan had a war in 1894; when 1904 came round she
was fighting again; then in 1914 she declared hostilities against the Central
Powers; so in 1924 she must again fight.
That year has passed; there was no fight of any sort, and the only talk
of war came from unthinking jingoes and half-baked publicists. Now the
latest date set by the great Hector Bywater is 1931. Perhaps the United
States and Japan are going to be hectored into a war by a fighter on paper
who, within the walls of a narrow newspaper office, sees, amid the dis-
coloring smoke emerging from a pipe that badly needs attention, visions
of gas, of planes, and of armadas churning the waters of the ocean into
fury and strewing the seas with the dead and the dying.
While Japan feels intensely the smart inflicted by America's recent im-
migration law, no one with any sense of reasoning or proportion thinks of
war. The East is not slow to learn, even if Europe is too old now to do
so; and while Europe, with her everlasting war mentality and barrack room
diplomacy, sees only the red of the battlefield and the "keen edge of the
sword"-Lord Birkenhead's very recent words—as the final arbitrament of
international disputes, neither Japan nor the United States cares to do so.
In April this year, Yusho Kumamoto, who had been in constant corre-
spondence with the late M. Camille Flammarion, famous French astronomer,
foretold "by the stars” that next year or the year after next some corner
of Asia Minor, probably Mesopotamia, will be the starting point of a war
that will ultimately engulf all Europe. To the man in the street, Kuma-
moto's forecast is much more probable than that of Bywater, and as one
reads the daily news, remembers the condition of Europe today and the
rivalries of the powers in the Near East, one feels that his prophecy is
far more probable than Bywater's.
There are the Mosul sore, the defiance of the Arabs, the desire of
Russia to press southward to the sea in that part of the world, the growing
distrust of the Balfour Zionist policy-to mention just a few of the acutest
sore points.
Count Michimasa Soyejima, not so very long ago, hinted that the next
war in the Far East would again see Japan engaged in a tussle with the
Russian Bear. These are all mere guesses, but these speculations command
far more respect than the devilish drivel of Hector Bywater.
Our contemporary, the Tokyo Nichi Nichi, is inclined to believe that
certain British publicists and politicians would actually rejoice if the United
States and Japan could be made to come to grips. We do not believe that
this is the considered opinion of the best minds of Japan or of Great Britain,
but we do think that a law prohibiting people from writing nonsense that
might possibly cause other nations to collide, and providing for corporal
chastisement if the law be violated, should be enacted.
Sowers of racial and international discord ought to be punished with the
utmost rigor, for these are the ones that are responsible for the organized
loot, murder, rapine, and moral and material degradation that follows wars,
after the bubble of "glory" has vanished.
Mr. Bywater is a well-known anti-Japanese writer. He suffers from a
distinct anti-Japanese bias. Let us remember that while we read the book.
Let us also remember that wars today are fought largely by the powers of
economics, not merely by that of force. The economic situation of the
world is such that a large scale war is sheer nonsense; much more so a war
between the United States and Japan, which would let loose, not only
national passions, but also race hatreds that would bring fearful reper-
cussions from Peking to Port Said, from Malakka to Mombasa, and from
Bombay to Bordeaux and Buenos Aires.


  p. 2364 (#1328)                      

2364
[Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
There will be no war between Japan and the United States either in 1931
or later, Bywaters and Morning Post Bathursts to the contrary notwith-
standing. These two countries, the greatest and the youngest on the
Pacific and the most advanced in the vanguard of present day civilization,
will set the world an example that sweet reasonableness is far better than
Birkenhead's "keen edge of the sword,” and can always be relied upon to
straighten the gnarled knots that every country at one time or another
experiences.
The attention of all Europe, and in a sense of the world, is now focused
on the efforts being made by Europe to struggle toward a better order of
living, and the Security Pact is regarded as the best method to reach that
goal considering the past history of Europe, her more recent history during
and since the Great War, and the hates that unfortunately teem in the
unhappy old world continent. When seriously examined, there does not
appear to be any compelling reason to think that the present effort will be
successful where previous ones have failed.
What the pact proposes to do is this. France is to be guaranteed abso-
lute security from German aggression, and, if Germany ever repeats her
performance of 1870 or 1914, Great Britain will be bound to go to France's
assistance. But Germany in her present state is absolutely powerless to
defend herself if attacked, let alone to invade the territories of the greatest
military power in Europe. So Britain, in the interests of peace, proposes
to guarantee the inviolability of the frontiers of Germany as well as those
of France. But will these arrangements permanently stop war in Europe?
Those who have considered the question carefully have little hope that
they will. Mr. Garvin, the well-known editor of the London Observer,
in a recent issue of his paper, comes to the conclusion that a pact concluded
now would be utterly valueless in a few years, owing to the development of
new forces in Europe and especially in Central Europe. The pact to be
concluded now proceeds on the assumption that Germany is disarmed, and
will be so forever. It is, however, impossible to keep any country in that
state forever. Mr. Garvin writes:
"For future purposes you cannot disarm the Germans unless you knock
out their brains. You cannot stop thought and research. You cannot pre-
vent them from making tremendous progress in civil aviation and gaining a
national faculty and aptitude which could be rapidly turned to war purposes
if their chance ever came. You cannot prevent them from knowing at
least as much about chemical warfare as any of the armed nations. If we
think out the probabilities of the next twenty years, we must recognize that
there is bound some day to exist again throughout Europe a tolerable equality
either of disarmament or rearmament."
In addition to the impossibility of securing the lasting disarmament of
Germany, there is the growth in her population. While the population of
Germany is increasing by leaps and bounds, that of France is stationary. In
another generation, Germany will have far greater man power than any
other European nation. Other causes of war are also present. The close
of the Great War saw the rise of a group of small states in eastern Europe,
known as the Little Entente. These states, armed to the teeth, are the close
allies of France, and are extremely suspicious of Germany on the one side
and of Russia on the other. They, even more than France, want to see
Germany disarmed and dismembered forever. They are against the pro-
posed union of the German population of Austria with that of Germany
proper. The movement for German consolidation is, however, very strong
and is alone sufficient, if unreasonably provoked by opposing nations, to be
the germ of a new war.
Mr. Garvin believes that the present pacts and alliances are all alike tem-
porary bridges. They will be superseded, he thinks, by larger and more


  p. 2365 (#1329)                      

1925)
2365
Professional Notes
solid things. "The League itself is as yet an inadequate and incomplete
structure," he writes, "and the full League of Nations will be achieved in
time to save Europe's future.”
The future this school of thought conceives, however, is unfortunately
only the future of Europe. Those who follow this line of thought are
anxious to consolidate the nations of Europe, because they feel certain, as
is shown by the implication of their words rather than by the direct words
themselves, that a trial of strength is bound to take place between the white
and the colored nations if things are allowed to drift in the manner which
European nations allowed before and after the Great War.
Thus it is obviously clear that the probabilities of war in Europe are far
greater than of a struggle between Japan and the United States. Bywater
would have done the continent in which he is fated to have his being a
service if he had written a book on The Next European War, pointing out
the festering sores, and enabling the peoples, if not the statesmen of Europe,
to take such measures as will avert the snuffing out of Europe if she again
forgets sense and sanity and butchers herself to pieces in a welter of fiery
hatred.
Mr. Garvin shows a comprehension of this wider aspect of the problem
of European peace when he says that "Asiatic changes by themselves may
well make it advisable for America to cooperate with the rest of white
civilization.”
But, in our opinion, no pact or league that aims at preserving only the
peace of Europe, or peace among the white nations of the world, can have
any value in preserving the real peace of the world. A real League of
Nations, if it is to achieve something substantial, must not only include the
peoples of Europe, or the stronger powers, but must be thoroughly repre-
sentative of all the peoples of the world.
America, Let's Reason Together
By Honorable Daikichiro Tagawa, from the Japan Times and Mail
(Tokyo English-language daily), weekly edition, 26 August, The Living
Age, 17 October, 1925.-[The author, who has held high official posts in
his country, is the leading Christian publicist of Japan.)
I regret for the sake of both Japan and the United States that I should
have to write this article. I do not, however, think that the consequences
of the Immigration Law so far as they have been manifested are very
profound or even grave. Commercially no serious consequences on the
whole have yet been produced by the legislation, as may be seen from the
fact that Japan's imports from the United States during the last seven
months of 1924, immediately following the enactment of that law, and
despite the recent imposition of a "luxury tax" discouraging the purchase
of foreign goods in our country, nevertheless amounted to $143,000,000, as
compared with $146,000,000 the previous year.
When the Immigration Law was enacted the Japanese people were said
to be seriously indignant, and a movement to boycott American goods was
started, but the boycott did not last long. Although later the government
imposed the 100 per cent tariff mentioned on luxuries, the imports of such
articles mainly from the United States did not decrease to any appreciable
extent as compared with the corresponding period in 1923.
These facts do not mean, however, that the Immigration Law has not
made a very unhappy impression upon the Japanese. I do not wish to say
that this impression cannot be overcome, but the truth is that the feeling
of Japan toward the Americans has certainly not improved. This statement
might be confirmed by much evidence, but it is only necessary to say that if
Japan were to consider any nation her enemy it would be the United States.


  p. 2366 (#1330)                      

2366
(Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
This does not mean at all that the Japanese are ready to fight the Americans ;
there are few reckless enthusiasts who would cry for war, but it does mean
that a sentiment is entertained among many Japanese that the United States
is the only country that might turn into an enemy.
This sentiment is due not only to the Immigration Law but also to other
causes. Among these I may mention the following:
1. The Monroe Doctrine.
2. America's withdrawal from the League of Nations.
3. America's attitude toward China.
American militarism.
5. The Gentlemen's Agreement, which Japan was compelled to make.
6. The Navy Limitation Conference.
7. The feeling that Christian ideals are not as prevalent in the United
States as they are represented to be.
My observation is that all these causes work together to make the
Japanese fear that the Americans cannot be relied upon. Even before the
enactment of the Immigration Law the Japanese had long felt that the
Americans could not be trusted, because they were not real lovers of peace,
but rather selfish and arbitrary, and this sentiment has been confirmed by
the law in question.
The Immigration Law was therefore not the only cause for this un-
fortunate change of sentiment. Had it been for that reason alone, the
Japanese would hardly have been driven to such hostile feelings as were
exhibited at the time of the passing of the law. In fact, these other causes
are responsible mainly for the present hostile sentiment entertained by the
Japanese toward the Americans.
I do not mean to say that all Japanese people understand clearly the
reasons for the above mentioned prejudices. The masses of the people
do not know what the Monroe Doctrine is, nor what is the character of
the League of Nations. On the whole very little attention is paid by most
Japanese to these questions, but they have some vague ideas about them.
They understand that the Monroe Doctrine is a policy peculiar to the
United States, aiming at domination over the South American states. This
may not be given expression in so many words, but this is what they think.
At the same time that the United States does not like any other country
to encroach upon what is supposed to be her own sphere of influence through
her capitalistic power, she is constantly watching other countries with an
eye of jealousy and suspicion.
The Japanese further understand that although the United States wants
to maintain such a policy over the South American states, at the same
time she is energetically extending her influence over the Far East and the
South Seas—that is to say, over China and the Philippines. If the Monroe
Doctrine be justifiable on account of geographical conditions, a similar
doctrine ought to be applicable to the Far East and the South Seas. Other
powers might not recognize such an application, but the United States at
least should. She does not, however, recognize a Monroe Doctrine for
China, an “Asia for the Asiatics," nor does she admit of a similar right
for the Philippines, but is trying to compete with all the other powers while
at the same time insisting that the Monroe Doctrine be respected for
America.
Many Japanese think that America's withdrawal from the League of
Nations is a conclusive evidence of her selfishness. The League was first
proposed by her own President, the late Mr. Wilson. Other powers at first
hesitated, but later joined him in appreciation of his noble ideal. They did
so, not because they themselves thoroughly understood the plan, but rather
because they thought that the United States was fully prepared to uphold


  p. 2367 (#1331)                      

1925)
2367
Professional Notes
and develop the League which had been proposed by her own President,
representing as they thought the nation. But quite unaccountably the
United States withdraw, and so they think that she is unreliable in inter-
national dealings. They therefore think that America is a nation that does
not respect international interests or obligations for mutual cooperation.
The Washington Conference was another instance. They think that the
United States did not propose such a conference for the peace of the
world, nor of the Pacific, but for the purpose of destroying Japan's influence
over China. She persuaded Great Britain to force a disadvantageous ratio
upon the Japanese navy. The Americans are always trying to injure
Japan's interests, and to prevent her. from increasing her national power.
Such is the prevailing sentiment among the Japanese public.
Later on, the Americans gave great assistance to Japan at the time of the
earthquake, but the favorable impressions made thereby upon the Japanese
people were largely lost by the passing of the Immigration Law with its
"exclusion clause."
I admit frankly that various misconceptions color the observations and
sentiments which we now see among the Japanese. They are ignorant of
the facts; they are not sufficiently careful. They often lack fair judgment
and sound understanding, but the real problem is, what is to be done about
it, and my answer is as follows:
1. I think that the Immigration Law which absolutely excludes the
Japanese ought to be revised at once. Even if the law is revised so as to
admit Japanese immigrants according to the same quota as the Europeans,
the number of such Japanese immigrants would be only 146 a year. Through
such a small number of Japanese immigrants, American civilization, morale,
and labor could suffer little harm. Moreover, such revision would have the
great advantage of showing the Japanese that they were treated in the
same way as Europeans, and so of mitigating their antipathy to America.
By such a revision the Americans would gain much and lose nothing.
2. I think also that the United States ought to revise her Naturalization
Law in such a manner as to give the Japanese the right to obtain American
citizenship. My own opinion is that the Naturalization Law affects the
relations between Japan and the United States more seriously than the
Immigration Law does. I sincerely hope that, by the simultaneous revision
of the Immigration and the Naturalization Laws, the Japanese who want to
live in the United States permanently will be enabled to enjoy an American
life and become truly loyal citizens of the United States. I think there
are a large number of Japanese now resident in the United States who
would apply for citizenship if the law were revised.
3. In addition to the revision of these laws, it is my opinion that the
United States ought to admit Chinese immigrants and also give them citizen-
ship. If the United States continues to exclude the Chinese and deny them
citizenship, even if she changes her policy regarding the Japanese I do not
think the Japanese will welcome the revision of the laws for themselves
alone. In my view the United States is not fair in giving a discriminative
treatment to a certain nation or race as such, and hence my belief that the
Chinese should have the same treatment as the Japanese when the laws are
revised.
I hope that the revision of the Immigration Law and the Naturalization
Law will be made at an early date. If that is done, Japanese-American
relations will improve. At the same time we must remember that the
present sentiment which the Japanese have in regard to the Americans is
not exclusively due to the Immigration Law. Apart from the law in
question, the sentiment of respect and confidence among the Japanese toward
the Americans has been cooling down for many years. So long as this
attitude continues, the Japanese may find an opportunity to blame the


  p. 2368 (#1332)                      

2368
(Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Americans for something or other independently of the Immigration Law.
They will argue:
1. The United States withdrew from the League of Nations, which her
own representative had proposed.
2. The United States, in spite of her Monroe Doctrine, is extending her
influence over China and the Philippines.
3. The United States, while severely criticizing the European states
and Japan for their folly in keeping up expensive armaments, herself ex-
pends a great deal for her own armaments.
I might mention many other reasons, but these three alone will be suffi-
cient to show how inconsistent is the American national policy. The United
States is no longer considered a country of justice. Her policy is guided
by prejudice and self interest. The Americans do not care for the interests
of other nations or races, and their attitude is often unjust and arbitrary
Such is a common charge brought against the Americans, and I do not think
this criticism is peculiar to the Japanese, but rather that it is common among
the world public. Even I myself often find it extremely difficult to defend
the Americans against these charges. Such suspicion and censure against
the Americans are now widespread among the Japanese, and that sentiment
will inevitably find expression in action sooner or later. I had such appre-
hensions even before the enactment of the Immigration Law. Apart from
that legislation, international harmony between Japan and America has
long been strained.
The Japanese are rather simple-minded. When Commodore Perry first
knocked at the doors of the country for international intercourse, followed
by a host of Christian missionaries who preached justice and love, the
Japanese had no hesitation in believing that America was a nation of peace,
justice and love. This simple belief, however, has evidently been undermined
during the last sixty years by American actions quite at variance with these
noble ideals. The Americans, they say, have acted often in opposition to
peace, justice, and love, so that the Japanese who had placed unconditional
confidence in them have been sadly disappointed, not to say angered. The
remedy for these evils must be fundamental.
1. Some Japanese regard the United States as a Christian nation, but
American politics and diplomacy often depart from Christian principles and
doctrine.
2. Everyone admits that Christian justice and ideals are very noble and
elevated, but many Christians lack Christian character and superior per-
sonality. There is often a wide gap between words and deeds. The Ameri-
cans say that they are a Christian nation, but is there not danger of seeming
to imply by this that all Americans are Christians?
I sincerely hope that my American readers will listen with patience to
these frank words of counsel. While sending them this message, I, myself
a Japanese, examine myself carefully and speak to my fellow nationals as
follows:
1. I regret that Japan has sent so many emigrants ignorant of the
English language and American customs and thoughts. This was a very
great mistake, committed at the outset carelessly by the Japanese Government.
2. In case the Immigration Law is revised in such a manner as to admit
Japanese immigrants,—146, according to quota,-I think it necessary to
train Japanese properly before allowing them to go abroad. In the old days a
Japanese mother, when sending her daughter in marriage, used to teach
her that she should try to assimilate the traditional customs and manners
of the family she was to enter and should fully determine not to return
to her old home under any circumstances. Such ought to be the principle
to guide future emigrants.


  p. 2369 (#1333)                      

1925)
2369
Professional Notes
3. One might ask, did militarism originate in America to be followed by
Europe and Japan, or did it originate in Europe and Japan to be followed
by America ? I do not think it right to blame the United States alone for
her militarism. In this respect, also, the Japanese must take full respon-
sibility.
4. It cannot be doubted that the spirit and purpose of the Washington
Conference were genuine. As one result of that Conference, Japan has not
needed to increase her taxes, although neither has she reduced them. It is
foolish and shallow-minded of some Japanese to censure the United States
on account of the Washington Conference. I am extremely ashamed of
such Japanese.
5. In the fiscal year ending March, 1924, Japan decided upon a naval
budget for the construction of auxiliary warships, amounting to 368,860,000
yen, spread over a period of five years. Since the Washington Conference,
no other power which participated in it has made any such similar plan. I
sincerely regret that Japan alone should have violated the principle of the
Conference by such expansion of the navy.
6. I was very sorry that some representative Christians in Japan should
have advanced the view that American missionaries ought to go home, when
in the United States ever since the promulgation of the Immigration Law
the representatives of American Christians have consistently protested
against the law and exerted their best efforts for its revision. I was sorry
I could not stop the movement against the American missionaries.
Many Japanese, therefore, do believe that the Americans are an egoistic
nationalthough there are exceptions like former Ambassador Woods, and
numerous fair-minded and faithful Christian workers. As the Japanese
are equally egoistic, there is danger of collision between the two unless
they control and humble themselves. Such self-control will be necessary,
not only for the two countries, but also for the world at large. Japan
ought to be on her guard, and the United States, too, against egoism. For
this purpose the Christians in both countries ought to exert the utmost
efforts; the opportunity is unique in history.
The Japanese Christians are small in number as well as in influence.
Nor is the United States a Christian nation entirely. I think the relations
between the two countries will improve when Christians, both Japanese and
American, evangelize more widely among their own people and gain a
wider influence. Then the Immigration Law will lose its raison d'être as a
matter of course.
The Immigration Law may be considered to have produced one good
result if on its account the people in both countries recognize the need of
deeper introspection and of giving up egoistic prejudice; of manifesting a
true Christian spirit and of helping each other in the maintenance of peace
on the Pacific and in the world at large. The legislation in question will
then bring about good fruit instead of grave consequences. It will entirely
depend upon our own efforts whether the consequences will be bad or good.
I pray to God that He may help us to work toward this great ideal and to
accomplish what lies nearest to the heart of all sincere Christians in every
land-namely, the peace of the world.


  p. 2370 (#1334)                      

2370
(Dec.
V. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
UNITED STATES
VESSELS UNDER CONSTRUCTION, UNITED STATES NAVY-PROGRESS AS
OF SEPTEMBER 30, 1925.-Official Bulletin.
Type
Number and
Name
Contractor
Per cent of Completion
Oct. 1, 1925
Total 1 On Ship
Probable
date of
Comple-
tion
12, 15/26
| 114 1/26
1215/26
| 4/ 1/26
AIRPLANE CARRIERS
Lexington ...... Beth. SB Corp. (Fore River). I
Saraloga....... New York S.B. Corp........ 71.2 70.6
AUXILIARIES
Holland ....... | Puget Sound Navy Yard.... 77.5 74.8
SUBMARINES
S-47.......... Elect. Boat Co. (Quincy).... Comm. 9/16/25
FLEET SUBMARINES
V-2 (SF5)...... Portsmouth Navy Yd. Comm. 9/26/25
V-3 (SF6).....
Portsmouth Navy Yd..
86. 1 84.8
V-4 (SM1)..... Portsmouth Navy Yd..
16.6 L 14.6
V-5 (SC1).....
Portsmouth Navy Yd.
V-6 (SC2). .... Mare Island Navy Yd.
2/
4
1/26
1/27
1
.
Authorized but not under construction or contract-
Authorized by Act of August 29, 1916. No funds as yet provided.
Destroyers (12) Nos. 348-359.
Transport (i) No. 2.
Fleet Submarines (3) Nos. 169-171.
Neff Submarine (1) No. 108.
Authorized by Act of December 18, 1925. Funds have been provided by
the Act of March 4, 1925, for starting construction of two of the Light
Cruisers and all six Gunboats.
Light Cruisers (8) Nos. 24-31.
River Gunboats (6) Nos. 43-48.
The Air Board Personnel
Aviation, 5 October, 1925.—The newspapers have given a large amount
of space to hearings before the President's Air Board, but they have not
told the air people what they really want to know. The question that is
invariably asked is as to the possibility of this committee's report being
reactionary or whitewashing. If an observer at the hearings with the
point of view of airmen can be relied on, the work of the committee will
be neither.
Consider the personnel of the committee first. Eight are Republicans,
one Democrat. That fact precludes any severe cross examination of mem-
bers of the administration. But by the same reasoning, it puts on the
members the responsibility of framing an air policy for the government
which the President can recommend, the public approve, and Congress
accept. Of course, such an ideal outcome is not possible, as will be seen
from other facts concerning the committee. As a political move, made at
a time when the country was aghast at Colonel Mitchell's assaults on the
War and Navy Departments it has proved to be a great success. To Sec-
retary of War Davis will go the credit.


  p. 2371 (#1335)                      

1925]
2371
Professional Notes
Another very important point to be noted about the committee is that all
opinions appear to be represented. So set and diverse are these at first
glance, it would appear almost a hopeless task for the members ever to
agree on any program.
There is Dwight W. Morrow of J. P. Morgan and Company, a financier
who admits that his knowledge of aviation has been limited to what he has
read and heard. There is Judge Arthur C. Denison of Grand Rapids,
Michigan, who pleads guilty to no knowledge of aviation except what he has
acquired during the hearings.
Judge Denison at first was the man of mystery. His fellow-members
waxing confidential immediately prior to the opening hearing could not
understand why the President had named the Judge as a member of their
board. They learned the reason.
Judge Denison, according to members of his profession, possesses one
of the keenest legal minds on the Federal bench. On many occasions during
the inquiry he has been able to clear up a vague or technically involved reply
from a witness by putting a simple question, usually through Chairman
Morrow.
It is Morrow's position that has lent the hearings almost the same dignity
and atmosphere of importance that would have prevailed had the President
himself taken the chair. Morrow has been the chief executive's friend since
college days. That, coupled with his recognized ability and his financial
connections, has established the entire investigation as beyond the general
run of such hearings,
Senator Bingham is the only pilot on the board. He was a trained
civilian aviator before the war, became a colonel and organized the flying
training schools, then served in France, and came home to win his present
position as one of the political figures of the country. During the last
summer, the Senator flew on a tour of inspection of the military and naval
flying fields. On his return he called upon the President.
He is looked upon as a sort of special prosecutor, representing the chief
executive and the general public. The old generals and admirals recognize
in him their best informed opponent on the board. They have read his
vitriolic attacks against them in his book, An Explorer in the Air Service.
The majority of flying men accept his idea of creating air branches having
the same status as the Marine Corps.
Another aviation expert on the board is Howard Coffin, of Detroit, presi-
dent of the National Air Transport. It was Coffin who conducted the
industrial survey in 1916 which resulted in the formation of the Council
of National Defense. He has repeatedly devoted his time and parts of his
large personal fortune to the development of Federal aviation.
Coffin was the first president and principal supporter of the National
Aeronautic Association and has sponsored many attempts to put over avia-
tion in a practical manner. He is an enthusiastic exponent of air power
as the great national asset in war or peace.
While those two members of the board are looked upon as opposing the
present system in military and naval affairs, there are two other members
of the board whose presence cheers the advocates of the present policy-
Major General James G. Harbord, retired, and Rear Admiral Frank F.
Fletcher, retired.
General Harbord, now president of the Radio Corporation of America,
exhibits a kindly attitude toward the general staff and the military system
he understands so thoroughly. When Harbord was Assistant Chief of Staff
under General Pershing he investigated Mitchell and found him not to his
liking. The Harbord-Mitchell relations have developed into one of the
many personal feuds that are bobbing up in the course of the hearings.
Admiral Fletcher is a battleship man by training and experience. He is
considered one of the best officers ever retired from the service. He was one


  p. 2372 (#1336)                      

2372
(Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
of the relatively few rear admirals to win the post as commander of the
fleet. Therefore the Navy has a friend on the board whom it can trust to
preserve its interests.
Besides Chairman Morrow and Judge Denison three others may be
classified as neutrals—with reservations. Dr. William F. Durand is presi-
dent of the Society of Mechanical Engineers and a member of the National
Advisory Committee for Aeronautics composed of Army, Navy, and civilian
technical specialists.
The Air Service enthusiasts say that Dr. Durand has always been a
sincere believer in the big navy idea, which would place him with the
advocates of the present policy.
The same is true of the two Congressmen on the board. Representative
Carl Vinson of Georgia is a Democrat and a member of the House Naval
Affairs Committee. He was chosen so that he may guide his party col-
leagues when the findings of this board go before Congress for action. He
ranks as a thorough examiner into all questions affecting the national de-
fense. At times he betrays no little irritation at the implication of witnesses
that conditions might be better were Congress to appropriate more money.
Representative James S. Parker of Salem, New York, is chairman of the
House Committee on Interstate and Foreign Commerce and one of the
Republican leaders. His committee will be called upon to pass on many of
the recommendations to be sumitted after the inquiry.
With this personnel, the Army and Navy will find that statements such
as have been made before congressional committees will not be acceptable.
General Hines discovered this the first day, when he was asked so many
questions that he could not answer without evasion, that his testimony was
generally considered a justification for some of the criticism that has been
made of the General Staff.
The Navy has, through the poor guidance of Secretary Wilbur, been
placed in a position that will be more difficult to maintain when verification
is asked of some of the statements made. Particularly is this true of
Admiral Strauss' attack on the British Air Force and his reports of the
British battleship Agamemnon. If someone does not challenge him it will
be surprising. The muzzling of Navy officers has been in sharp contrast
to the freedom of opinions expressed by the Army officers.
It must not be overlooked that the President's Air Board report will not
settle anything. It is merely to lay a foundation for the investigation of
the Army and Navy by Congress.
The Mitchell Plan
Aviation, 12 October, 1925.- What will the plan I propose cost and how
will it be created from what we have at the present time—in other words,
briefly, how will it be handled ?
Navy
The Air Service in the Navy can stay just the way it is. Its aeronautical
personnel, except those who desire to transfer to the Air Force, can stay
where they are. Their numbers, however, should be entirely regulated
by the number of airplanes that the Navy actually carries to sea and oper-
ates. In addition to this, there should be sufficient reserves both of per-
sonnel and equipment
On a war basis, for the airplane carriers, Saratoga and Lexington, an
estimate of 150 planes, 75 each, can be made. Added to this, 50 planes
might be carried by all other craft, or a total of 200 planes for the Navy.
With a 50 per cent reserve, the whole would amount to 300 planes. The
Navy should be made to show specifically what can be carried to sea on
seacraft, as a basis for their organization.


  p. 2373 (#1337)                      

1925]
2373
Professional Notes
All airships should be handled by the Air Force, carrying Army or Navy
observers when necessary. The whole airship question must be completely
overhauled and not rushed into quickly again without exact reasons for
their use and development, and then using and developing them for what is
provided.
Air Force Schools
All basic flying training and aerial combat instruction for naval aero-
nautical personnel should be conducted at Air Force Schools. When they
fight in the air, they should fight under Air Force regulations. Their
finishing training on the airplane carriers and other ships of the Navy
should be carried out by the Navy and in any manner the Navy desires.
In other words, it is distinctly up to the Navy itself to develop its aviation
for work on the high seas. The Congress would judge what kind and how
many airplanes, battleships, or other vessels are required for the Navy in
the general National Defense scheme.
The amount of aeronautical personnel necessary for these purposes would
be about 10 officers in naval headquarters at Washington; about 230 flying
officers and about 200 observers and about 10 non-navigating personnel
for every airplane, or about 2,000 men. There should be a reserve not on
duty of about 50 per cent for the pilots and 50 per cent for the ground men.
This, it would seem, is the maximum that our Navy will need, under any
ordinary conditions for work at sea, according to the present system. War
casualties in Naval aviation will not be high because they will not be
engaged in constant combats with the enemy in an air war. They will only
be in combat when hostile fleets come together, which in fact may be never,
and if they do come together and the airplane carriers are sunk, there is
no further use for them until other airplane carriers are obtained. In time
of peace all naval air units should be at 50 per cent strength.
Satisfying the Navy
This system gives the Navy no field for objections whatever, as they
would have as part of their own organization all aircraft that go to sea
in ships; on the other hand, it would stop the Navy from trying to create
a land air service, which is not only no business of theirs, but is directly
contrary to the spirit of the present law of the United States, which
specifies : "All aircraft not attached to fleets but operating from land bases
should be handled by the Army" or words to that effect. This, under the
program suggested, could be changed to the Air Force instead of the Army,
except for the Air Service which forms a part of the Army.
Army
The Army needs a certain Air Service for what might be termed its
domestic economy-that is, for reconnoitering the ground in front of it,
for regulating and adjusting the fire of its missile throwing weapons, such
as cannon, howitzers, mortars, and other firearms, and for maintaining
liaison or keeping communication between its parts when all other means
have failed.
An Air Unit for the Army
Let the Army determine just how many of these units they need and
where they need them, then take the money for them out of their own appro-
priation, get their airplanes and equipment and use them. It will amount
to about seven squadrons in the United States, one in Hawaii, one in
Panama, and one in the Philippines. Based on about 20 airplanes to the
Squadron, this will make 200 airplanes; 50 per cent reserve would make
100 airplanes additional. There should be about 230 pilots and 230 ob-
servors for the Army and jo ground men to the airplane, making a total of


  p. 2374 (#1338)                      

2374
[Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
about 2,000 men. In time of peace all army air units in the United States
should be at 50 per cent strength, abroad at 100 per cent.
This contemplates that there be four complete modern infantry divisions
and one cavalry division in the United States. These divisions should
be distributed so that two of them would be available in the area Chicago-
Bangor, Maine-Chesapeake Bay; one in the middle states; one on the
Pacific Coast; one on the Mexican frontier, and one cavalry division on the
Mexican frontier.
The Harbor Defense Artillery could use one squadron on the Atlantic
and one on the Pacific. They could provide themselves with whatever
balloons they needed and operate them.
Air Force
The cadre or frame on which the Air Force in the United States should
be built should contemplate the use in a great war of a total of about
2,400 airplanes, two thirds of which should be pursuit and about one third
bombardment, in which some attack aviation is included. There should be
100 per cent reserves provided for.
This organization is necessary on account of what may be brought against
us in the future. This contemplates that one brigade of 600 ships will cover
the eastern part of the United States; one brigade of 600 ships will cover
the western part of the United States, and one air division of 1,200 ships will
be stationed so that it can be shifted either way or both ways and even to
our insular and outlying possessions instantly in case of necessity.
Supplementing this, there should be seventeen flights of six airplanes
each covering our Atlantic and Pacific Coasts. This gives a patrol and
surveillance element for every 200 miles. I wish that it be distinctly held
in mind that the stationing and distribution of air units in case of war
or even in peace does not involve the tremendous construction work that
is necessary for land forces or water forces. Fields for operations can be
prepared for occupancy within a few hours. Airplanes themselves in the
future will be constructed so that they need little or no shelter under service
conditions. The comparatively small number of men that handle them
can be easily housed and taken care of in an efficient manner. With a proper
system, unencumbered by useless red tape, the whole thing can be put into
operation with great rapidity.
Plans for Mobilization
To begin with, we can make a distribution of units in accordance with
what we have at the present time, pending the gradual development of the
plan, as follows:
In case of war, each of the following six groups would provide for the
formation of three additional groups, either at its own station or at other
points in the area assigned to it. This would make a total of twenty-four
groups, the number required for our Air Force of one division and two
separate brigades.
Langley Field, eventually to be moved near Philadelphia : 1-Bombard-
ment Group
Selfridge Field, near Detroit: 1-Pursuit Group.
Kelly Field, San Antonio, Texas, which draws on the area of Fort Worth,
Dallas, and Houston: 1-Attack Group.
Chanute Field, Champaign, Illinois, eventually to be placed near Chicago,
drawing on the Chicago area: 1-Bombardment Group.
Mather Field, Sacramento, California, drawing on the San Francisco
area and center of California : 1-Bombardment Group,


  p. 2375 (#1339)                      

1925)
2375
Professional Notes
Rockwell Field, San Diego, California, drawing on Los Angeles and
Southern California area: 1-Pursuit Group.
New York (Mitchel Field): 1–Local Defense Group.
Air Force in Insular Possessions
Panama-Provision for 100 planes for local defense. Peace time, 50
per cent strength.
Hawaiian Islands—300 planes Air Force, 100 local defense. Peace time,
50 per cent strength.
Philippine Islands—no Air Force units.
Alaska-in time of peace, 50 airplanes for development work, establishing
airways and studying aeronautical needs of the country.
Schools
Langley Field Operation School, for training staff and commanding
officers of Air Force units, for offensive work against hostile air forces,
against hostile sea craft and against hostile land targets.
San Antonio, Texas-Special schools of application for pursuit, attack,
and bombardment aviation, and for Air Force surveillance, observation and
photographic work. A Primary Flying School for the training of officers
from the Army and Navy and such Air Force officers as may be designated
to take the course. The bulk of the primary training should be carried out
at the stations of the major units.
The training of mechanics and inspectors should take place in factories
where engines and aircraft are built; in civil institutions and in the en-
gineering school maintained with the Engineering and Experimental Section
at Dayton, Ohio.
The Reserve
All reserve personnel should be attached permanently to some active
unit, and required to fly an average of about four hours a month and to
turn out for maneuvers with the units for a month's training each year.
All technical specialists carried on a staff basis not eligible to command,
of course are not included in this.
Supply organization should consist of depots in the same locations as
at present : Middletown, Pennsylvania, for the eastern part of the United
States; Fairfield, Ohio, for the central states; San Antonio, Texas, for
the Southwest; temporarily, San Diego for the Pacific—to be eventually
removed to Reno, Nevada, at a later date; at Dayton, Ohio—the Engineer-
ing and Experimental Section of the Air Force.
Now, how would this system work out?
Peace
In time of peace, the Secretary of Air could handle all matters direct
with the units, or, in case he saw fit, he could create another organization
to facilitate administration.
The active air units should handle the organization and training of all
combat personnel; the schools, the preparation of the personnel. The
supply units, the organization and training of all specialists and supply
personnel, the system for the production of aircraft and accessories, their
transportation, storage, and issue, and keeping up to date supply plans
to be used in case of a great emergency, all to be prescribed and co-
ordinated from the headquarters at Washington, D.C.
War
Strategical
In time of war, the Department of Air at Washington, D.C., should
be charged with the preparation, supply, and transportation to the tactical


  p. 2376 (#1340)                      

2376
[Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Air Force of all active Air Force elements, personnel, and material.
This organization should be permanent and fixed and be the matrix on
which the Air Force is built.
It should be divided into four territorial departments, as follows:
Eastern Department, Headquarters, Philadelphia; Central Department, Head-
quarters, Chicago; Western Department, Headquarters, Sacramento, Cali-
fornia; Southern Department, Headquarters, San Antonio, Texas.
Tactical
Air Force Tactical Headquarters—Beside the commander of the armed
forces of the United States and under him responsible for the tactical
cmployment of the Air Force and its use and coordination in any given
operations. There should be an intimate liaison between him and the De-
partment of the Air. This plan will positively eliminate every bad feature
that we had in the last war. Its only disturbing element would be in
a lack of appreciation by the Department of Air for the wants of the
Tactical Air Force. This, I am convinced, with officers trained in the
Air Force, will not exist in a great emergency.
Costs
Recapitulation
Peace
Planes
I 50
NAVY
ARMY .................
Officers Men
220 1,000
250 1.000
......................
.......................
150
470
2,000
1,200
6,000
1.000
8
|
500
500
Total Army and Navy .....
300
AIR FORCE
Units in United States ....
600
New York Local Defense Unit .
Airship Installations
Lakehurst
Scott Field .....
Schools
Langley Field .
San Antonio, Texas ....
Experimental Section, Dayton, Ohio
Supply Services ........
Insular Possessions
Panama Local Defense Unit ..
50
Hawaiian Islands
200
Alaska ..................................... 50
500
!!
50
2,000
1,000
6,000
250
....
50
200
100
500
2,000
500
............... 1,000
2,200
20,500
Total Air Force ....
GRAND TOTAL ......
.................... 1,300
2,670
22,500
Assuming that $2,500 per man be taken as the cost of the Air Force per
year, which is based on the estimate for the Lassiteer Army Project
now known as Project No. 4, (incidentally the War Department Project
is for 4,000 officers and 25,000 enlisted men) the total cost of the Military
Air Service would be about $63,500,000. Add to this, $500,000 for the
maintenance of the office of the Department of Air including the Under-
Secretary of Air and the assistant Secretary of Air. It would give us
about $64,000,000.
The Army estimate for Project No. 4 is about $75,000,000. I recommend
that the Curry Bill with modifications to meet the recommendations con-


  p. 2377 (#1341)                      

1925)
2377
Professional Notes
tained above be used as the basis for legislation for a Department of the Air.
Of the above, the Air Force itself in time of peace, exclusive of the
Army and Navy, would be composed of 1,000 service planes, 2,200 officers
and 20,500 men. These planes would be ready to take the offensive and
fight and are not mere auxiliaries of some other force or paper descriptions
of what planes might be. No numbers have been put down for training
planes, as the proportionate number of one plane for twenty men is covered
in the general estimate.
Now, let us take a look at what our entire national defense scheme
would be in case we put the general plan I have suggested into operation.
First, we would have a Secretary of National Defense, charged with
coordinating the Army, Navy, and Air Force: the Army, charged with
the defense of land areas; the Navy, charged with the defense of sea
areas; the Air Force, having jurisdiction over air areas. (The Army and
Navy would have with them, as a permanent part of their own organization,
the air services necessary for their own domestic use.)
These three forces, land, sea, and air, would balance each other, something
in the way our federal legislative and judicial departments do in our civil
government under the President. There could neither be a tie vote as
between the Army and Navy or an interlocking directory against aviation.
Influences of the Scheme
The Air Force would oppose any spreading out of naval activity on the
land and would keep pushing them out to sea. It would stand for the
cutting down of Navy yards, except where actually necessary for the
maintenance of our navies, whether they be surface or sub-surface. It
would stand for the cutting down of Coast Artillery except in important
places for the defense of cities that could be fired into. It would stand
for a reasonable development of anti-aircraft artillery and appurtenances
to be used as a part of the general scheme for defense against aircraft. It
would stand for having an adequate army, a mobile army, a well equipped,
and well appointed army, which would absolutely insure holding of all land
areas in which it operates.
Coordination of Services
To sum up its influence—it would be to insure the defensive integrity
of the United States as a self contained unit.
Our country dominates in its ability to create air forces, in comparison
with any other nation in the world. Both the Army and the Navy should
subscribe to this general scheme from a standpoint of service to the
country, and the benefit of all. If they did not, the Secretary of National
Defense would act as judge in any discussions arising between them and
coordinate the services. If this was impossible each branch could state its
case with equal freedom.
Each service should freely criticize the other in every way it sees fit,
but such criticism should be constructive, giving the reason for it and
their remedies. Under these conditions, there would be an accord in a
comparatively short time-certainly in the minds of the people as to the
best means of national defense for our country.
It would hold one man, the Secretary of National Defense, responsible
under the President for the national defense of the whole country and
under him, he could hold the under-secretaries definitely responsible for the
Army, Navy, and the Air.
The Aeronautical Crisis
The Scientific American, November, 1925.-It would be fatal error to
abandon lighter-than-air navigation because of the Shenandoah tragedy.


  p. 2378 (#1342)                      

2378
(Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
To do so would be to lose all the capital, technical knowledge, and work
which the Government, through the Navy, has already put into the airship,
and abandon the development of airship travel to other nations. This
would be to put the stigma of faint-heartedness and failure upon the
American people, who have ever prided themselves upon their initiative,
mechanical genius, and courage.
In the midst of the shock, bewilderment, and grief for the dead in the
Shenandoah disaster, the nation should preserve its self-control and patience
and await the results of the broad investigation of the very able commission,
appointed by the President, and await also the technical findings of the
naval experts, who are piecing together the experiences of the survivors
and gathering the valuable lessons which can be learned from a study of
the wreck of the ship itself.
We believe that apart from its value as a naval scout, which has yet
to be fully determined, the airship has an assured future for transatlantic
and other transoceanic travel. For such service it must be built of even
greater dimensions than before. The bigger the ship, the greater, relatively,
is the amount of weight that can be spared for the hull structure. Hence,
it follows that the big ship is relatively stronger, and better able to resist
those bending and twisting stresses which broke the Shenandoah into
three separate parts. Furthermore, if the risks of inflammable hydrogen
can, by careful and preventive design, be eliminated, and both the Germans
and the British claim that they can (the British, indeed, are now building
two hydrogen-filled ships of more than double the size of the Shenandoah)
there will be from 7 to 10 per cent more lift obtained from a given volume
of gas. Here, also, there would be more weight available for insuring the
strength of the hull structure. Indeed, we shall not be surprised if in-
vestigation shows that in a hydrogen-filled ship of 5,000,000 cubic feet
capacity, it is possible to provide a double hull and thus secure a great
increase of strength, such as is given to the merchant ship by its double
bottom and to the warship by its complete double hull below the waterline.
Furthermore, there is but little risk of encountering at sea destructive
vertical line storms of the kind that occur over the land. This fact, coupled
with greater strength of the larger ships of the future and the more
complete development of weather forecasting, makes the problem of ocean
airship travel fairly sure of solution in the not far distant future.
In the Los Angeles, our Navy Department possesses a ship well suited
for testing the commercial development of airships. She has made a
successful crossing of the Atlantic; she has sailed to Bermuda and anchored
for a whole day in a 40-mile gale to the mast of the Patoka and then re-
turned to her home port at Lakehurst. The Lakehurst hangar should be
continued in service and the Navy should be permitted to continue to make
experimental voyages for the gathering of data. Furthermore, our aero-
nautical officers, both those who design and those who fly the ships, should
be granted the necessary appropriations to enable them to embody the
structural lessons taught by the loss of the Shenandoah in a larger ship
designed as a scout and suitable for commercial travel across the Atlantic.
That such travel will come we do not doubt. America has, in abundance,
the necessary wealth to develop commercial airship navigation. The question
is, does she also possess the necessary courage and persistency?
Let us be fair to the airship. We did not cease to build long-span bridges
because the Quebec Bridge fell down; we did not countermand all orders
for large steamships when an iceberg ripped open the Titanic and sent her
to the bottom; nor did we cease to lay tracks and build locomotives because
of the frequent and tragic collisions in our early railroad history. So, in
the present case, we must above all things avoid panic legislation. It was
an accident of the weather and not a defect in the Shenandoah that caused
her collapse; it was another accident of the weather which prevented the


  p. 2379 (#1343)                      

1925]
2379
Professional Notes
PN-9 from reaching Honolulu. In the one case the ship, for the want
of full radio weather forecasts, ran right into a storm of which she had
no warning, a storm, furthermore, of the kind which the designers of the
ship had warned would probably destroy her—which it did. In the other
case, the favorable trade winds which were relied upon to help the PN-9
on her long trip simply petered out—a most unusual occurrence—and
instead of blowing with her, the winds, during the later part of the course,
were contrary, and by holding the ship back caused her to run out of fuel.
It was the weather, we repeat, and not any structural fault either in the
Shenandoah or the PN-9 that defeated them.
Let us keep our heads in this matter and not be misled by the latest out-
burst of Colonel Mitchell which may be regarded as an altogether insignifi-
cant incident in the great question of the future of American aviation. The
only feature in Colonel Mitchell's attitude that is not insignificant is his
glaring indiscretion and the shameless example of insubordination which,
as high ranking military officer, he has given to the country at the very
time when resistance to authority is a growing menace among the young
people of America. It is not Colonel Mitchell's silly outburst which has
caused the President to appoint a special commission. This was done
because the loss of the Shenandoah has rendered necessary a dispassionate
inquiry such as will now be made.
AVIATION
Pulitzer Trophy Race
Aviation, 19 October, 1925.-With the finish of the John L. Mitchell
race, the crowd, which had considerably grown during the earlier part of
the afternoon, waited expectantly for the Pulitzer Race, the great event
of the whole meet. The atmosphere was clearing and the clouds, which,
during the earlier part of the day, hung like a solid blanket over the sky,
had commenced to break up. This was a very fortunate thing, for a bad
haze would have proved a great obstacle in piloting the high speed planes
entered in the speed classic event. The race was scheduled to start at
3:00 P.M., but both the Army and the Navy Curtiss racers were wheeled out
to the starting line at least half an hour before that time.
The timers, apparently realizing the care with which these planes had
to be treated, were not strict as to the exact starting time of the race. The
two Curtiss racers were each equipped with high compression Curtiss type
V1400 engines, said to be as nearly alike in performance as it was possible
to secure. These were being given a final test while the planes stood at
the starting line, with a view also to warming them up for the race.
The four planes entered, in addition to the Curtiss racers, were two
Curtiss pursuits piloted by Lieutenants Cuddihy and Norton of the Navy,
and a PW8 and Pi piloted by Captain Cook and Lieutenant Dawson, re-
spectively. Owing to the entry of six planes, and the possibility of trouble
resulting from the hazard caused by the continual overtaking of the slower
planes by the racers, it was decided by the Race Committee to divide the
contest into two heats, and thus permit the two fastest planes to fly the
course unhindered.
At shortly after 3 P.M., the first plane took off. It was Lieutenant Al
Williams, Aying the Navy Curtiss racer. His exact time was 3:14:26. He
made a very smooth take-off and flew around the field for a few minutes
warming up his engine.
Shortly afterward, at 3:16:39, the Army plane took off, piloted by
Lieutenant Cyrus Bettis. By this time, Williams had decided to start of on
the course, and, accordingly, approached the field from a far corner and,
flying on full throttle, passed the timer's stand and the home pylon, being
checked off by Otis Porter, chief timer.


  p. 2380 (#1344)                      

2380
[Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
PULITZER TROPHY RACE
200 Kilometers-4 Laps. Winner's Time, 29 Min. 56.9 Sec.
Pilot
Plane
Motor
Ist Lt. Cyrus Bettis
Lt. A. J. Williams
2d Lt. L. H. Dawson
ist Lt. H. J. Norton
Capt. H. W. Cook
Lt. G. T. Cuddihy
* Dropped out.
Curtiss Racer Army
Curtiss Racer Navy
Curtiss Pi Army
Curtiss Pursuit Navy
Curtiss PW8 Army
Curtiss Pursuit Navy
Curtiss V1400 1600
Curtiss V1400 600
Curtiss Di2
Curtiss D12
Curtiss D12
Curtiss D12
Total Time
Lap Time
1. 2. 3. 4. 1. 2. 3. 4.
(147.8 248.6 248.7 248.975 247.8 249.4 248.7 249.97
243.7 242.9 242.4 241.695 243.7 242.I 241.4 243.66
170.3 170.1 169.9 169.9 / 170.3 170.0 169.5 169.8
169.3 169.1 167.2 168.8 169.3 168.9 163.4 173.8
167.0 165.5 167.2 167.4 167.0 167.3 167.4 167.8
165.2 165.5 165.3
165.2 165.8 165.0


  p. 2381 (#1345)                      

1925]
2381
Professional Notes
The spectators had been expecting a close and thrilling race between the
two Curtiss planes of which so much had been heard but were to be dis-
appointed on this account, for Williams and Bettis crossed the starting
line at such long intervals that all spirit of a race was entirely lost, the
two planes going around the course several miles apart. They flew at ap-
proximately 300 feet all the time. One very striking feature of the start
of each plane as it crossed the line was the absence of the customary dive
in an endeavor to gain excess speed. This, it will be recalled, was forbidden
in this race by the National Aeronautical Association after the Dayton
races last year, when steep diving over the starting line in the Pulitzer
race resulted in the collapse of Captain Burt Skeel's plane. Under the new
ruling this year the airplanes all approached the timer's stand in horizontal
Aight.
• Another very noticeable feature observed as the Curtiss racers passed over
the crowd on each lap was the considerable reduction in noise in this year's
planes, the propellers making far less noise than those of the PW8's. With
such high powered engines at the new Curtiss V 1400 and the high revolutions
at which these engines run, this silencing is quite an interesting achievement.
The first lap made by Bettis was in excess of the record general average
speed for this contest, which was 243.67 m.p.h. made at St. Louis in 1923.
Williams' speed was also greater than this average, though by only a small
margin.
The race, owing to the distance which separated the planes, had lost all
recognition as such and resolved itself into a straightforward speed trial.
As it progressed it was noticed that Bettis was beating his own speed at
each lap, whereas just the opposite was the case with Williams, whose
successive laps were getting slower with the exception of the last in which
his speed for that lap reached 243.66 m.p.h., or just under that for his first
lap. However, his total time for the course, as a whole, was still going
down, as will be seen from the table of speeds.
Lieutenant Bettis' speed at the end of three laps had reached 248.7 m.p.h.,
virtually assuring a new closed circuit record, while Williams' speed at
this lap was only 242.4 m.p.h. At the close of the race, four laps, Bettis
had reached 248.975 m.p.h. and Williams 241.695 m.p.h. Thus, not only did
Bettis win the Pulitzer Trophy for 1925, but, in doing so, he had set up a
new world's speed record for a closed circuit. On crossing the line in the
last lap, both took their planes high into the air and came around the out-
skirts of the field, landing and taxiing up to the enclosures.
At this moment, the four planes forming the second heat went off to
compete for third place in the race. There was far more of the element of
a race in the second heat, since the planes, a Pi and PW8 piloted by Lieu-
tenant Dawson and Captain Cook of the Army Air Service, and two Curtiss
pursuits flown by Lieutenants Norton and Cuddihy of the Navy, went off in
close succession and chased each other at close quarters during the entire
race.
As the planes started on their third lap, Dawson in the Pi, which was
faster than the others, was leading with Norton and Cuddihy following
closely and Cook coming up fourth. It was interesting to note that the
PW8's flown by Norton and Cuddihy were the same ones flown in the
Mitchell Trophy race earlier in the afternoon, but from the start they com-
menced making much better speed than in the earlier race. Lieutenant
Norton was piloting No. 50 at a speed 8 m.p.h. faster than the speed at
which Matthews won the Mitchell Trophy. This fact was undoubtedly due
to the difference in the length of the laps on the two races. The Mitchell
Trophy course was twelve miles around, as compared with the 31.07 miles
of the Pulitzer course. The former race, therefore, necessitated more and
sharper turns than in the latter race and the resultant speeds for the two
courses would differ accordingly.


  p. 2382 (#1346)                      

2382
[Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Lieutenant Dawson still maintained a good lead as the four pursuit planes
started on their final lap. He was followed by Norton while Cuddihy was
compelled, by engine trouble, to drop out. Captain Cook, by this time, was
at least a mile behind. The heat ended with Lieutenant Dawson finishing
first, Lieutenant Norton a close second, and Captain Cook coming in third,
a few seconds later. Lieutenant Dawson's speed was 169.9 mp.h., and
Lieutenant Norton, flying a Curtiss pursuit, made 168.8 m.p.h. The speed
differences resulting from the different lengths of the courses of the
Mitchell Trophy race and the Pulitzer race are apparent when it is recalled
that the same type of plane as that flown by Norton in the latter race made
only 161.5 m.p.h. in the former.
The somewhat disappointing speeds made by the new Curtiss racers,
in the Pulitzer Trophy race, may be attributed very largely to both the
shape of the course and the windy weather which prevailed. The haze
commenced to lift as the race drew to a conclusion and, as the two Curtiss
racers came up to the enclosures, the sun began to come out and afforded
a small army of photographers opportunity to get good pictures of the
victors.
Progress of Civil Aviation (British)
Engineering, 2 October, 1925.—The annual report on civil aviation, which
has just been issued, is of particular interest on this occasion, since it
covers the first year's working of Imperial Airways, Limited, formed, it
will be remembered, from four separate companies previously operating
aerial transport services between this country and the Continent. The
company, which is to receive a total government subsidy of $1,000,000 spread
over a period of ten years, undertook to fly a minimum of 1,000,000 miles
per annum, except in the first four years of its existence, during which the
minimum for any one year might be 800,000 miles, provided that a total of
4,000,000 miles have been flown at the end of the first four years. In
addition, the company undertook, as a minimum, to operate efficient trans-
port services between London and Paris, London and Brussels, London and
Amsterdam, and Southhampton and the Channel Islands.
Some delay occurred in opening the services in April, 1924, and the
Channel Islands service has only operated spasmodically throughout the
year covered by the report, but on the other services mentioned, with their
extensions, the total mileage flown during the year ended March 31, 1925,
amounted to 825,525, reaching a maximum of 146,820 miles in the single
month of July, 1924. The durability of British aircraft, and the care taken
in the matters of inspection and maintenance are well shown by the fact
that one Handley-Page machine and two of the De Havilland 34 type,
each completed 2,300 flying hours, representing a distance flown of 200,000
miles each, while three Napier-Lion engines each ran for an average period
of 1,350 hours. Altogether during the year, 4,677 machine flights were
made for transport purposes, and 890,000 machine-miles were flown, and
to these totals Imperial Airways, Limited, contributed 93 per cent in each
case, while of the 13,478 passengers carried, 98 per cent traveled in that
company's machines. The cargo transported by air during the year amounted
to 508 tons, all of which was carried by Imperial Airwave Limited. In
addition, 23,519 machine flights were made, 139,000 machune-miles flown,
and 43,766 passengers carried in other than transport flights, these flights
being made almost entirely for pleasure purposes.
Some idea of the present efficiency of aerial transport may be gained
from the statistics given in the report, which show that of 4,328 flights
commenced in the British subsidised air services during the year under
consideration, 4,064, or 94 per cent, were completed without interruption,
while 105 of the remainder, although interrupted, were completed on the
same day as commenced. In these flights, there were a total of 286 forced
.


  p. 2383 (#1347)                      

1925]
2383
Professional Notes
landings, of which 144 (50 per cent) were due to weather conditions, 96
(34 per cent) were caused by engine or installation failures, and 46 (16
per cent) were due to other causes. Only one fatal accident occurred
during the year, but this, unfortunately, resulted in the death of seven
passengers in addition to the pilot. It will be remembered that on December
24 last, a machine, after taking off from Croydon aerodrome and climbing
a few hundred feet, stalled and nose dived to the ground. Fire broke out
on the impact and all the occupants were killed. Three other accidents,
which did not result in personal injuries, occurred on the established air
routes, while eight more occurred in other classes of civil flying; in one
of these the pilot and passenger were injured. There were thus twelve
accidents in all, of which four were attributed to error of judgment on the
part of the pilot, two to defects in engine or installation, one to weather
conditions and three to other causes not specified. In addition, it may be
mentioned that two accidents to foreign aircraft occurred in this country
during the period covered by the report, both happening to French machines
employed on the cross-channel services. These two accidents were caused
by engine failure, but neither involved personal injuries to the occupants.
In conclusion, a brief reference may be made to the progress made in
the equipment of the London-Continental route for night flying, which
will certainly have to be carried out as soon as it can be done with safety,
if full advantage is to be taken of the aeroplane as a means of transport-
especially of mails. A considerable amount of experimental and test work
has been carried on during the year with this object in view. The emer-
gency landing grounds at Penshurst and Littlestone have been equipped
with automatic beacon lights, and the boundaries of these landing grounds,
and also the aerodromes at Croydon and Lympne, have been outlined with
automatic operated lights. In addition, improvements have been effected in
the arrangements for flood lighting the landing area at Croydon Aerodrome
in order to increase the space that can be utilized in night operations.
Fog still remains one of the chief hindrances of aerial navigation, but the
problem has been tackled by employing a captive balloon to obtain informa-
tion on the efficiency of various lighting units. A new type of beacon em-
ploying neon lamps has been installed at Croydon and has been found of
considerable assistance to pilots endeavoring to locate the aerodrome under
conditions of bad visibility. It is proposed, during the coming winter, to
attempt to produce a scheme for assisting navigation by making use of
the leader-cable principle in conjunction with neon vacuum tubes. In this
way it is hoped to enable aircraft to operate safely from aerodromes in
times of dense ground fog, provided that it is possible to see clearly when
Aying above the fog. Acoustical methods of assisting aircraft to land in
fog are also being studied, but have not yet arrived at the stage of practical
utility.
Anti-aircraft Defense
By Major J. C. Haw, C. A. C., The Coast Artillery Journal, October,
1925.-The term “Anti-aircraft Defense" comprehends all defensive meas-
ures against aerial attack. It is evident that aviation itself is infinitely the
most proficient a - important single component of this defense, for our
pursuit planes can seek out the enemy and attack him in his own element-
the air-on equal terms. However, the work of the Air Service must be
supplemented by purely ground formations. In the Civil War, the cavalry
of both sides made frequent raids in the enemy's rear; in the World War,
with the German Navy completely bottled up, we saw his submarines in
constant operation, while on the surface raider after raider went to sea and
terrorized the Allied Merchant Marine. As on land and sea, so in the air ;
no matter how numerous our planes or how efficient our aviators, it is
impossible to prevent a bold enemy from carrying out successful expeditions


  p. 2384 (#1348)                      

2384
(Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
over our territory. The delay in gathering a sufficient concentration to
meet air attacks in force may enable the enemy to reach his objective.
Further, the airplane is an offensive weapon, whose mission it is to seek
out and destroy the enemy in his territory. If the strength of the Air
Service is frittered away by scattering a great proportion of units here and
there for defense, we give up all hope of taking the initiative in the air.
However, it is necessary to assign a relatively small number of pursuit
planes to defensive work. These craft conduct constant patrols, and they
fight in the same manner as other pursuit aviation.
To defend troops, small isolated positions of importance, and large cities,
ground defense elements are necessary. Only small areas should be forced
to depend entirely on such elements, and for all large areas, pursuit
aviation and ground defense should be combined.
The protective components are divided into two classes-active and
passive. The passive elements are: kites and barrage balloons, camouflage,
searchlights, and the information service.
Large kites may carry metallic cables. Barrage balloons are small affairs
especially designed for forming a barrier of balloons. In the defense of
London, nets were used, three adjacent balloons being joined by wire cable
from which hung wires 350 yards long, with a sand bag at each end. The
balloons were about five hundred yards apart. Perhaps a more efficient
method is to place the balloons closer together and rely solely upon the
retaining cables. If two balloons are used together, one above the other,
an altitude of 11,500 feet may be attained. As an aviator cannot see the
wires, he will not attempt to fiy through the balloon barrage, but must
alter his course to right or left or climb above it. The effect is to diminish
the accuracy of bombing Balloon barrages are useful for small areas
only.
Camouflage is now tremendously important. At the front, every position
must be concealed from enemy aviators. Otherwise it is subject to accurate
artillery fire as well as bombing and aerial machine gun attack; while the
enemy's general plans of action are much more likely to be successful if
he has full knowledge of our dispositions.
In other cases, positions to the camouflaged are of two classes ; namely,
land marks and objectives. The aviator can fly by compass; but on long
journeys he is liable to need a reference point here and there to keep an
accurate course, and in all cases he must have a distinguishing landmark
at the point to be bombed.
Smoke may be used to camouflage small areas. If several patches of
smoke be generated simultaneously, the flyer does not know which one hides
the point he wishes to see. Flimsy scenery may be erected, in exact imita-
tion of structures located elsewhere.
Suppression of light is a most obvious measure of defense. Even at
night, a large city cannot be hidden, but if no lights are visible, then the
aviator cannot see it until he is almost upon it and must depend upon
compass and landmarks to reach it. When Paris was fully illuminated,
aviators at Villers-Cotteret could distinguish the glow, although the dis-
tance was approximately seventy-five kilometers. The lights in railway
yards are very conspicuous from overhead, unless carefully shielded, while
the glare from the opened door of a locomotive firebox is the aviator's
best indication of a railway line. In Paris, patrols were constantly alert
to enforce darkness, and necessary lights were made blue.
Sometimes "luminous camouflage" is used. High power lights with
reflectors are scattered about over the area containing the point to be
hidden, which is renderd invisible by the upward glare. This is obviously
a very expensive measure.
Also lights may be disposed at some suitable point in a conformation
that copies exactly some village or area with which the enemy is familiar,
so that he is deceived as to the true position.


  p. 2385 (#1349)                      

1925]
2385
Professional Notes
The British did a bit of camouflage that was almost a classic. To quote
the report of an American officer on this British dump which was located
near the front:
"Along the best line of approach, and at the usual distance from
the area actually to be defended, were placed three batteries of artillery
and three triangular lights. These guns and lights were poorly camouflaged,
so that when a high flying plane came over to photograph the dump they
would show in the pictures, and at the same time it would appear that the
British did not want them to show. Thus the enemy knew the relation
of these guns and lights to the location of the dump. However, about a
mile in advance, along the same line of approach, was the exact duplicate
of the same layout with the exception that this installation was perfectly
camouflaged. The result was that when an enemy plane came over at
night and these latter batteries and lights opened on him, he knew from
the study of the photo that very soon he must drop his bombs to hit the
dump. This he always did and the bombs therefore hit in advance of the
dump. Then before daylight the British would go out and fill in the bomb
holes and dig holes with the same relation to the inner defense that the
actual bomb holes had to the outer defense. It was in January, 1918,
that I saw this defense and it had operated successfully through the entire
war until that date without the ruse being discovered."
Searchlights are used to discover the enemy at night and keep him in
view of our guns on planes. They must be portable so that they can be
placed wherever necessary.
The standard type in our Army is the Cadillac unit. When the light
is in operation, the engine of the truck operates a generator mounted on
the truck, which in turn furnishes power to the light. The light itself is
of the open, or dishpan, type, sixty inches in diameter. It is mounted on a
very light carriage with Ford wheels, pushed by hand; a cable six hundred
feet long is provided for conveying the current from generator to light.
When a move is to be made the light is run up on the track, which thus
carries the entire unit. There is also a 30-inch light that can be placed in
trees, towers and similar points of vantage.
In addition to revealing the plane to our own forces, seachlights are
very confusing to the enemy pilot, for when the beam is upon him he can
see nothing of the ground or of other aircraft.
Evidently, it would be almost impossible for a searchlight to discover
a plane by searching at random, so listening apparatus is provided to de-
termine the direction of a plane by the sound of its engine. The problem
of following the exact course of a target by sound is no easy one, for by
the time the noise reaches the listener, the direction from which it appears
to come is no longer the true direction to the target. One reason for this
is that the plane moves some distance while the sound wave is traveling
to the listener; wind and other factors add to the difficulties encountered.
The underlying principle of practically all listening apparatus is the
detection of difference in phase of sound waves, the same principle that
enables men and animals to determine the direction of a sound. Sometimes
there are two receivers mounted on opposite ends of a rod that turns about
a pivot; tubes lead from each receiver to the listener's ears. There are
also single receiver types of parabolical or spherical shape. In either case,
the receiver collects and concentrates the sound; and the direction is read
off from the oriented "azimuth scale" (somewhat similar to the horizontal
limb of a transit). This direction is then set off on a similar scale on the
searchlight, and the target quickly located. Other types of apparatus are
more complicated but subject to various defects. The most accurate device
is said to be the Perrin Telesitemeter, with a mean error of only 0.13 of a
degree.
Now for the active elements of the anti-aircraft defense. The most
important-pursuit aviation-has been mentioned already. Machine guns
and anti-aircraft artillery complete the list.


  p. 2386 (#1350)                      

2386
(Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Anti-aircraft machine guns are used to prevent low-flying planes from
bombing and machine-gunning our positions. They are employed in the
defense of roads, trenches, strong points, artillery emplacements, anti-
aircraft guns and searchlights, and so on. The most promising machine
gun for anti-aircraft purposes seems to be the water-cooled Browning
.50-caliber, firing tracer or explosive bullets at the rate of 500 aimed shots
per minute. Its horizontal range is five miles vertical range, 8,000 to 12,000
feet.
There has just been developed another machine gun of 1.4 inches caliber,
firing explosive shell at the rate of 100 to 120 shots per minute, with a
vertical range of 14,000 feet. These shells burst on impact with the lightest
fabric.
As the targets fly low and at great speed, appear unexpectedly, and are
visible for very short periods of time, elaborate sighting is impossible, and
the only feasible way to get hits seems to be by using tracer bullets so that
their trajectory is visible.
A more complicated matter is that of anti-aircraft artillery. This class
of fire involves the greatest problems that have yet confronted the ballis-
tician, the ordnance designer, and the artilleryman. The target, whose
vulnerable parts often occupy less than two cubic yards, moves at a speed
of 80 to 200 miles per hour in three dimensions, and can change speed and
direction with startling rapidity. If the plane should travel at 180 miles
per hour and it should take the projectile 20 seconds to reach it, the gun
would have to be pointed one mile ahead of the target even if our methods
were absolutely perfect.
It is necessary to use high explosive shell or shrapnel, as these burst in
the air, endangering everything within a radius of approximately fifteen
yards. Their use entails fuse complications (mentioned later) but these
are outweighed by the gain in danger space.
The latest American gun (still in the experimental stage) is 4.7 inches
in caliber, with a muzzle velocity of 2,600 feet per second, firing a 45-
pound projectile to a vertical range of almost seven miles. With all-
round fire, elevation from minus 5° to plus 80°, automatic breech opener,
and pneumatic loading device, it is easily aimed and can be fired very
rapidly indeed. A 3-inch gun of similar model is also being tried out.
These guns are either self-propelled or towed by trucks or tractors, make
fast time on good roads, and can travel across country.
The chief ammunition difficulty has been in the fuse question. In
order to make the projectile burst at the exact instant desired, a very
accurate time fuse is a necessity. The extreme changes of air pressure
in anti-aircraft fire render powder-train fuses unreliable. One alternative
is clockwork. Imagine accurate clockwork that can withstand the shock
of discharge and the tremendous velocity of rotation of the projectile!
Such a fuse has been developed, however, and gives promise of con-
siderable accuracy. A fuse actuated by the rotation of the projectile has
also been proposed.
Several improved fuse setters have appeared of late, whose object is
to set the fuse on the very latest data, including an allowance or lead for
the time used up in setting the fuse, loading, and firing. These setters
work automatically, eliminating the errors caused by waiting for an opera-
tor to receive data and set it on the fuse-setter. Some of them work by
electricity.
However, the most intricate and perplexing difficulties are encountered
in the realm of fire control—that is, the determination of the data to be
set upon the guns in order to hit the target.
All fire at moving targets is a matter of prediction. The exact posi-
tions of the target at two or more given instants are determined ; upon this
information it is predicted that the target will arrive at a certain point at a


  p. 2387 (#1351)                      

1925)
2387
Professional Notes
certain instant in the future, and the shot is fired at this imaginary point.
The shorter the time occupied by the personnel in getting this data and
firing and by the projectile in reaching its destination, the closer the pre-
dicted point to the last known point, and hence the greater chance that the
target will actually reach the predicted point at the expected instant, instead
of changing direction, altitude, or speed. The time element becomes of
incalculable importance when the target travels from one and one-third to
three and one-third miles per minute.
To determine the position of a target at any instant, it is necessary to
know: (1) its direction from the battery, (2) its range (straight line froni
battery to target), (3) its altitude. In our service, these data are generally
determined by using instruments at both ends of a measured base line.
Obviously, it would be more satisfactory to eliminate one station and make
all the measurements from a single point near the guns. There are several
instruments for doing this, and when they are sufficiently developed, a single
station scheme will undoubtedly replace the present system.
The next step is the prediction of the future position of the target; and
finally, this data must be translated into terms of elevation, direction (or
sight setting), and fuse setting for the gunners. (The gun may be aimed
by the use of a telescopic sight or laid by an oriented scale and a quadrant,
in which case no sight is used.). All these very involved processes must be
performed in a few seconds—the fewer the better. Hence a great advantage
will be secured if a single machine can be made to perform these computa-
tions, which must be done almost instantaneously and as a continuous opera-
tion, so that there is a constant flow of data to keep up with the movements
of the target. Several such machines have been invented. Some of them
are purely mechanical, others depend upon the use of electricity, but none
have given full satisfaction. The ultimate aim is a single machine, operated
by one man, that will measure the position of the target, predict its future
position, and compute the firing data to set on the guns. Such a develop-
ment will increase tremendously the accuracy of fire.
The next consideration is the organization of anti-aircraft units. In
our Army, the basic group is the regiment, which consists of one artillery
battalion and one machine-gun battalion. The artillery battalion is com-
posed of three gun batteries of four guns each (total, 12 cannon) and one
searchlight battery of twelve lights. The anti-aircraft machine-gun battalion
consists of four companies of twelve machine guns apiece, a total of forty-
eight machine guns. There are sixty-three officers, one warrant officer and
1,450 men in an anti-aircraft regiment. To each army corps (about 83,850
men) is assigned one regiment of anti-aircraft artillery. To each army
(composed of two or more corps) is assigned one brigade of three regiments
of anti-aircraft artillery, in addition to the regiment with each corps.
Before considering the manner in which anti-aircraft elements are dis-
posed for defense, it is necessary to understand the mission of the defense.
This may be stated as follows:
(a) To prevent enemy aircraft flying at such heights over our positions
that they can observe and photograph, direct artillery fire, attack our bal-
loons, drop bombs with accuracy, or attack troops with machine guns.
(b) To prevent enemy aircraft dropping bombs on vital points behind
our lines.
(c) To compel enemy aircraft Aying in formation to lose their forma-
tion and thus render them more vulnerable to attack by our own airplanes.
Then we should know the kind of aircraft that we will be called upon to
oppose. This information is contained in the following table:


  p. 2388 (#1352)                      

2388
(Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Kind of Plane
Approximate | Speed-Miles
Altitude-feet Per Hour
Remarks
Pursuit
Reconnaissance
Very High
16,000
100-200
80—120
Day bombers
16,000
7,500
80—100
80—100
Night bombers
Purely fighters.
Photographic and
general observation.
Bombing close to their
own base.
Long distance bomb-
ing.
Machine-gun attack of
ground forces.
Long distance bomb-
ing, usually by night
Infantry or attack
Dirigibles
200—3,000
Very High
There are two cases of defense to be considered; namely, front lines
and back areas.
Front line defense is based on the anti-aircraft regiment. First, there is
the gun area. About 1,200 to 2,000 yards in rear of our front lines are
placed two rows of anti-aircraft machine guns, followed by two lines of
anti-aircraft artillery from 2,000 to 5,000 yards in rear of the infantry's
first line, each battery being accompanied by one searchlight. In rear of
the gun area comes the airplane area, extending about 25,000 yards to
the rear of the first line, provided with anti-aircraft searchlights and pa-
trolled and defended by our pursuit planes. Still further to the rear each
army is charged with the defense of all railheads, depots, parks, dumps, and
headquarters in its own area.
The civilian is naturally more interested in the defense of rear areas,
such as large cities. For such places, anti-aircraft artillery is disposed
along probable lines of approach, and also in one or more complete rings
around the area. The outer ring may be 25,000 yards from a great city,
while other batteries may be disposed within the city itself. Anti-aircraft
machine guns are placed at bridges, important factories, and so forth.
Searchlights and listening posts play an important part. Smoke screens
and painted scenery may be used. Pursuit squadrons are located at
suitable places.
All of these elements are linked up by an intricate network of wireless,
telegraph, and telephone communications, which also connect with observa-
tion and listening posts placed at intervals all the way to the theater of
operations. In future, this system may be supplemented by radio from
our own planes. Thus, when an enemy plane crosses our lines, the head-
quarters in rear are kept informed of its progress. At the anti-aircraft
defense headquarters in Paris, for example, everything centered in the
office of a general whose sole task was the command of the anti-aircraft
defense. A great map showed the location of every battery and airdrome,
and on this was traced the course of the invading planes. A light flashed
on for each unit as it went into action. Often the attack was defeated at
such a distance from the city that it was not necessary to sound the alarms
which sent citizens scurrying into cellars and subways.
So much for organization and tactics. As the difficulties of anti-air-
craft artillery and machine gun fire have been emphasized, let us pause for
a moment to examine into the actual accomplishments of these two ele-
ments. Since the vulnerable part of an airplane consists of less than two
cubic yards, relatively few direct hits can be expected. However, anti-
aircraft fire, if uncomfortably close to the pilot, forces him to change his
course or to fly considerably higher, and he is unable to photograph,
observe, bomb, or machine-gun ground formations with full efficiency.


  p. 2389 (#1353)                      

1925]
2389
Professional Notes
Moreover, if he changes course or altitude, he is liable to become sepa-
rated from the other planes in his unit, and is then easy prey for our
pursuit planes.
Many pursuit pilots forget that their own experience forms no fair
criterion, as the pursuit plane is the hardest to hit and, moreover, can do
the least damage to anything on the ground; while the primary mission
of anti-aircraft artillery and machine guns is to protect ground formations.
Our battalions in France made a splendid record, shooting down fifty-
nine planes; forty-one of these were shot down by two anti-aircraft
machine-gun battalions (total ninety-six guns) at an expenditure of 5,491
shots per plane brought down. The value of special training is shown by
the fact that during the same period there were about 1,500 other guns
of the same type along the front; these, not being manned by specially
trained personnel, brought down only two planes, as far as is known.
Our anti-aircraft artillery brought down eighteen planes at an expendi-
ture of 1,050 shots per plane.*
It is encouraging to compare these figures with the statistics of deaths
(not wounds) caused by artillery and rifle fire in terrestial combat. In
the World War, it took 395 Allied shells to kill one German. In the
Franco-Prussian War, it required 1,100 bullets to kill a man.
But the wartime records of anti-aircraft fire have since been surpassed
in the most astounding manner. In firings at Fort Monroe, where the
target was a sleeve 20 feet long and tapering from 4 feet to 21/2 feet in
diameter, towed by an airplane, the anti-aircraft machine gunners last
year made seventeen hits in 9,000 shots, or one hit for every 530 shots.
On a similar target, 6 feet shorter, the artillery made two hits out of
118 shots, or one hit for every 59 shots. Of course, the conditions were
more favorable than would be the case in war; but even so, the record is
truly remarkable. Great things may be expected when an improved fire
control system is developed.
At the same post, searchlights, working on information provided by a
paraboloid listening apparatus, were able to pick up Navy planes and Army
Martin bombers in less than twenty seconds after the lights began search-
ing.
Finally, to show the efficiency of a well-rounded defense system in
actual war, we may cite the statistics covering all night bombing raids on
Paris in the year of 1918. In this year, no less than 483 German planes
attacked the French capital; thirteen of these were shot down, and only
thirty-seven flew above the city itself, dropping a total of only 11,680
kilograms of bombs. Yet the Germans announced that 22,000 kilograms
fell on Paris in a single raid, the night of September 15-16.*
From the moment that he crossed his own lines, a German pilot was
harassed by searchlights, aircraft and artillery fire, until, discouraged, he
dropped out of his formation, released his bombs on the nearest village,
and sped for home.
If the coast artillery corps, operating anti-aircraft artillery, listening ap-
paratus, searchlights, machine guns, and the information service, and
assisted by the Air Service in patrol and pursuit work, can give as good
protection to American cities as the French gave to Paris, we shall have
reason to be proud; and if Congress will only give the Army men and
money in sufficient quantities, we can do it.
*These statistics were furnished the author by the Coast Artillery Jour-
nal, and were compiled from the records of the Chief of the Anti-aircraft
Service of the A. E. F.
*L'Illustration, March 22, 1919.


  p. 2390 (#1354)                      

2390
(Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
ENGINEERING
The Wing Rotor
The Shipbuilder, October, 1925.—Another form of wind motor utilizing
windpressure effects in a manner similar to the Flettner rotor has been
developed by Engineer-Captain Sigurd J. Savonius, of Helsingfors, Fin-
land, and designated the wing rotor. In the case of the Flettner design,
the rotor is cylindrical in section and is rotated by power supplied from
an external source. In the wing rotor, the section is formed by two half
cylinders disposed as shown in Fig. 3. By this arrangement, the inventor
states, rotary motion is produced by the wing rotor itself, as well as the
so-called Magnus-pressure effect, and no external source of power is
needed for operation. The design is the outcome of a long series of ex-
periments with models. From these experiments it was found that the
Magnus-pressure effect gave a propulsive force three times greater than
that of a sail of equal area, and it was therefore decided to test the wing
rotor on a small craft. For this purpose a small boat of 5 meters length
and 1.8 meters beam (Fig. 4) was fitted with two wing rotors made of
galvanized sheeting and having a projected area of 1.87 square meters
each. The rotors had a width of 67 centimeters and a height of 280 centi-
Fig. 3.-SECTION OF WING ROTOR
meters. The end plates were 88 centimeters in diameter. The wings were
pivoted on the end plates, and their position could thus be reversed.
The best point of sailing was found to be with the wind just abaſt the
beam. In a breeze of 7 meters per second (about 15 miles per hour) the
boat attained a speed of 5 knots. In a 10 meters per second wind the speed
averaged 6 knots, the two wing rotors developing a propulsive power
equal to 3-4 h.p. Tacking was accomplished by reversing the wings.
Going with the wind the rotors could be stopped, then acting as ordinary
sails.
The question whether the rotor will eventually find application for ship
propulsion must be left open, as the trials are only beginning. There
seem to be possibilities that the wing rotor can with advantage be used
on motorships as an additional source of power under favorable wind
conditions. When not in use, the wings of the rotors can be closed up, and
in this position offer very little resistance to the air when the ships is
inoving under motor power alone. Eventually, the wing rotor can be
lowered into a horizontal position.
Another way to use the wing rotor in a ship would be to utilize its
torsional power to drive cylinder rotors. A ship could, for instance,
have three rotors-a wing rotor amidships and cylindrical rotors in the
bow and stern. Besides supplying the power needed to turn the cylindrical


  p. 2391 (#1355)                      

1925)
2391
Professional Notes

Fig. 4.-Boat FITTED With Wing ROTORS
rotors, the Magnus force of the wing rotor would also add to the aggre-
gate driving power.
It is also possible to use a combination of a wing rotor and a cylindrical
rotor by having a smaller wing rotor directly on the top of the cylinder,
the former rotating the latter.
In comparison with the cylindrical rotor, it is claimed, the wing rotor
has two decided advantages. One is that it supplies its own rotating power,
needing no complicated and expensive power plant with motors, dynamos,
and wiring. Another is that wing rotor has quite an appreciable driv-
ing force even when sailing with the wind, and when the cylindrical rotor
has practically no effect. Against these advantages must be set the dis-
advantages of a greater size for equal power, and a more complicated
construction of the rotor proper.
The Position of British Marine Engineering*
The Engineer, 9 October, 1925.—Having in mind the condition of the
shipbuilding and engineering industry, I have decided to give a brief
running review of the present position, as compared with that immediately
preceding the Great War.
*From the presidential address to the Institution of Engineers and Ship-
builders in Scotland, October 6, 1925.


  p. 2392 (#1356)                      

2392
[Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Today there are about ninety-six shipyards in Britain, a number of
which have marine engine works associated with them. In thirty of
these yards there is not a single keel laid; in fifteen any work in hand is
rapidly nearing completion; while the remaining works are barely Oc-
cupied beyond one fourth of their capacity. The present serious condition
of the shipbuilding industry will be understood when it is known that the
number of building berths in this country today is 20 per cent more than
in the year preceding the war, and only 28 per cent of the berths are
occupied, while the percentage of unemployed workmen is between 30 and
40, which is really appalling.
The gross tonnage of merchant vessels building at the end of June last
in Great Britain and Ireland was about 1,100,000 as compared with 1,900,000
building during the twelve months preceding the war. In 1913 about
3,333,000 tons were launched, of which almost 2,000,000 were built in
Britain and her colonies, while the world's work in hand in June last was
slightly over 2,333,000 tons. Of this, 1,100,000 tons is being built in Great
Britain and Ireland. That is to say, in 1913 we built about 60 per cent
of the world's output, while at the present time we are building only 46
per cent. Our leading competitors, in order of tonnage building at the
end of June, were Germany, Italy, France, Holland, and the United States.
Various reasons are urged as accounting for the decline in home ship-
building and the increase abroad, such as rates of exchange, working hours,
subsidies, and working conditions generally. No doubt the general posi-
tion abroad is somewhat exceptional, and as these conditions tend toward
normal, the pendulum will swing back in our favor, but we are bound to
accept the conclusion that we cannot possibly regain the position in which
we were able to account for 60 per cent of the world's output.
An examination of the ownership of the world's tonnage today, as com-
pared with the ownership in 1914, will help us to realize this. The world's
tonnage in 1914 was 42,500,000 gross; today it is 58,750,000. The percen-
tage owned in Britain in 1914 was 44%2; today it is under 33. The United
States, which owned just over 4 per cent of the world's tonnage in 1914,
today owns about 20 per cent. The other leading countries, in order of
tonnage owned are Japan, France, Germany, Italy, Holland, and Norway.
Germany now owns 2,100,000 tons less than in 1914. During the year
ending in June last the tonnage owned has increased; in Great Britain
and Ireland by 330,000 tons, in Italy by about 200,000 tons, and in Norway
by about 166,000 tons. A considerable reduction is shown in the United
States tonnage owned, which is now over 500,000 tons less than a year ago.
When the abnormal conditions arising from the war disappear, these figures
will no doubt tend towards the proposition existing in 1914, but a complete
restoration cannot be expected.
Before passing from the question of the world's supply of tonnage, it
is interesting to look for a moment at the rate of depletion of the world's
merchant tonnage. Recently Lloyd's published a statement of the number
of vessels broken up, which is tabulated as under. It will be noted that
the figures vary to an enormous extent from year to year.
Years
Minimum tons
Maximum tons
1905-1909
..120,003
.........251,900
1915-1920 .............. 87,737 ..................245,891
1915-1920 ...... In these years practically no tonnage was broken
up, the yearly average amounting only to 10,000 tons.
1921
77,500 tons
1922
315,000 tons
1923
....... 963,000 tons
1924 ......
. 1,174,005 tons
The most recent returns show a decided falling off in the amount of
tonnage being broken up. I suggest that the shipbuilder and shipowner
1923
.............................


  p. 2393 (#1357)                      

1925]
2393
Professional Notes
should jointly consider, in their common interests, what is the best method
of disposing of old and inefficient tonnage. As time goes on it becomes
more apparent that we should take a more corporate view of this and other
cognate subjects. We act too much independently and unheedingly of one
another, to our mutual disadvantage. Could old and obsolescent ships not
be offered in part payment for new ships, instead of being sold to foreign
competitors for sums, in many cases, not much more than their scrap
value? Our position among the nations as owners and builders would
thus be conserved.
There is no doubt that to a large extent the tonnage owned by foreign
countries has been swollen by the acquistion of ships from this country
which were already more or less inefficient. They can, however, success-
fully compete with British ships, as their national requirements are not
so stringent as ours, and much lower wages are paid than in Britain. As
these obsolescent ships disappear, the balance can only be maintained by
the purchase of new tonnage. Our hope is that we shall be able to establish
our old position of the most economical shipbuilding and engineering coun-
try, as the conditions presently affecting the production of foreign tonnage
disappear.
The following statement of the employment of coal and oil fuel at the
present time, as compared with 1914, is also published by Lloyd's, and is
interesting:
1914
1925
Percentage of Percentage of
total gross total gross
tonnage. tonnage.
Sailing vessels and sea-going barges ........ 8.06
3.5
Oil, &c., in internal combustion engines ...... 0.45
4.2
Oil fuel for boilers .....
.... 2.65
27.54
Coal
....... 88.84
64.76
It will thus be seen that 6434 per cent of the tonnage of the merchant
marine now depends entirely upon coal, while in 1914 the percentage was
nearly 89, and the use of fuel oil has increased from 3.1 to 31.74 per cent.
These figures give an indication of what may be looked for in the next
decade in the use of oil. The tonnage of motor vessels now building in
the world amounts to 1,125,000, while the tonnage of steam vessels under
construction is 1,100,000, that is, the tonnage of motor driven vessels is
102 per cent of the steam-driven vessels. At the end of June last in
Great Britain and Ireland the tonnage of motor vessels amounted to 58
percent of the steam tonnage under construction. In Denmark, Germany,
Holland, Italy, and Sweden the motor tonnage under construction greatly
exceeds the steam tonnage, the combined totals for these five countries
being 250,000 tons of steamers, and 625,000 tons of motor ships. The
world's figures include 115 motor ships between 5,000 and 10,000 tons, five
between 10,000 and 15,000 tons, and seven between 15,000 and 25,000 tons.
The economic side of the Diesel oil engine has never been clearly
stated. Throughout the whole history of the motor ship it has apparently
been proved on paper that, since the amount of fuel required by a motor
ship is from one third to one fifth of that required by a coal-fired ship,
the savings can be nil, as the prices of coal and oil, at any rate in home
ports, are in the same proportion. These, after all, are facts which only
the shipowner can give, and it is to be again regretted that shipowners
generally do not act corporately with us and take a greater part in the
affairs of our Institution, giving to the constructors the benefit of their
actual commercial experience. The fact remains that on a great number
of our important trading routes the motor ship is today showing enormous
economies over steamers, and whilst shipowners will not put their cards
on the table yet, the mere fact of repeated and consistent construction of


  p. 2394 (#1358)                      

2394
[Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
this type of vessel is satisfying evidence. The explanation, no doubt, is
that with the motor ship contracts for oil fuel are obtained by shipowners
at a very much lower rate per ton than is published. The savings with
motor engines in reduced stand-by losses, much more economical working
of cargo, reduced cost of personnel, and increased deadweight, have a
very marked bearing on the balance sheet of the ship.
On the other hand, quadruple-expansion reciprocating engines with high
pressure steam, and the high superheat which can be safely used with
valve gear of the poppet type, associated with intensive preheating and
feed-water heating, is a proposition well worthy of study, in which there
may be great possibilities, such as shortening the engine-room length, and
reducing the fuel consumption by an amount greater than that achieved
by the turbine when it was first introduced
Thornycroft Shallow-Draught Ship for China
The Marine Engineer and Motorship Builder, October, 1925.-Trials
were successfully carried out at Southampton on Monday, September 7,
of the Fushun, a twin-screw shallowdraught cargo and passenger boat,
designed and built by John I. Thornycroft and Company Limited, to the
order of Fung Kan Yu, of Hongkong, for service on the Upper Yangste
River of China. Very special problems are involved in the construction
of a vessel to trade on this river. The stretch between Ichang and
Chungking, some 1,400 miles inland, involves extraordinary difficulties.
GO
THD
Domeng...E
OUTLINE PROFILE OF THE SHALLOW-DRAUGHT STEAMER “FUSHUN."
The fall of the river between these two places is no less than 476 feet in
the distance of 400 miles, or an average gradient of over 14 inches a mile.
Owing to this fall and also because the river is confined in narrow gorges
or ravines, there are some 35 rapids where the current will at times exceed
6 knots, and in the most difficult of these rapids the current may attain
the extraordinary rate of 13 knots. The rapids vary very greatly with the
height of the river, some improving and others getting worse with a fall
in level. This stretch of river would probably be labelled as unnavigable
were it not such an essential artery, and the one outlet for the trade of an
immense area, for the Yangste is to China what the Mississippi and the
Amazon and the Platte are to North and South America. So important is
the traffic on this great highway that before the war it was estimated that
some 10,000 junks were trading between Ichang and Chungking. These
junks are considered to do good business if they make two trips per annum.
The upstream journey may take three months while the downstream trip
will be accomplished in from six to twelve days. Moreover, a relatively
large crew is required, the bigger junks carrying over one hundred men.
Of these probably eighty will be landed at the rapids and these will "track"
or haul the junk upstream by immense tow ropes. The remainder will


  p. 2395 (#1359)                      

1925]
2395
Professional Notes
be employed in fending off from from rocks, and in working huge sweeps.
The first commercial vessel to ply unaided through the rapids was the
steamer Shu-Tung, built by Thornycroft in 1909. The success of this
vessel proved the possibility of regular services and opened the upper
river to steam navigation.
so SAN
STORE
HORNYCROFT
BOILER
U517 FAN ENGINE
W
18 & 326
STROKE
PUMP
FLCD
ENGINE
ROOM
STOKE HOLO
CONDENSER
ENGWEERS
STORE
AIR
UMP PM
VOCK
MACHINERY ARRANGEMENT
.................
High speed, shallow draught, and extreme handiness are essential fea-
tures for vessels of this type, while definite limits of length are set by
reason of the sharpness of some of the bends. In addition to the problems
imposed on builders by the physical characteristics of the river, there is
the question of providing a sufficient deadweight carrying capacity to enable
the vessel to trade profitably. The principal dimensions of the Fushun
are as follows:
Length overall ........
147 ft. 8 in.
Breadth, mld.
28 ft.
Depth, mld. ..
8 ft. 6 in.
Draught, mean F.W. .....
6 ft.
Deadweight ........
103 tons.
Deadweight on 5-ft. draught .......
210 tons.
Deadweight on 6-ſt. draught ......
23,000 cub. ft.
Measurement of cargo space about
43 officers and crew.
Complement .......
136 passengers.
Speed (oil loaded).
. 13.5 knots.
Speed (coal loaded) ....
13.5 knots.
The vessel is built of Siemens-Martin mild steel, and has a cut-away
fore-foot of a type suitable for working in the rapids of the river. The
stern protects the rudders, which pass up through the counter and are
suspended on glands with ball bearings. A pole mast is fitted to carry
headlights and for signalling purposes. The hull is divided into nine
compartments by means of eight transverse bulkheads, and a trimming
tank is placed forward of No. I hold. There are three decks, i.e., main deck,
passenger deck, and sun deck. The passenger deck is arranged for twenty-
four first and fifty-four second-class Chinese passengers, and the neces-
sary cooking arrangements and lavatories are arranged on this deck. The
vessel can also carry fifty-four third-class passengers. The accommodation
for four Europeans is arranged at the fore end of the sun deck, with a
mess room with dining table, portable chairs, sideboard, and so forth. The


  p. 2396 (#1360)                      

2396
(Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
chief compradore is accommodated in a room placed aft of the first-class
Chinese state rooms on the passenger deck, and a stewards' room is on
the opposite side. The first-class Chinese saloon is arranged in the for-
ward deck-house on the passenger deck, with five four-berth and two
two-berth first-class Chinese state rooms; aft of this are also arranged two
two-berth cabins alongside the engine casing for accommodating passengers
or the ship's staff, as may be required. Electric bells are fitted up in all
the first-class passengers' and officers' rooms and also in the saloons. A
second-class saloon is allocated aft of the engine-room casing, and eight
second-class four-berth state rooms arranged in the aft deck-house. The
cabins for the captain, chief engineer, and a bathroom are arranged at
the fore end of the sun deck. The holds are conveniently arranged for
cargo.
The Stability of Ships
The Shipbuilder, October, 1925.—The findings of recent courts of in-
quiry into the loss of certain ships and the recommendations made as to
the need for more stringent supervision of the stability of vessels, it may
be expected, will lead to the authorities in this country taking some action
in this direction. The German authorities have already provided further
safeguards in the new rules of the Seeberufsgenossenschaft. That stability
is a vital factor in the safety of ships equal in importance to reserve
buoyancy and strength, which have long been subject to definite regula-
tions with general advantage, is not open to question. A difference in the
case of stability has been and is that, unlike the other factors mentioned,
it is very difficult to devise methods of efficient control which would not
greatly hamper the practical operation of ships. This latter consideration
makes it incumbent upon the authorities to proceed with great caution in
framing any new regulations concerning stability, and to avoid any require-
ments which might result in serious delays and restrictions without any
real gain in safety. The tendency of late years to treat such problems on
academic rather than on practical lines makes this no idle warning.
A practical treatment of the subject appears to lie consecutively in three
main directions:
(a) The provision for each ship of complete stability data for the
guidance of the officers in control.
(b) The correlation of experience as to a suitable standard for stability.
(c) The practical means for ensuring that an agreed standard is com-
plied with.
The provision of stability information for ships' officers is a matter
which should receive much more attention than is often given to it. The
position of the center of gravity of the ship in light condition should be
determined by an inclining experiment when she is new, and after any
subsequent alterations. The centers of gravity of all cargo holds and
ballast tanks should be stated, in addition to the height of the metacenter
above the keel at different draughts, so that the captain may work out
the metacentric height for any desired condition, making due allowance for
any free surfaces of water or oil on board. Some typical calculations for
different loading will help him in this connection. The provision of the
information referred to does not entail any serious labor or expense, and the
Board of Trade examining authorities should see that the training of ships'
officers is such that they possess the elementary knowledge required to
make use of such data.
The dissemination of stability data will facilitate the next step, which is
to collect reliable information as to actual stability conditions on service, so
that the probabilities may be weighed and a reasonable standard deter-
mined. The task could be undertaken by an informal committee appointed
by the Board of Trade in a similar manner to that adopted in the cases


  p. 2397 (#1361)                      

1925)
2397
Professional Notes
of subdivision, freeboard, and other matters; or, alternatively, the work
could be undertaken by the Institution of Naval Architects or the leading
registration societies. The time and labor involved in compiling this data
would be considerable.
The last stage, that of enforcing the agreed standard, would also present
great difficulty. The only satisfactory procedure would appear to be the
actual demonstration, by some means analogous to the determination of
reserve buoyancy by freeboard, that the required metacentric height exists
apart from calculations, the latter only being used to determine changes
which will occur during a voyage through the consumption of fuel and for
other reasons. Such a demonstration could take the form of an inclining
experiment and Messrs. Alfred Holt and Company have stated in a letter
to the press that their new ships are being provided with tanks for this
purpose at a moderate expenditure. Another method has been suggested by
C. Frodsham Holt in his paper on “Stability and Seaworthiness” read
before the last meeting of the Institution of Naval Architects. Mr. Holt
proposes to use the ship's periods of oscillation as a criterion of the meta-
centric height, these previously having been calibrated by an inclining ex-
periment, and he states that his experiments in this direction have been
very promising. In the case of most ships, however, the conducting of an
inclining experiment or a rolling experiment under the stress of depar-
ture conditions would present great practical difficulty, both in regard to
obtaining reliable results and the delay involved.
Another suggestion which has been made is that the requirement should
be confined to a calculation showing a new vessel to have a required meta-
centric height when laden with homogeneous cargo occupying all the cargo
spaces and with the ship laden to the legal freeboard. While this might be
a convenient way way of evading the real issue, it would militate unfairly
against many highly successful types of ship, which are not designed to be
loaded in such a manner, and which have proved perfectly satisfactory as
regards stability when laden under the conditions for which they are de-
signed. Moreover, such a calculation would still not show the actual meta-
centric height with which a ship went to sea, and which through improper
loading might be worse even than the assumed condition with homogeneous
cargo.
Taking into account the difficulty of enforcing a standard, it may well be
that further procedure concerning stability practice should be confined to
the first two stages, i.e., the provision on board ship of full stability data,
and the formulation of a suitable standard for stability; the matter of
compliance being left to the judgment and control of the master. After
all, what may be termed the sea sense of efficient officers has proved a
satisfactory safeguard in the past in the great majority of cases; and
reliance upon some arbitrary procedure, rather than a cultivation of the
master's judgment, may do more harm than good. All these points of
view will have to be carefully considered before any definite action is taken.
MERCHANT MARINE
The Shipping Board and Admiral Palmer
The Nautical Gazette, 12 October, 1925.—If, perchance, there has been
any doubt as to the real value of the Shipping Board as an agency for the
development of an American merchant marine, that doubt has now been
dissipated. By its latest actions the Board has shown itself in its true
light. It stands revealed as a menace to American shipping. In re-
moving Admiral Palmer from the presidency of the Fleet Corporation it
has made him a victim of the personal jealousy and political spite of the
commissioners who opposed him. There are no justifiable grounds for
Admiral Palmer's removal. Commissioner Haney has offered three reasons


  p. 2398 (#1362)                      

2398
[Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
for his own opposition ; first, he considered Admiral Palmer incompetent
from temperament and lack of experience to carry out the provisions of
the Merchant Marine Act of 1920 ; second, Admiral Palmer seemed deter-
mined not to confer with the Board upon any of the questions which came
within its province; and, third, Admiral Palmer seemed disposed to proceed
along lines independent of the Board's action. Commissioner Thompson
also thinks that Admiral Palmer is incompetent. The emptiness of these
reasons is very apparent when one considers Admiral Palmer's record. He
has done more during his term of office to sell ships, save money and to
place the Government's fleet on a businesslike basis than was accomplished
by the Board in the years prior to his appointment. These proferred reasons
are merely superficial excuses to cover up the cause of the real antagonism
to Admiral Palmer. The Board is nothing if not political, and, from its
standpoint, the American merchant marine can fall to pieces as long as it
can play its own political game and the commissioners can retain their
jobs. In the eyes of the Board, Admiral Palmer had great failings and
committed one terrible sin: He was not a politician, cared nothing for
politics and devoted his whole attention to promoting the American merchant
marine. Of course, if he desired to remain in the good graces of the
Board he should not have worked on the shipping problems but played
politics. That was his failing. His sin was that he sold ships. Every
ship in the Government's feet is a link in the chain holding the com-
missioners to their jobs. When all the ships are sold there will be no
need for a Shipping Board and there will be no more jobs at salaries of
$12,000 a year. Admiral Palmer launched a ship sale campaign that
disposed of more vessels during his term of office than the Board sold
since the war. This rapid liquidation of the Government's fleet became a
menace to the existence of the Shipping Board and the commissioners had
to put a stop to it to protect their positions. Because President Palmer has
endeavored to carry out faithfully the terms of the Merchant Marine Act
of 1920 and has honestly tried to solve the Government's shipping problem
he is a dangerous man in the eyes of the Board and, therefore, has had to
be removed.
The commissioners selected the most favorable time to take this action.
President Coolidge was away from Washington, and Commissioners Hill
and Lissner, two of Admiral Palmer's supporters, were not in the city.
This was an opportune time for Commissioner Haney to present his
resolution calling for the acceptance of Admiral Palmer's resignation. Just
why Chairman O'Connor refused to vote on this resolution, but voted in
favor of the appointment of a new Fleet Corporation president is not clear,
Reports from Washington state that the commissioners were highly elated
over their ability to remove Admiral Palmer. And well they might be.
Commissioner Plummer made some slurring remark about the necessity
for hiring a bricklayer to build a wall and not a ladies' tailor. Such a
statement comes with exceedingly bad grace from any member of the
Board. Commissioner Haney's tenure of office is uncertain since, as he
is serving under a recess appointment, it is doubtful whether President
Coolidge will submit his name to Congress for confirmation. It is more
than likely that he will be relieved of his office after Congress meets and
it must be a source of some satisfaction to him to know that he has been
instrumental in effecting Admiral Palmer's removal. Admiral Palmer's
success in the management of the Government's ships, in the face of the
limited authority granted him and of the obstacles thrown in his way by
the Shipping Board, demonstrates clearly that a one-man control is
infinitely better than control by a board, and Congress will render definite
aid to the American merchant marine if it will abolish the Board completely
and place the Government's shipping affairs in the hands of one capable
man.


  p. 2399 (#1363)                      

1925)
2399
Professional Notes
Before the board removed Admiral Palmer it took good care to see that
the Fleet Corporation was deprived of all power of independent action in
the management of the ships. All the authority which the board had con-
ferred upon the corporation at the request of President Coolidge was
withdrawn, thus leaving the Fleet Corporation merely an agency of the
Board. It is clear, therefore, that the officials of the corporation will
have no say in the management of the Government's shipping affairs but
merely will be asked to carry out orders and institute policies of the
Board. Captain Elmer E. Crowley, the new head of the Fleet Corpora-
tion, is an experienced shipping man than whom there is none more capable.
He is a master mariner in sail and steam and knows the operating prob-
lems of American ships. He has held important executive positions in
shipping companies on shore and knows the administrative problems. In
matters of shipping, Captain Crowley is highly competent and if given a
fair chance could handle the Government's shipping affairs as well as
Admiral Palmer did. But, unfortunately, the Board will not give him
that opportunity. It has seen to it that he becomes the president of an
emasculated body which will be supposed to do nothing other than carry
out the board's wishes. As long as Captain Crowley does this he will have
smooth sailing, but the minute he attempts to inject some of his own
practical ideas into the scheme of things, tries to institute some policy,
which though beneficial, is contrary to the Board's wishes, or makes re-
commendations based upon sound business sense instead of on the Board's
desires, he will become persona non grata with the Board. As long as he
is willing to merely execute the Board's orders his relations with the
commissioners will be pleasant but the minute he does what his own good
business judgment and practical experience dictate he will go the way
Admiral Palmer has gone. This will be a great pity for there are few men
in the country who can handle the Government's shipping as efficiently
as Captain Crowley can.
It is generally admitted that the present Government fleet cannot last
for a great many more years and that if it is to remain an effective com-
petitor for world trade the old ships will have to be replaced by new and
more modern vessels. Commissioner Benson of the Shipping Board has
submitted to the Board a report recommending that the Government under-
take the construction of 30,000 tons of passenger vessels and 200,000 tons
of cargo vessels each year as a replacement program. His idea is that if the
existing fleets were to be improved by the addition of new vessels they could
be sold to private owners to better advantage. The great objection to this
plan is that it would result in the Government being more firmly intrenched
in the shipping industry and in the life of the Shipping Board being in-
definitely prolonged. The Government should withdraw from the shipping
business as soon as possible and nothing be undertaken that would delay
that withdrawal. There is no reason why ships and services should not be
sold in their present condition and the question of replacements be left to
the purchasers. The only argument against this procedure is that the
owners might not be in a financial position to construct new vessels and
that when the present fleets become obsolete there will be no tonnage to
take their place. This objection could be met by an arrangement whereby
the fleet would be sold in their present condition, thus getting them out
of the hands of the Government into private hands, and then when replace-
ments become necessary the Government would help the owners to finance
the construction of new vessels. The result would be the same as that
under Commissioner Benson's plan; new vessels would be added to the
American merchant marine for which the owners could pay out of the
earnings of the ships, and the fleets would be kept up to date.


  p. 2400 (#1364)                      

2400
[Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Shipping Board Controversy
The Nautical Gazette, 17 October, 1925.-Observers outside the shipping
field see in the Shipping Board's definace of President Coolidge signs of a
political plot to embarrass the Administration. The Board has started an
economy campaign in the Fleet Corporation, cutting some salaries and refus-
ing to fill vacancies caused by resignations of Admiral Palmer's aides,
thereby hoping to create an impression that Admiral Palmer was ex-
travagant. This hits the President right on his own ground, and with
this action he cannot take issue. It is obvious, however, that this whole
procedure is mere camouflage on the part of the Board, for a few thou-
sand dollars lopped off salaries of personnel would be only a drop in the
bucket when compared with the Board's annual heavy financial losses.
The most effective economy must come from reduced operating costs, and
it was upon this phase that Admiral Palmer worked hardest. How well he
succeeded need not be stressed; some idea of his achievements in this
connection may be gathered from the fact that when he took office in
January of last year the Board's losses were in the neighborhood of
$40,000,000 per year, but for the fiscal year 1927 he estimated that an ap-
propriation of $18,000,000 would be all that would be necessary to cover
the Board's deficit. This estimate did not take into consideration two
routes which have been sold and five others which are being negotiated for.
With these services disposed of it was possible that Admiral Palmer could
have kept the deficit within $15,000,000. This matter of appropriation was
one of the rocks upon which the relations of the Board and Fleet Corpora-
tion finally split. While Admiral Palmer contended that $18,000,000 would
be sufficient to cover the deficit for the fiscal year 1927, the Board insisted
upon asking for an appropriation of $22,000,000, and Admiral Palmer's
refusal to recommend that figure was one of the reasons for his dismissal.
In view of these facts it is clear that the Board's present gesture towards
economy is nothing more than a move to cloud the real issues, and to conceal
its own shortcomings.Its talk of economizing by reducing salaries is an
attempt to discredit Admiral Palmer and to justify its action in removing
him from the presidency of the Fleet Corporation, but those who know the
true facts will not be deceived by such blundering methods, for it is well
known that during the twenty-one months he was in office Admiral Palmer
made a saving of $2,200,000 by cutting salaries which the Board had
authorized before he entered the arena and when it was exercising full
control over the Government's shipping.
Throughout the shipping depression the ships which have suffered least
are those belonging to industrial fleets. The tanker fleets belonging to the
large oil companies have kept running and the freighters belonging to and
carrying the products of the Steel Corporation have maintained their
schedules. A fleet of ships owned by and carrying the products of a large
industry does not have to rely so much upon outside shippers as does an
independent line of freighters; therefore, from the national standpoint,
it is a good thing for any merchant marine if large industries can be induced
to own and operate their own ships. For owners of independent services
the arrangement is harmful, as their ships are deprived of the opportunity
of carrying the products of the industry which owns its own ships. There
is an increasing tendency in the United States toward the creation of
industrial fleets. Henry Ford has recently entered the shipping business
by purchasing and operating freighters to carry his automobiles. This
week, according to advices from Washington, representatives of a com-
bination of automobile manufacturers, including the Dodge, Hudson, Chrvs-
ler, and Hupp, have opened negotiations with the Shipping Board looking
to the purchase of a fleet of from fifteen to twenty vessels to carry their
automobiles to foreign markets. If such powerful financial interests placed
a fleet of freighters on the ocean there is no doubt that the ships would be


  p. 2401 (#1365)                      

1925]
2401
Professional Notes
there to stay. This would mean that these companies would have to open
foreign agencies to solicit and secure freight for the return voyages and
this is the phase of the business which would cut deepest into the business
of the independent shipowners. There is, however, the consolation that
these ships would make formidable competitors of foreign vessels for the
world's trade.
MISCELLANEOUS
The Trade and Industry of Persia
Engineering, 25 September, 1925.—The recent announcement that a pow-
erful American group of banking and industrial interests are negotiating
to finance the construction of a railway from Tehran to the Persian Gulf,
in return for a concession of mineral rights, is a reminder of the present
singular position of Persian railways. Persia is a country about seven times
as large as the United Kingdom, and yet, as is fairly well known, it is still
practically without railways. Roads to a limited extent the country pos-
sesses, for its trade communications in every direction are ancient; but of
many of the roads little is left that is efficient, except the levying of tolls
upon travelers and traders. The system of roads is, in fact, entirely in-
adequate to the requirements of the country, and a large part of such roads
as exist are in the worst possible condition. Of all countries of economic
importance it seems to be the most deficient in means of transport.
Nevertheless the country itself not only possesses great natural riches,
but, as a recent report shows, does a considerable export and import trade,
and in some important respects is being administered admirably. It has called
in the help of American advisers in respect to its finances, and the reorgani-
zation effected with their assistance has been helped in practice by what is de-
scribed as a long-established and extremely efficient Belgian Customs Ad-
ministration. Customs duties yield over one third of the national revenue,
other indirect taxation one sixth, and royalties, paid by the Anglo-Persian
Oil Company, which work out at 16 per cent on the net value of its pro-
duction, a tenth. This company, moreover, spends in Persia four or five
times as much as it pays in royalties and supplies, in addition, a con-
siderable amount of products for use in the country, which would otherwise
have to be imported.
Since the introduction of the American financial advisers, the revenue has
invariably been in excess of the expenditure, and, moreover, while the
revenue has increased, the expenditure has decreased. The policy of cutting
the financial coat according to the cloth actually available is reflected also
in the latest statement of loans and advances issued by the Persian treasury
general in last October. The details are of no great interest, but in sub-
stance the effect of the statement is to show that the amount of the out-
standing debt is only about equal to six months of the country's present
revenue. Nearly two thirds of this is due to the British Government.
Trade, again, has grown steadily. It was of the value of some
£20,000,000 before the war, and in 1923-24 had risen to £32,000,000. This
rise, indeed, did not mean an increase in quantity, being more than repre-
sented by an increase in prices; but as against this, the exchange has steadily
improved, having risen from fifty-five krans to the pound before the war
to forty-nine and one-half in 1923, and an average of forty-two in 1925.
The balance of trade has also moved in favor of the couuntry. In round
figures the imports before the war exceeded the exports by some £4,000,000,
but in the first nine months of the financial year 1924-25, the exports ex-
ceeded the imports by about the same amount. The distribution of trade
has been changed considerably during the war, and does not yet appear to
have reached a stable position. Before the war 60 per cent of Persian trade
was done with Russia, and only 21 per cent with the British Empire, includ-


  p. 2402 (#1366)                      

2402
[Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
G
ing British India. In 1922-23 trade with Russia, which doubtless had
become almost negligible during the war period, stood at 10 per cent, while
that done with the British Empire .was 53 per cent, and, in 1923-24, trade
with the British Empire had increased to 57 per cent and with Russia to
18 per cent. Having regard to the considerable and beneficial influence that
has been exercised by the American financial advisers, it is interesting to
observe that Persian trade with the United States, which before the war
had been I per cent of the total figure, amounted to only 4 per cent in
1923-24, all but 5 per cent of which consisted of Persian exports.
The details given in the report under notice, while they confirm the
belief in the considerable possibilities of the Persian market, show ground
for some apprehension as to the extent to which its benefits will be en-
joyed by British trade. The total imports from the British Empire in
1923-24 amounted to something under £10,000,000, consisting chiefly of soft
goods. In these the competition of other countries is beginning to be felt,
and unfortunately as much may be said of the small trade that is being done
at present in metal manufactures. The total imports from the British
Empire of nails, screws, rivets, tubes, and so forth, was not much over
£200,000 and no British imports of other class of metal goods even amounted
to this. This figure, however, was considerably less than in the previous
year, owing to revived competition from Russia and Germany. The trade
in motor cars, such as it is, is almost entirely in the hands of the United
States, with a little from Italy.
The position, therefore, seems to be that Persia has set its house in order
so far as concerns its finances, that at present its international commerce is
in a stage that may be called rudimentary, compared with what might be
expected from the richness of the country, and that other countries are
showing more active anxiety than Great Britain, to get their share of such
business as is to be done. No doubt can be entertained but that the back-
wardness of Persian trade is due both primarily and mainly to the absence
of transport facilities. The cost of carriage of goods is fantastically high,
or at least, the rates would be fantastic if the difficulties to be overcome by
the carriers were not as great as they are. A correlative disadvantage,
which arises from insufficient means of communication, is that delivery
takes an inordinate time; and this is a circumstance that is the more detri-
mental to trade in a country where, as in Persia, the usual rate of interest
to firms of good standing in the bazaars is 12 per cent, and, from a mini-
mum of 7 per cent, may rise to an undefined maximum.
Primarily, therefore, the most likely opening in Persia for engineering
trade is in means of locomotion. The government program for the im-
provement of the roads involves an expenditure of more than £5,000,000,
in addition to the cost of maintaining the existing roads. Improved roads
will, of course, lead to increased demand for vehicles to deal with increased
trade. For a long time to come, however, Persia will have exceptional need
of road transport suitable to the hardest condition. The government ap-
pears to be anxious to facilitate the supply of vehicles, especially for indus-
trial traffic. The duty on motor cars and bicycles stands, indeed, at 15 per
cent ad valorem, but motor lorries are by a recent law admitted free. Persia
seems, therefore, as the report says, a virgin and rapidly expanding market
for cheap and strongly built cars and lorries with a considerable reserve
of engine power, a clearance of at least 10 inches, and (owing to the hump-
backed nature of culverts or local bridges, where such exist) not too long
a wheelbase. As in reports on other countries, great stress is laid on the
need for local agencies and depots for spare parts, which some American
and Italian manufacturers are already providing. Local garages will also
be required, for, except for Ford cars and a few other makes, the nearest
depots for spare parts are at Bagdad, Bombay, or even in Europe. The
Persian chauffeur is quick at learning, but generally a rough driver, while


  p. 2403 (#1367)                      

1925]
2403
Professional Notes
the owner seems to be attracted by what, over here, is best known as "spit
and polish."
Among other products likely to be in demand when communications im-
prove, are agricultural and textile machinery. The supply of charcoal,
which is the staple domestic fuel, is diminishing, and surveys of such sources
of water power as exist, with a view to hydro-electric development, are
suggested, as likely to have good results if satisfactory water supply can
be assured.
These recommendations appear to be based on the present course of trade.
What may be the extent to which trade will grow, when the country is pro-
vided with what without offense may be called a civilized transport system,
can hardly be predicted. About a fourth of the territory of Persia is richly
fertile, and a large proportion of the remainder is said to be of a light soil
that could be readily cultivated if it were only irrigated. The legal system
is slow, and commercial manners not well developed in all districts; but
here, again, the influence of improved communications could not fail to be
felt. It must be remembered, too, that though the people do not seem to
have any particular mechanical genius, they are the successors of an ancient
civilization, and at least elementary education is widely diffused throughout
the population.
Amphibian Operations
By Sir Herbert Russell, The Naval and Military Record, 30 September,
1925.-Now that fairly full accounts have come to hand in this country
regarding the Spanish landing at Alhucemas Bay, it is possible to study
both the strategical conception and the tactical development of this phase
of the campaign against the Riffs. It is the most interesting phase of the
operations, for, although the French offensive was on a bigger scale, this
was a purely military movement from a pre-existing line of advance. But at
Alhucemas the Spaniards had to gain a foothold against strong enemy
opposition, and the fact that they were heavily repulsed on the first attempt
is pretty clear evidence as to the nature of their task.
Certain of our newspapers have described this landing as the "Spanish
Gallipoli.” Without any desire to minimize the skill and valor of the Spanish
troops, I think the comparison is altogether extravagant. I do not know
Alhucemas Bay, but the photographs of the successful landing show it to
have been carried out across a very flat foreshore, sloping very easily up
from the surf and extending back beyond rifle range-how much beyond I
cannot say. I do know Gallipoli. The land all around Cape Helles con-
sists of bluff cliffs, with very small sandy beaches at their base. In many
places these bluffs are perfectly easy to climb, but they lend themselves most
effectively to defense. They are within easy range of artillery fire from
Kum Kale on the Asiatic shore. They can be dominated by batteries on
Achi Baba, to which the broken nature of the ground offers abundant con-
cealment. I have looked upon the small square shelter trench on the spot
at which the Essex men "scratched" themselves in at the top of their bloody
trail from where the River Clyde lay, and I could only marvel how they
ever got there.
But we may admit this similarity between the two landings; they were
both what is nowadays called “amphibian.” That is to say, warships cov-
ered the debarkation of the troops, thereby making the operations combined
undertakings by naval and military forces. The first covering attack by the
Spanish warships at Alhucemas failed to "smother" the enemy sufficiently
to enable the troops to maintain their foothold. The second, in which a
number of French ships took part, was more successful. I gather that the
character of the country hereabouts is very much more favorable to direct
fire than it was in Gallipoli. Moreover, the Allied warships had plenty


  p. 2404 (#1368)                      

2404
(Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
of spotting aircraft. Had we been able to loose-off a hundred airplanes
when the fleet opened its bombardment upon Cape Helles, the landing of the
Twenty-Ninth Division would have been a very different affair.
When the truth about that great heroic exploit began to be known-or
rather guessed at from the terrible magnitude of the casualty lists—there
was a good deal of criticism at the comparative inadequacy of the naval
support to the landing. Apparently the general impression was that a great
fleet should be able to so plaster a given coast defense with projectiles as to
render the debarkation of troops a comparatively simple matter. The war-
ships "did their damnedest" in this respect. Their concentrated fire prob-
ably amounted to the nearest approach to a hurricane barrage which that
stage of the war had yet produced—at any rate on our side.
But we had yet to learn how the conditions of warfare had changed since
the fleet had last covered military operations on a big scale. The bombard-
ment of fortresses in the Dardanelles during the attempt to force the Straits
a month earlier had proved tolerably successful. Immense destruction had
been wrought against large, visible, solid targets. But the direct fire from
the ships passed almost harmlessly over the honeycomb of machine-gun
nests on the Helles cliffs, and the hidden field guns ranging between Krithia
and Sed-el-Bah. When it was all over we could see the cause of failure.
We wanted howitzers for high-angle fire, and airplanes, both to spot for
the gun-layers and to bomb on top of the puffs of vapor belching forth
from vineyards and gullies.
Amphibian operations under modern conditions of warfare call for the
largest possible measure of aerial cooperation. The Queen Elizabeth blazing
away from her 15-inch guns at anything she could see, or thought she could
see, was a magnificent spectacle, but the results were not worth the cost of
the ammunition. I do not say that many men both in the Navy and the
Army had not visualized the possibilities of amphibian operations, but there
had never been any serious rehearsal. Some combined maneuvers were
carried out on the east coast a few years before the Great War. They
furnished some good films to kinematograph operators and some excellent
pictures to the illustrated papers, but of instructional value they possessed
about as much as the naval maneuvers of thirty years ago did in the way of
showing what was going to happen at Jutland.
The fact is it had long been a tradition that it is not the business of the
Navy to engage land fortifications. In the age of very limited ranges this
was undoubtedly true. Indifferently protected ships, with a fire delivery of
two or three miles, were likely to come off badly in a duel with massive
fortifications, but the extraordinary development of gun power has changed
all that. Massive fortifications are no longer built these days, because they
cannot resist high explosive. The fate of Liege demonstrated this.
The Germans taught us the value of high-elevation gun mountings for
plunging fire in naval actions, and today our ships are very much better
equipped to support a military landing than they were in 1915. Students of
war will probably regret that the long-talked-of and fully-rehearsed am-
phibian attack upon Ostend was never delivered. The idea, it will be re-
membered, was to try and land an immense number of tanks under cover
of a smashing bombardment by the Navy. It is, perhaps, idle to speculate
upon what never can be proven. Had the attempt come as a surprise it
might have succeeded. In this case the right flank of the German Army
would have been rolled up from the coast, and we should have had to keep
Ostend open as a port of communication, which, I rather suspect, would
have proved a costly business.
Coming back to the Alhucemas operation, one could form a better esti-
mate of the achievement if one knew the strength of the opposing forces
and the gun power and dispositions which had to be subdued. I am pre-
pared to believe that the Riffs fight as well as the Turks and that they are


  p. 2405 (#1369)                      

1925)
2405
Professional Notes
being quite as well led. But the Spanish forces had what we so totally
lacked in Gallipoli—an effective aerial reconnaissance. Even so, they were
forced to withdraw after their first landing. From this I am rather dis-
posed to infer that the airmen had not done their reconnoitering very thor-
oughly, for aerial photographs and powerful magnifying glasses put a heavy
discount upon even the most skilful camouflage.
The recent grand maneuvers by the United States Pacific fleet were in
the nature of amphibian operations, a big landing of marines being carried
out at Hawaii. The umpires declare that the attack succeeded and that
the landing was made good, but there has been rather an unkind suggestion
that propaganda was one of the purposes of the demonstration, to persuade
Congress to vote more money for the defense of Hawaii. If the bombard-
ment was leveled against the static defenses of the place, it is not difficult
to believe that it did succeed.
Why does our own navy never carry out any rehearsals of this kind ?
The "reminiscence cruise" of the Mediterranean fleet among the islands
which figured so prominently during the Gallipoli campaign has no doubt
been very interesting, but of what instructional value was it? The present
system under which senior naval officers take courses at Army schools is
excellent, but it does not go nearly far enough in the way of amphibian
training. How do these officers apply the knowledge they thus acquire?
In the old days of naval brigades the sea service got more real experience
of amphibian warfare than it does now, when the principle of landing for
military purposes is altogether ruled out-and quite properly so, I think ;
for it is not the business of the navy to do soldiers' work. But it cer-
tainly is the Navy's business to enable soldiers to do their work so far as
the element of salt water can contribute to this result.
The most effective answer to my question, of course, would be coordina-
tion of supreme command of all the fighting services, still maintaining
decentralized administration. The navy and the army worked in splendid
comradeship during the Great War, but from time to time there arose the
crippling condition of divided counsels. Sir Ian Hamilton asked Sir John
de Robeck to "go on." Sir John de Robeck said he was not "going on."
Probably both were right, but campaigning on these lines holds very poor
assurance of success. One recalls Napoleon's dictum: “Either Kellerman,
or I, but not both in conjunction.”
A New Industry
The Gazette and Daily, York, Pennsylvania, 17 October, 1925.—The York
Oil and Chemical Company, incorporated under the laws of the state of
Pennsylvania, has just completed its plant near Richland Avenue, on the
Grantley property of the York Manufacturing Company. The company is
incorporated for $100,000 and has the following officers: Joseph L. Rosen-
miller, president; Charles H. Ehrenfeld, vice president; Thomas Shipley,
treasurer; Earle W. Gardner, secretary
The incorporation of this company was the result of two years of ex-
haustive service and laboratory tests on oils made by lubricating and re-
frigerating engineers in the test plant of the York Manufacturing Company
and in commercial plants.
The plant consists of a modern one-story steel and brick building, 126 feet
8 inches long by 76 feet 8 inches wide. On the north side of the building a
loading platform 17 feet wide extends the full length of the building, and
parallel with the railroad siding. This structure is partitioned off into office
space, oil laboratories, boiler and wash rooms, and extensive floor area de-
voted to the manufacture of oils for the lubrication of refrigerating
machinery.


  p. 2406 (#1370)                      

2406
[Dec
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
This is the first company in the world incorporated for the purpose of
specializing in the manufacture of oils for the lubrication of ammonia and
CO, (carbon dioxide) compressors, it is declared. The plant contains the
most modern oil blending, purifying, and filling apparatus that can be had
Five steel storage tanks each of capacity of 12,500 gallons are used for
storage of stock oils. The building also contains approximately 1,000 feet
of pipe lines leading from tanks to blending kettles and purifying and filling
apparatus. This plant has a capacity of 2,500 gallons of refined oil per
day, and is now on a production basis.
The York Oil and Chemical Company is a subsidiary of the York Vanu-
facturing Company, and will market its oils through that company's ex-
tensive chain of selling agencies.
CURRENT NAVAL AND PROFESSIONAL PAPERS
"The Need for a Government Ship Replacement Program." By Admiral
Benson. The Nautical Gazette, October 3, et seq.
"Recent Development in Light Aluminum Alloys and Their Application"
The American Metal Market, September.
"Recent Progress in Flying Boat Design." Engineering, October 2.
“The Influence of Air Power on Coast Defense.” The Coast Artillery
Journal, October.
“Anti-Aircraft Artillery.” “The Supply, Training, and Organization
of Technical Specialists." "On Ottoman Subjects." The Journal of the
Royal Artillery, October.
"The Admiralty System of Higher Education.” Engineering, October


  p. 2407 (#1371)                      

NOTES ON INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS
FROM OCTOBER 3 TO NOVEMBER 3
PREPARED BY
PROFESSOR ALLAN WESTCOTT, U. S. NAVAL ACADEMY
EUROPEAN SECURITY AGREEMENTS SIGNED
SUCCESSFUL RESULTS AT LOCARNO.—After ten days of earnest and often
critical negotiations, from October 5 to October 16, the prime ministers
of European states assembled in the little town of Locarno, Switzerland,
reached complete agreement on a series of treaties binding Germany to
peaceful settlement of disputes with the three chief nations on her frontiers.
The protocols were signed by the British, French, German, Italian, Polish,
and Czecho-Slovakian premiers on October 16. If the treaties were ratified
by the parliaments of the nations concerned it was planned that the final
signing should take place in London on December 1. The agreements
reached were as follows:
(1) The Rhineland Treaty, basically between France, Belgium, and
Germany, and guaranteed by England and Italy. This is a joint agreement
of Germany and France, and Germany and Belgium, to arbitrate all future
disputes, the provisions of the Versailles and other existing treaties re-
maining unaffected. Germany agrees to apply at once for admission to the
League of Nations, the Council meeting to receive her application in De-
cember. The present demilitarized Rhine Zone established by the Versailles
Treaty is to be held in violate by France and Germany unless one or the
other shall break certain provisions of the Versailles Treaty or League
Covenant bearing on the question. In case of unwarranted attack, Great
Britain and Italy pledge aid to the nation attacked.
(2) A technical arbitration treaty between Germany and France.
(3) A similar treaty between Germany and Belgium.
(4) An arbitration treaty between Germany and Poland.
(5) An arbitration treaty between Germany and Czecho-Slovakia.
Subordinate to and facilitating these treaties, certain other agreements
were made: First, France and Poland, and France and Czecho-Slovakia
entered into mutual agreements which in effect guaranteed support against
Germany in case of her violation of the arbitration agreement. Second, the
Allied powers conceded to Germany: that upon her entry into the League
special regard would be given to her disarmed condition in calling upon her
to fulfill military and economic obligations; that if possible she should be
given a mandate (probably one of her former colonies) ; that the evacuation
of Cologne should be hastened and improvements made in the government
of the Saar Valley.


  p. 2408 (#1372)                      

2408
[Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
The agreement was generally hailed as a promise of bringing France and
Germany together, furthering peace in central Europe, strengthening the
League of Nations, and isolating Bolshevism.
EFFECT IN BERLIN.—Premier Luther and Foreign Minister Stresemann,
the German representatives at Locarno, were warmly greeted upon their
return to Berlin, but not by leaders of the Nationalist party. In token of
their opposition to the treaties, several Nationalist members withdrew
from the Luther Cabinet. Minister Stresemann gave assurance that a large
majority in the Reichstag approved the agreements and would insure their
ratification.
GREEK-BULGARIAN HOSTILITIES HALTED
European diplomacy was startled on October 20 by news of threatened
hostilities between Greece and Bulgaria arising from a clash on the frontier
between Greek and Bulgarian troops on the night of October 19-20. Fears
were left lest the intensely nationalistic military leaders who had recently
assumed power in Greece, were deliberately employing the affair to bring
on war.
Pending official investigation, the facts of the clash remained obscure.
From the conflicting reports of the two governments it appeared that a
Greek soldier was shot by a Bulgarian sentry on Bulgarian soil. Efforts
of the Greeks to secure the body led to a general fusilade by troops of both
nations. Greece then sent a 48-hour ultimatum demanding apology, punish-
ment, and a two million gold franc indemnity. Upon Bulgaria's refusal,
Greek troops occupied several Bulgarian towns.
In the meantime Bulgaria telegraphed an appeal to the League of Na-
tions. Aristide Briand, as President of the League Council, on October 23
sent messages to both Athens and Sofia inviting envoys to a session of the
Council set for October 26 and exhorting both nations to withdraw their
troops behind the frontiers pending the meeting.
At the session of the Council a resolution was adopted requesting the
Greek and Bulgarian Governments to inform the Council within twenty-
four hours that their troops had been given absolute orders to remove within
their respective frontiers, and to inform the Council within sixty hours that
all hostilities had ceased. Military officers of Great Britain, France, and
Italy were sent to the scene to see that these terms were carrid out. Both
Greece and Bulgaria acquiesced. On October 29, upon the arrival of the
military representatives of the powers, the Greek evacuation was carried out.
A special commission headed by Sir Horace Rumboldt, British ambassa-
dor to Spain, and including representatives of France, Italy, Sweden, and
the Netherlands, was appointed to leave Geneva on November 6 in order to
fix responsibility for the outbreak and make a report to the Council at its
meeting on December 12.
FORCE BEHIND League ActION.—(From New York Times of October
30.)-Success of the League effort this week cannot be charged up entirely


  p. 2409 (#1373)                      

1925)
2409
Notes on International Affairs
to the force of moral suasion. There was more involved. England and
France meant just what they said when they sent word to the Greeks to
get out of Bulgaria in sixty hours.
When Austen Chamberlain arrived in Paris on Monday he was closeted
with M. Briand for two hours. The British foreign minister is understood
to have laid down the proposition that the Council must approach the situa-
tion resolyed to go through with it. He is said to have stated the British
Government was ready, if either party resisted the League, first, to break
off diplomatic relations; second, to break off economic relations; third, to
make a fleet demonstration; fourth, to blockade the ports.
It is entirely possible, indeed probable, that the Athens government knew
this attitude of the British foreign secretary, with which the French de-
clared themselves in agreement and subsequently the whole Council approved.
It is understood that in League circles discussion of eventualities led to
a consideration of what would happen if any such League blockade inter-
fered with American shipping, even in an isolated case. It is said that
such an incident would probably be avoided, but if it arose it was the opinion
of League members that neither the American Government nor American
public opinion would wish to make a big issue out of the possible incon-
venience arising out of the League's efforts to prevent war, to which purpose
Washington could not possibly be opposed in principle.
FRANCE
CAILLAUX DROPPED FROM CABINET.–At the close of October it became
necessary for Premier Painlevé to force out of his cabinet Finance Minister
Caillaux, whose financial policies, and especially his opposition to a capital
levy, had aroused increasing dissatisfaction both in the Chamber and
within the cabinet. Upon M. Caillaux's refusal to resign alone, the entire
cabinet resigned, but was immediately reorganized by Premier Poincaré
with ten of his former colleagues and four new members, two of whom
were in the Herriot Cabinet. These additions secured at least temporary
support from the Socialists, though the fate of the ministry remained at
the mercy of any sudden combination of the extreme Right or Left. Premier
Painlevé himself took over the Ministry of Finance, but with another minis-
ter in charge of the budget. It was reported that the new government
favored some form of capital levy, as the only means of relieving the present
fiscal situation, although such a measure would probably be defeated in the
French Senate.
TROUBLE OF FRANCE IN SYRIA.—The difficulties of France in her man-
date of Syria arising from the revolt of the Druse tribesmen, were in-
creased in the latter part of October by a revolt within the capital city of
Damascus. Pan-Arab and other anti-French elements in the city, taking
advantage of the absence of French troops in the Druse campaign, created
disturbances and led the French forces on October 18-20 to bombard the
city from forts on the outskirts of the town. Although foreign residents
had been warned, the bombardment caused some loss of life and considerable
damage to property.
The alleged blundering and tactlessness of the French governor, General
Sarrail, both in this affair and the Druse uprising, led to demands at home


  p. 2410 (#1374)                      

2410 U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings [Dec.
for his recall. On October 31 the Permanent Mandates Commission of the
League of Nations asked France for official comment on the petitions and
protests filed with the League as a result of the Damascus bombardment.
FRENCH LOSSES IN COLONIAL WARS.—According to a report by a com-
mittee of the French Chamber, France has lost 3,000,000,000 francs and
17,000 men since taking over the protectorate of Morocco and the mandate
over Syria (1920). In Morocco 2,176 were killed and 8,297 wounded, and in
Syria 6,626 killed, wounded, or missing. The cost in Morocco was about
one billion francs and in Syria two billion. The premier said he would ask
300,000,000 francs additional credits for the Morocco campaign for the
period July-December.
In Syria the losses in the Druse campaign have been 585 killed, wounded,
and missing, of which about half were French soldiers.
ITALY
PROGRESS OF FASCISMO.-(From Time, October 19.)-Last week (Octo-
ber 12-19] Fascismo took a new and overwhelming stride toward dominance
in Italian affairs. Announcements on three successive days outlined a pro-
gram of absolutism which the Fascisti have called "the third wave of the
Fascist revolution." The announcements were as follows:
One. An agreement has been made between the Italian Confederation
of Industry (representing practically all Italian employes) and the Con-
federation of Fascist Trade Unions, to the effect that in all employer-em-
ploye disputes the two confederations are to regard each other as having
the sole right to represent respectively all Italian employers and all Italian
workingmen.
By this agreement the Socialists, who for thirty years have assumed to
themselves the right to champion and defend the working class, are ruled
out of practically all labor disputes. The Fascists declare that the measure
will put an end to the Socialists' attempts to start a Marxian class war,
and will bring about the realization of the Fascist ideal of class collaboration.
Two. The Mussolini Cabinet approved a bill providing that henceforth
the Mayor of Rome and the mayors of all Italian municipalities of less than
5,000 inhabitants will be superseded by officers appointed by the Central
Government. Thus the electorates of the towns affected will have practically
no voice in the administration of their local affairs.
The Fascisti assert that this "reform" is made necessary by the fact that
Italians are frequently swayed by passion at local elections, and do not
return to office such able men as the Central Government would set over
them.
The proposed officials are likened to the "Podestas" of the early Italian
republics, who were Governors possessed of extensive powers.
Three. Several interlocking measures were likewise approved by the
Fascist Council of Ministers which are intended to alter the whole political
structure of Italy. What is proposed is that the Senate shall be gradually
transformed from a body the members of which are appointed by the King,
into an elective assembly whose members shall be representatives of various
organizations recognized by the Fascist government, chiefly agriculturalists,
industrialists, and workingmen. At the same time the power of the Senate
would be increased, so that it would eventually become the more important
of the two houses of Parliament.
Significance. Premier Mussolini undoubtedly intends to throw his whole
influence behind this program. And he will have a united Fascist party


  p. 2411 (#1375)                      

1925)
2411
Notes on International Affairs
at his back. It is considered that the "reforms” have a very good chance
of being imposed upon Italy.
ATTACKS ON MASONS.—During the same week, in Florence, Fascists
killed and wounded a number of Freemasons and plundered and burned the
houses of members of the order. Press reports stated that a Mason had
previously shot and killed a Fascist leader. The head of the Masonic Order
in Italy issued notice from Rome that meetings and activities were to cease
until "the law abolishing secret societies shall be made void.”
GREAT BRITAIN
PREMIER BALDWIN'S POLICIES.—(From Time, October 19.)–At the an-
nual convention of the British Conservative Party at Brighton, Premier
Baldwin spoke in support of the policies of his government. He was full
of calming assurances that Britain is not so badly off as alarmists declare.
A striking feature was Mr. Baldwin's assertion that "Great Britain means
to stay in Mosul and Iraq .... and will cooperate with the Iraq Govern-
ment to insure the stability and progress of that country until such time as
our help is no longer needed.'
He denied that a Turko-British crisis is impending, declaring that Britain
is still willing to arbitrate the question of whether Iraq or Turkey shall
eventually possess Mosul, indicated that he believes the League of Nations
and the Hague Court will be able to induce Turkey to fulfill the obligation
which Englishmen consider she assumed at Brussels last October.
Commenting upon European affairs he declared for “regional compacts"
and the entrance of Germany into the League as a force for World Peace.
Next he touched upon domestic affairs, admitted that he had instituted
the much criticized coal subsidy with reluctance, but defended it as better
than the alternative of subjecting England to "a crippling industrial
struggle.” He replied as follows to those Conservatives who urged that
the British Government crush British communism by Fascist tactics : "I've
been told that this country wants a Mussolini. I have great respect for the
chief minister of a great country like Italy, but I know the temperament of
my own people. The English people will never tolerate a dictator. The
English people will never tolerate being Prussianized, nor, may I add,
Russianized.”
He gave assurances, however, that "any attempt to seduce the loyalty
of the nation's armed forces” would be strongly dealt with.
UNITED STATES DEBT SETTLEMENTS
Czecho-SLOVAKIAN DEBT AGREEMENT.-On October 6-9 agreement was
quickly reached between the United States Debt Funding Commission and
the representatives sent to Washington by Czecho-Slovakia. The settlement
fixed a compromise figure of $115,000,000 (two million less than the Ameri-
can estimate) as the debt total, with payments extending over sixty-two
years and interest at 3 per cent for ten years and 372 per cent thereafter.
The amount of the payments will be $3,000,000 a year for eighteen years and
about $6,000,000 in the years following.
ITALIAN MISSION IN WASHINGTON.—The Italian Debt Commission to the
United States arrived in Washington on November 2. It was headed by
Count Volpi, and included five other members.


  p. 2412 (#1376)                      

2412
[Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
CHINA
OPENING OF TARIFF CONFERENCE.—The Chinese Tariff Conference
opened on October 26 at the Winter Palace in Peking with many Chinese
delegates and representatives of twelve foreign powers. Minister John Van
A. MacMurray and Silas A. Strawn represented the United States. Out-
side the gates of the palace 2,000 students rioted against the Provisional
Government, killing a policeman and injuring a score more. The Chinese
proposals presented on the opening day were summarized in the press as
follows:
These ask that the powers restore tariff autonomy to China and accept
a new national Chinese tariff law, to take effect not later than January 1,
1929, setting schedules ranging between 772 and 40 per cent for most im-
ports and between 50 and 80 per cent for wines and tobacco. China would
then agree to abolish the likin, or taxes on interprovincial commerce.
The keynote of the replies of the powers was struck by Mr. MacMurray,
the American Minister, who said the United States was prepared to con-
sider openmindedly and generously any reasonable plan with a view to
realizing China's aspirations.
A statement of the rather conservative Japanese attitude was given by
Eki Hioki, who reminded the Chinese that Japan had won tariff autonomy
only after a struggle of fifty-three years, and that China could expect to
reach her goal only by successive stages. Mr. Hioki was the Japanese
Minister to Peking, who, in 1915, presented Japan's famous "twenty-one
demands" on China.
China's Civil War.—(Associated Press, October 25.)—Washington,
October 25.-The fate of the Chinese customs conference apparently turns
on the attitude of one of the three militarists who dominate China's po-
litical affairs.
For the moment, General Feng Yu-shiang, the “Christian General,"
whose revolt against Marshal Wu Pei-fu in October, 1924, sent that for-
mer Peking dictator into retirement and turned control of the Central
Government over to Chang Tso-lin, Manchurian war lord, has not disclosed
his purpose. He apparently holds the balance of power between Wu and
Chang, and plans for the customs conference are proceeding at Peking on
the assumption that he will continue his support of Chang.
The sudden reentry of Wu into the tangle of Chinese internal politics
with the support of the Yangtse Valley provincial military chiefs, however,
conceivably is based on an understanding with Feng, which has not been
revealed.
In any event, the conference delegates assembled at Peking are bystanders
in this new Chinese conflict. They can be expected to observe complete
neutrality, although the statement that Chang has maintained his hold on
Manchuria and widened it to grasp the powers of Central Government in
Peking through Japanese aid never has been denied.
Wu's adherents already have driven Chang out of the Shanghai province,
into which his control had extended, and forced him back all along the line
toward Central China, with Peking apparently the goal of the drive they
now have formally placed in Wu's hands. At one side of the direct road
to the capital stands Feng, with a busy artery of military supply stretching
from his headquarters at Kalgan into Mongolia, and thus to Russian Soviet
sources, placing him in a strategic position to seize Peking and overthrow
the Central Government should political strategy require him to revert,
even temporarily, to Wu's standard.


  p. 2413 (#1377)                      

1925)
2413
Notes on International Affairs
Most Washington observers have felt that it would be impossible for
Wu and Feng to come together and act again in harmony. They have
pointed out that the defection of Feng while Wu was preparing to grapple
with Chang in an effort to carry his control into Manchuria by force of
arms hurled Wu from power overnight, and that the latter would not be
likely to trust Feng again.
THREAT TO JAPAN.-(New York Times, October 21.)-Tokio, October
20.—The fact that there may be possible seeds of a second Russo-Japanese
war in the revolt of the central provinces of China against the Peking
Government is seen as one reason why the Japanese Government is watch-
ing the civil war development with grave anxiety.
Should Feng Yu-shiang follow Wu Pei-fu and join the revolt there is a
chance that these two, backed by Chinese opposing the present Government
and supplied with Russian money and munitions, would defeat Chang
Tso-lin and include Manchuria in the semi-Bolshevist Government they
would form.
In this event Japan would either lose the South Manchuria Railway,
Port Arthur and other Manchurian holdings, or be forced to enter the con-
flict, and it is acknowledged that Japan would go to war if its Manchurian
holdings were at stake. In case Marshal Chang's position is threatened by
a pro-Soviet alliance Japan would probably go to his aid with money and
munitions, which is a situation that might lead directly to a Russian war.
Even though a Russo-Japanese war did not result, Japan's helping of
Chang would be misinterpreted as meddling in China with ulterior purposes
by other nations whose friendship might be alienated, and it would also be
extremely expensive.
It is recognized, however, that this situation is unlikely to develop as
Marshal Chang's position in Manchuria is so nearly impregnable, due to
the rough terrain and the lack of means of transportation, that an invasion
from China proper would have little chance of success. But its possibility
is strong enough to warrant the Japanese Government's grave concern.


  p. 2414 (#1378)                      

BOOK REVIEWS
THE LAWLESS LAW OF NATIONS. By STERLING E. Ed-
MUNDS, LL.D. Washington, D.C.: John Byrne and Company.
$5.00.
REVIEWED BY REAR ADMIRAL W. L. RODGERS, U. S. Navy, RET.
The book is not so much an exposition of the Law of Nations as it is a
stricture thero. The law of nations as it is practiced today does not
agree with the author's philosophy of life and government, and he displays
some resentment against it and its upholders. The writer's summary of the
state of international law is most learned, but he has the obsession that it
is developed and manipulated for purposes foreign to the good of the peoples
of the world. He believes that rulers of states, even states with democratic
forms of government, are not real representatives of their peoples and the
latter's wishes.
He states in his preface: "I feel that I have demonstrated the complete
oppugnancy between the prevailing system of the law of nations and the free
progress of man as a social and moral being. In doing so, I have been
compelled to deny that the law of nations is in fact a branch of juris-
prudence, and thus to part company with my professional brethren in this
field."
He believes that people should strip their governments of external power
they now have, but disavows that he has any bias toward Bolshevism,
Socialism, or Anarchism. The writer states that, in the course of history,
civilized peoples have thrown off despotism in their domestic affairs and
substituted a government of limited powers controlled by the people.
Notwithstanding, in foreign affairs, nations are ruled by a narrow oli-
garchy who control peace and war and the manner of waging war as they
think advantageous to themselves and their own interests; this state of af-
fairs he wishes remedied, for it reacts unfavorably on domestic govern-
ments.
"The Law of Nations, so-called, is not a law of restraints upon sovereign
states, but rather á law of condonation; a law sanctioning every outrage
that a sovereign government commits against other peoples for its own
aggrandizement. . . . . No people who has ever permitted its government
to strip another people of its liberty has ever saved its own."
The writer thus throws down a challenge to the law of nations to justify
its existence.
He does not find the sovereign state living according to the rules evolved
by man as a social and moral being in his municipal systems.


  p. 2415 (#1379)                      

1925)
2415
Book Reviews
"Peoples . ... must establish .... safeguards against the capricious
irresponsibility of their Sovereign Governments in the international field.”
The writer regards governments as promoting wars for the benefit of
the rulers themselves and their banking and commercial friends, and thinks
that in international matters "economic man in pursuing his self interest
would, as invariably results, promote the good of all.” This view arises
from a doctrine which is now somewhat outgrown.
We are getting more and more government as the complexity of our
social and economic life increases, precisely because the "economic man" pur-
suing self interest does not promote the good of all, either in national or
international affairs.
Considering the "economic man" to which the writer alludes, it must be
acknowledged that he has two functions. He is a producer and also a
consumer. It is as producer that all the world can and does cooperate
with his neighbor. In general, people do not wish to stop their neighbors
from producing, but when it comes to consumption of products and enjoy-
ing the fruits of labor the economic man does not cooperate but competes
with his neighbor. Production is difficult; consumption is a pleasure and
satsfaction; and the chief end of government is to provide rule and order,
so that each man may consume the fruits of his own labor himself and
not have to forfeit them to another.
With the developments in mechanical power and transportation of the
last century, the economic units of the world have become very large
Whole nations are now competing collectively with other nations in the
economic field.
The writer believes that the "inherent vice of the so-called Society of
Nations" lies in its "fraudulent organization of ruling politicians through-
out the world, disguised and glorified as sovereign, that is, omnipotent states,
whose power no people can limit.”
But all governments are more or less representative of the people. Even
despotism is tempered by assasination, and the writer does not explain how
the ruling politicians whom he dislikes can be replaced by a purer and
better choice, more representative of the people's will.
The writer is not alone in proclaiming that international law is no true
law. There are two conceptions of law, says he, one "embodying the idea
of order founded in agreement between man and man as rational beings
effecting peace through bearing and forbearing in their relations with their
fellow-man, the other, denying the possibility of peace save through the
surrender by man of all his rights into the hands of an autocrat.”
Taking either view of law, the relations between sovereign states are
not law, for they are founded neither on invariable custom and precedent
nor on the sanctions provided by authority. The generally accepted view
is that law is a rule of conduct imposed under a sanction of superior might.
As the world is guided by this latter conception, let us see why it cannot be
enforced in international affairs, as the author wishes. In municipal matters
observance of law is constrained upon an offender, by a force so great that


  p. 2416 (#1380)                      

2416
(Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
he does not make overt resistance. The examination in the court is assumed
to be impartial, and when judgment is pronounced it is futile to with-
stand it.
If, however, the law is unable to summon an overwhelming force to its
support, it is likely to be disregarded. There are many laws on the statute
book which cannot summon force enough to get themselves obeyed.
The writer chooses "economic” man working for himself as enjoying the
ideal condition of life, but admits that government is necessary to provide
order. However, he regards military force as wholly an evil thing because
it is abused by people holding governmental authority for their own ends.
But this abuse is a secondary matter, and this view is not in accord with
history, which shows that order provided by government through use of
superior force is the primary condition for the development of "economic
man in the specialization of industry. We are now pushing this specializa-
tion further than ever. Great industrial nations need order more than ever
in the past. They cannot place themselves and their industrial organization
at the mercy of nations less highly organized in industry. “We commanded
you that he that would not work neither should he eat,” says the Bible.
But this command was possible of execution only in a world protected and
given peace by Roman arms. Without similar protection lawless people
today might eat without working. To be sure the necessary armament of a
nation may be turned against the liberties of its own people by the abuse of
power on the part of rulers, but, even in such a case, the government must
continue to perform its first duty, the preservation of order, or even a
despotic government (tyranny) will fall.
The writer believes that nations can live together harmoniously by wish-
ing and willing to do so. Who then is to decide as to the division of the
fruits of the earth when disputes arise? This can only be settled by a
super-government complete in all its parts, and if we should ever get such
a thing, the originally satisfactory adjustments of different regions and
peoples will vary so in the lapse of time that virile peoples will probably
seek to right their real or fancied wrongs by civil war instead of by inter-
national war. It is not an attractive alternative.
The writer believes that the law of nature or of morality should be the
guidance of nations in their relations. Of course, this is admitted by all
as an academic truth, but we never have determined for individuals what
is the sound general criterion as to the moral duty of self-sacrifice. Yet
that is the moral question confronting nations when they find their interests
and policies clashing. After conceding reasonable compromises, they must
either sacrifice their rights and interests or fight. The law of nations is
then, as the writer says, no true law. It is a code of etiquette and con-
venience and a guide as long as the conditions last which each rule was
made to meet.
Regarding states as sovereign, that is, as having no superior to lay
commands upon them, there are two parts to international law: one regards
the relations of the states as such, that is, of their respective peoples as


  p. 2417 (#1381)                      

1925)
2417
Book Reviews
collective units; and the other, that of individuals of the respective, states
with other states.
While a treaty is no true law by Austin's definition of a rule having an
enforceable sanction, yet, when ratified, it becomes national law with relation
to the respective nationals of each country, because each state enforces
observance upon its own nationals.
But a treaty is made to suit the conditions of the day; as time passes
it may become unsuitable to new conditions. If, then, one party wishes to
break or amend it, it should have some recognized way of doing so without
incurring the charge of law-breaking. If this country adheres to the World
Court, and places treaties on a basis entirely legal, it can never release
itself from antiquated and unsuitable agreements; for a court is in its
essence conservative, and if a world court proceeds to legislate to meet new
conditions by judicial decisions, it will not fulfill its functions as we of the
United States see them. For public opinion in this country has always
deemed the right of courts to legislate by interpretation of existing law to
meet new conditions.
The writer concludes his chapter on treaties by saying that "the idea
of sovereignty, or unlimited and irresponsible power as an essential attri-
bute of states in the prevailing system renders international contractual
relations wholly futile.”
As individual men rarely require the law to vindicate the faith of con-
tracts, so the writer seems to believe that the law of nations should main-
tain the faith of treaties were nations, that is, the people themselves, only
members of the "Society of Nations."
This suggestion raises the question of force available to the "Society of
Nations” to vindicate the law. Shall the super-government maintain a
military force, or shall it prescribe boycotts and other forms of pressure
short of war, or is it to direct some member to make war in the name of
the Society of Nations ?
If individual nations send contingents to serve under the super-government,
they will scarcely renounce control over their contingents. Boycotts are ob-
jectionable to all concerned and if put in execution they are an unstable
form of coercion which tends either to lapse or to turn to war. And as
for directing some member nation to make war against the offending nation,
it is probable that the ministerial nation will see to its own profit in its
belligerency before undertaking the service, and this would disturb the
"status quo" so dear to all who rely on law as all-adequate to preserve
peace.
The writer deals at some length with "freedom of the seas.” The first
impediment to the free use of the seas was piracy. That has been done
away with, and, in time of peace, navigation is now free to all peaceful
shipping, no nation interfering therewith by violence. But in time of war,
belligerent powers exercise a considerable measure of control or super-
vision over traffic under the accepted rules of war.
The writer believes that justice and right should grant free traffic to
neutral trade and to privately owned enemy property. Apparently, if he


  p. 2418 (#1382)                      

2418
[Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
could, he would confine belligerent action on the high seas to battle between
hostile combatant shipping. He is seemingly unaware that commerce is
the ultimate objective of maritime warfare and that navies fight each other
only to clear the way for the control of maritime traffic in their own interest.
If force is ever to be applied between nations, either in their present
sovereign relations or as members of some super-government, the attack on
national trade is an indispensable method of applying coercion. For there
are two ways of making effective war, that is, of bringing one belligerent
to yield his will to that of the other. One way is by a direct attack upon
persons and lives; the other way is by an indirect attack upon lives by
crippling or destroying the material means of support. A man's property is
what makes his life worth living.
Thus, the capture or destruction of hostile trade is a very severe blow
to the enemy. In the last war the English blockade of Germany caused her
people to fail before her armies did. In the present closely knit economics of
trade, a nation at war needs to draw support of her war industries from all
the world, and attack upon trade is not so inhumane as bloodshed. More.
over, private ownership should not claim immunity solely on that account.
Private ownership vests in two classes of goods distinguished as producers'
goods and consumers' goods. The first class is goods in manufacture and
in traffic, which have not yet arrived in the hands of the ultimate con-
sumer where they are to remain in service. Consumers' goods are products
in the hands of the last owner who does not intend to part with them in
the way of business. These last should be respected by the laws of war,
for they are really privately owned, but producers' goods of all classes
are part of the national resources all more or less essential to his maintain-
ing the war, and national insurance spreads the risk so that the private
owner has no substantial personal ground of complaint if he loses to the
enemy.
As for the sanctity of neutral trade, it has two sides. As neutral trade
it should be inviolable, but as it is also belligerent trade it is support to the
enemy.
The practical procedure as worked out through the centuries is to operate
against it, as far as may be, without driving the neutral to active resistance
and participation in war to afford protection to his trade. As every nation
is loath to go to war, the belligerents have a considerable field even when
the neutrals are strong. For us of the United States, our historic stand
(when neutral) for a law of war favoring neutral rights is now ill advised.
We should prefer a law favoring belligerent rights. We are no longer
weak. Our financial and naval strength and vast industries are so necessary
to belligerents when we ourselves are neutral, that we can command favor-
able diplomatic easements of any code of practice severe towards neutral
trade; whereas, when we ourselves are at war we legally should be free to
control neutral trade somewhat rigidly as we have always done when at
war. Our practice in the Civil War was the basis of English practice in
the recent war. If this country preserves its present naval strength, the


  p. 2419 (#1383)                      

1925]
2419
Book Reviews
British practice of the last war is one which this country should support
as a proper one for the future.
The new methods of visit and search known colloquially as the “Kirk-
wall” practice have much to commend them in principle, although it was
averred that the British abused their opportunity to aid their own business.
If the charge is true, it was extremely bad policy, for war bears hard on
neutrals, and it is unwise to give unnecessary offense to neutrals, for moral
forces control the action of peoples even in the case when the rulers seem-
ingly hold the most absolute power over their individual subjects.
The writer closes his review of international relations with a declaration
of the horrors of war as forced upon the world by sovereign states acting
contrary to the wishes of their peoples and he avows his belief that if
“man's freedom is to continue, iſ the realization of the law of equa! freedom
is not to be indefinitely postponed in the resurgent mediæval savagery,
foreshadowed in the present day remobilization of whole nations for war
by their sovereign states, a new political upheaval, the counterpart of that
begun in the late Eighteenth Century, must close the protecting circle of
constitutional government around him.”
Thus he seems to look to revolution and civil war as the probable route
for escape from recurrent international wars.
THE LIFE OF AN AMERICAN SAILOR, REAR AD-
MIRAL WILLIAM HENSLEY EMORY, U. S. NAVY.
From His Letters and Memoirs. Edited by REAR ADMIRAL
ALBERT GLEAVES, U. S. N., LL.D. New York: George H.
Doran Co. $4.00.
REVIEWED BY REAR ADMIRAL C. F. GOODRICH, U. S. Navy, RET.
The author, who modestly calls himself "editor,” gives an interesting
account of the life and experiences of his subject, in that excellent style
of which he is the master.
The customary practice of the reviewer is to present a summary of the
contents of the book under his criticism. Except for stressing the value
of a distinguished ancestry of which Emory is an exemplar, I do not
employ this method, for the reason that it might possibly influence the
reader to content himself therewith and so deprive himself of the pleasure
which a familiarity with this volume would unquestionably yield. My
object is to arouse the interest of the rising generation of naval officers in
Emory as the man and the sailor, his personality and his charcater, be-
lieving as I do, that our younger men will find much to emulate in his
career, especially in his devotion to the service of which he was an orna-
ment. Consequently I shall use his record, as I must at times, only to
substantiate my opinions. For a full understanding of Emory's achieve-
ments, recourse should be had to the work in question.


  p. 2420 (#1384)                      

2420
[Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
His self dependence is first shown in how he secured his admission into
the Naval Academy. Residing in Washington, he obtained a round-robin
recommendation from certain senators and members of Congress, and then
camped out on the steps of the White House until, after long waiting, he
was finally shown into the President's office, where he made his own plea
to Mr. Lincoln, who sent for his mother, and said to her, “Mrs. Emory,
any boy who wants to enter the Navy so much that he comes to me for
an appointment ought to have it. I should like, with your consent, to
appoint him.” So, on September 23, 1862, he became an "acting midship-
man." Thus early did he learn that the best way to get what he wanted
was to “go for it” himself.
He made friends in all walks of life, as witness the regard he inspired
in no less famous person that Colonel Cody, better known as “Buffalo
Bill.” Concerning this friendship, two very amusing incidents are em-
bodied in the text. At the other end of the social scale was Admiral David
D. Porter, to whom he was aide when a lieutenant, and whom he served
with zeal and tact, the latter particularly exemplified in his blocking, at
Washington, a certain bit of legislation adverse to the interests of the Navy
and the admiral, then ill at Narragansett Pier.
One cannot resist quoting, in passing, from one of Porter's letters to
Emory, "there are too many of those damn boards at Washington. They
should all be broken up."
In the relief of Greely, by the expedition under Schley, Emory com-
manded the Bear, a Dundee whaler bought for the purpose and later trans-
ferred to the Revenue Marine. His loyalty and the efficiency of his sup-
port of his senior officer mark every page of that story. Before his starting,
Mrs. Emory, in an adjoining room, overheard Schley say to her husband,
"Our orders are to bring them (the members of Greely's party) back, dead
or alive. Suppose we do not find them?" Emory replied, “In that case, I
shall not come back.” That is the kind of man Emory was, for he meant
every word he said.
The duty of Arctic exploration is arduous enough under any circum-
stances, but in this instance, it was still more so, for all of Schley's men
realized that the rescue of Greely might be a matter of a day or two,
hence no delay nor slackness of effort was permissible. Therefore, Emory
spent the time either on the bridge or, more generally, in the crow's nest,
which he seldom left, eating there the food carried up to him, and only
coming below, when too numb, for a rub down with alcohol. This done,
he would return to his lookout aloft. Emory's robust frame enabled him
to endure what would have incapacitated a man physically weaker.
What a fine spirit he showed when Schley told him he was too bold
and that if he continued to jump his ship over the rocks and ice, he would
sink her. To this cautionary warning Emory replied that, if he did, he
would buy one of the whalers (seeking Greely to win the large reward
offered) and keep on to the north. No wonder that two such men as
Schley and Emory found Greely and the six survivors out of the twenty-
four.


  p. 2421 (#1385)                      

1925]
2421
Book Reviezers
We must credit Emory with what is now termed vision. Before the Bear
sailed from New York, he located the dentist there who had treated Greely's
men and obtained all the data possible about their teeth to aid in identifying
their bodies, if dead. This information proved later to be of the greatest
help.
Here is what Schley said of him officially, “I would commend him
especially to the Department as an officer of high professional merit and
competency and would frankly state that much of the success of the ex-
pedition was due to him and his able officered ship.”
In 1887 he was given the command of the Thetis, which had been Schley's
flagship in the Greely search, and was sent around to the west coast and
up into the Bering Sea, primarily to help our whaling vessels to return to
warmer waters when the season closed in the Arctic Ocean. No better
man could have been found for this dangerous service for to his energy
and fearlessness was added his knowledge of Arctic conditions gained in
the quest of Greely. Beside his many good deeds to stranded or ship-
wrecked sailors was his saving and bringing back to port the schooner,
Jane Grey, pinched in the ice, abandoned and lying on her bilge in an ice
field. It was a seaman's job to right her, patch up the holes in her hull,
and fit her for the voyage south. Herein Emory revealed an unsuspected
talent. He and his crew waived all claim to salvage, feeling, as he re-
marked in his official report, “a great personal interest in having the Jane
Grey returned to Captan Kelly in person, as he is a fine specimen of an
American seaman, and the vessel wrecked represents his savings of many
years."
Emory was always the soul of hospitality and when a bucket was hoisted
at the Thetis' foreyard arm, the whaler captain repaired on board her not
so much for what that signal implied as to foregather with her genial and
competent skipper. To the uninitiated, it may be observed that the signal
conveyed the same invitation as the broken match brought to you on a tray
by a ward room boy in days now gone forever. The complete story of
Emory's work on this cruise reads like a novel of adventure.
His next duty was as Naval Attaché in London, a very different scene
from those stormy icebound seas with which he had become so familiar. His
work demanded extreme tact, courtesy, and knowledge of men. He per-
formed it to the entire satisfaction of his superiors there and in Washing-
ton. His record indeed was better than that of his predecessor, whom it
had been thought impossible to replace. For his social success in such an
exacting community, one should go to Gleaves' biography.
Emory shortly afterward found himself again in the Bering Sea, this
time in command of the U.S.S. Petrel, which, with my own ship, the U.S.S.
Concord, and others, was engaged in that solemn farce called "protecting the
sea herd.” It was a pleasure to work with him and Folger of the Yorktoren
and under such a senior officer as our beloved Charlie Clark, later of the
Oregon. In this field my earlier appreciation of Emory's skill and courage
was merely strengthened, in no wise changed.


  p. 2422 (#1386)                      

2422
(Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
We both returned to the China station that autumn to learn that China
and Japan were at war. What the Petrel did until peace was declared, and
afterwards, is interesting as a narrative, but it throws no new light on
Emory. He always did the right thing, as anyone who knew him would have
predicted.
His subsequent career as captain and rear admiral, while honorable in
every way and of unusual interest, tells us nothing new of the character,
the professional and personal qualities, he had already made known to his
contemporaries. A young officer can do no better than to read this book
attentively and so, in an emergency, be in a position to answer the question,
"What would Adiniral Emory have done in my place?" In view of what
I have written, can anyone wonder that I should have once said, "If I ever
find myself in a tight fix, I hope that Bill Emory will be alongside of me?"


  p. 2423 (#1387)                      

SECRETARY'S NOTES
Membership: New members joining since last report:
Quinn, John, Midshipman. U.S.N. Anderson, C. H., Ensign, U.S.N.
Jarrell, A. É., Ensign, U.S.N.
Brown, J. G., Ensign, Ú.S.N.
Seymour, T. P. Mr.
Tullsen, Waldo, Ensign, U.S.N.
Burkhead, L. H., Ensign, U.S.N. McAdam, S. T., Ensign, U.S.N.
Trumble, E. J., Lieut, U.S.M.C. McGown, M. Y., Ensign, U.S.N.
Wolcott, Theodore, Ensign, U.S.N.
Beattie, Byron, Mr.
Bailey, M. H., Ensign, U.S.N.
Bush, D. A., Ensign, U.S.N.
Ray, C. C., Ensign, U.S.N.
Vaquin, 0. F., Ensign, U.S.N.
Sledge, Alexander, Ensign, U.S.N.
Gallery, W. (., Ensign, U.S.N.
Cowie, T. R., Ensign, U.S.N.
Morrison, C. H. B., Ensign, U.S.N. Palmer, R. Ć., Ensign, U.S.N.
New Policy
The Board of Control has decided that, commenc-
Toward
ing January 1, 1926, all articles accepted subse-
quent to that date will be paid for in full at the
Contributors
time of acceptance.
Attention is invited to the fact that essays
Prize
for the “Prize Essay Contest, 1926” should
Essay 1926
be received not later than 1 January, 1926.
In the correspondence in the Professional Notes
Will the
Capital Ship
of this issue, pages 2342-2352 and pages 2356-
2359, some of the remarks therein have to do with
Disappear?
the trend of future naval construction, particu-
larly as regards capital ships. There is a distinct tendency among
some British writers to hold to the theme that, while aircraft have
not doomed the capital ship, nevertheless, in view of its cost and
having in mind the Conference on the Limitation of Armament, a
period is approaching wherein both Great Britain and the United
States, as well as other signatory powers, might well abolish the
capital ship, because cruisers could just as efficiently look after
their respective national interests. In this connection, there still
remains the meat of the whole question, which was noted by the
American delegates at the Conference, that with all naval war-
craft done away with (so far as surface and undersea craft are
concerned) by mutual agreement, a nation's naval strength would
then be proportional to her merchant marine.
It is perfectly obvious that should the United States agree to
do away with the capital ship and later on, perhaps, subscribe to
the principle of doing away with all naval surface and undersea
craft, except for police purposes, her naval power would rise or


  p. 2424 (#1388)                      

2424
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings (Dec.
fall with the fortunes of her merchant marine. Should the Ameri-
can merchant marine retrograde relatively to the position it occu-
pied in the years following the Civil War to the period preceding
the World War, our naval strength, so far as the craft in question
are concerned, would be relatively small. This point was fully
understood by Messrs. Hughes, Lodge, Underwood, and Root at
the Washington Conference, but should still be borne in mind by
America in considering the trend of thought that is now appearing
for doing away with the capital ship. If the latter is done away
with for the new reasons advanced, the next step that might
logically be expected would be the limitation, by agreement, of all
surface and undersea craft. This entire question seems to hinge
upon the size and efficiency of the American Merchant Marine, so
far as it relates to surface and sub-surface craft.
Gas
The subject of gas warfare is believed to be of
such importance to the naval service that the
Warfare
following editorial on this subject, reprinted from
The Military Surgeon, merits careful thought:
Will prohibition prohibit when it goes counter to the natural desires
and immemorial customs of mankind is a question broader than that of the
use of alcoholic beverages. It was proposed to try it out in modification of
the laws of war by an international agreement to prohibit the use of poison-
ous gases in warfare at the Washington Conference on Limitation of Arma-
ments. The plenipotentiaries of five great powers, the United States, Great
Britain, France, Italy, and Japan, declared their assent to be bound by such
an agreement and invited all other civilized nations to adhere to it. This
agreement was signed on February 12, 1922, but before it became binding
it had to be ratified by the governments of the five powers and these rati-
fications deposited in Washington. Singularly enough not one of the powers
has yet sent in its ratification. The question is now under discussion by
the League of Nations.
The attitude of the civilized nations toward this question is much like
that of a well-known and often married actor toward matrimony, who ex-
plained his ninth wedding as a triumph of hope over experience. The Peace
Conference at The Hague in 1907 resolved that the use of poison gases was
inhumane and they should not be used in shells. One delegate strongly
opposed this resolution and he was the distinguished representative of the
United States, Admiral Mahan, who stated his objections as follows:
The objection that a machine of war is barbarous has always been raised
against new weapons, which were nevertheless finally adopted. In the
Middle Ages it was firearms which were denounced as cruel. Later, shells,
and more recently, torpedoes have been denounced. It seems to me that it
cannot be proved that shells with asphyxiating gases are inhumane or
unnecessarily cruel machines of war, and that they cannot produce decisive
results. I represent a people that is animated by a lively desire to make


  p. 2425 (#1389)                      

1925]
2425
Secretary's Notes
warfare more humane, but which may nevertheless find itself forced to
wage war; therefore it is a question of not depriving itself through hastily
adopted resolutions of means of which it could later avail itself with good
results.
England and Germany supported Mahan and did not sign The Hague
agreement at once, but both did so later.
This is as sound common sense now as when it was spoken. It was not
the first official pronouncement by us in the same tenor. The Secretary of
States, Mr. John Hay, in his instructions to the American delegates to the
first Peace Congress at The Hague in 1899 said:
The expediency of restraining the inventive genius of our people in the
direction of devising means of defense is by no means clear; and consider-
ing the temptations to which men and nations may be exposed in a time of
conflict, it is doubtful if an international agreement to this end would be
effective. The dissent of a single powerful nation might render it alto-
gether nugatory. The delegates are, therefore, enjoined not to give the
weight of their influence to the promotion of projects the realization of
which is so uncertain.
Since these great men spoke what they foresaw as probable has come to
pass. The German nation had not been a year at war before it was decided
that, in spite of its agreement, it would not, in the words of the Admiral,
deprive itself through hastily adopted resolutions of means of which it
could avail itself with good results. On April 22, 1915, they suddenly re-
leased a cloud of chlorine gas along two miles of the British front with so
much effect that if they had realized its efficacy and pushed boldly forward
it was generally admitted that they could have easily broken through. Then
the Allies with all the disadvantages of surprise and unpreparedness hastened
to arm themselves with and against this new weapon.
For what reason, with this instance before our eyes, should we now pro-
pose to place ourselves in a position of disadvantage by becoming a party
to any such agreement? It is surely not with the cynical intention to imitate
the German lack of faith and use it should it later appear to be to our
advantage. But we cannot by failing to be prepared against Chemical War-
fare place ourselves at the mercy of an enemy who is unscrupulous. Yet
to be prepared exposes us to the suspicion of bad faith, and the charge that
we are preparing weapons which we have pledged ourselves not to use. In
fact though we have a Chemical Warfare Service we are not preparing. As
shown by the Chief of that Service, General Fries, in a recent able address
in Boston, we are standing still and for each dollar spent on the Army less
than the value of one of Postmaster General New's new half cent stamps
is spent on Chemical Warfare. As long as we are on record as opposed
to gas warfare it is quite unlikely that we will get adequate appropriations
for this important arm which caused over 31 per cent of our battle casualties
in the World War.
The arguments against the use of poisonous gases are apparently of
pacifist origin and based on mushy sentimentality rather than scientific or
historical facts. It is far from being more dreadful and inhumane than
the other agencies of war. There is no reason to think that the sufferings
of its victims are greater than those of the wounded, and the mortality is


  p. 2426 (#1390)                      

2426
[Dec.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
certainly far less. Gilchrist has shown that the deaths among our casual-
ties from gas were only one-twelfth those from other weapons. Also
the after results of crippling, disfiguring, and suffering are infinitely less.
It is, therefore, so far as the combatants are concerned, the most humane
of weapons. The visions of whole cities overwhelmed by poison gases are
rather for the entertainment of the credulous than the guidance of states-
men. If an enemy chooses to attack the noncombatant population he has
at his disposal high explosive shells and air bombs which with fire and
tumbling ruins are certainly destructive enough, yet we do not hear of
propositions to give up their use. We might give our pacifist friends as
regards Chemical Warfare the reply that the Plantagenet King gave his
gentle queen when she pleaded for mercy for the starving inhabitants of
besieged Calais :
"Lady, war hath ever three handmaidens, famine, pestilence, and the
sword, and the gentlest of these is famine.”
Of the handmaidens of modern war, gas is certainly the gentlest and
most humane.
Inquiries have been made by mem-
The
bers as to where they might obtain
Constitution-Guerriere
copies of the colored picture of the
Picture
Constitution-Guerriere Engagement,
which appeared as the frontispiece of the October PROCEEDINGS.
Four original paintings by Thomas Birch, showing the different
phases of this engagement, hang in the office of the Commandant
of Midshipmen, Bancroft Hall. Our frontispiece showed one of
these. The four paintings are designated, for convenience, as
follows:
No. 1—The Engagement No. 3—Falling Astern
No. 2—The Battle
No. 4—Total Wreck
Anyone wishing a colored photograph of the above may obtain
either one copy or a set of four in either of two sizes, framed or
unframed, postpaid, by sending a check or money order to:
E. J. COLLERAN, 17 Revell Street, Annapolis, Maryland.
The colored photographic copies are furnished in oil colors (with
burnished gold frames in case they are desired).
Size 12 x 15" Size 11 x 1!"
Framed —set of four....... $18.00
$15.00
“ —single picture ..... 5.00
4.00
Unframed-set of four. ...... 12.00
10.00
-single picture ..... 3.50
2.75
H. A. BALDRIDGE,
Captain, U. S. Navy, Secretary-Treasurer


  p. 2427 (#1391)                      

SPECIAL NOTICE
NAVAL INSTITUTE PRIZE Essay, 1926
A prize of two hundred dollars with a gold medal, and a life member-
ship in the Institute (unless the author is already a life member, in which
case he will receive the commuted value thereof), is offered by the Naval
Institute for the best essay submitted on any subject pertaining to the naval
profession.
The following rules will govern this competition :
1. The award of the prize to be made by the Board of Control, voting
by ballot and without knowledge of the names of the competitors.
2. Each competitor to send his essay to the Secretary-Treasurer
in a sealed envelope marked “Prize Essay Contest.” The name of the
writer shall not appear on the essay, but instead thereof a motto. Accom-
panying the essay a separate sealed envelope will be sent to the Secretary-
Treasurer, with the motto on the outside and the writer's name and
motto inside. This envelope will not be opened until after the decision of
the board. Essays must be received on or before January 1, 1926.
3. In addition to the “Naval Institute Prize," one or more essays may
receive “Honorable Mention," if of sufficient merit to justify that award;
or, in the event that no essay is adjudged of sufficient merit to receive the
"Prize," the best essay submitted may receive "Honorable Mention" in
lieu thereof.
4. In case one or more essays receive “Honorable Mention" the writers
thereof will each receive a prize, the amount of such awards to be de-
cided by the Board of Control in each case.
5. Announcement of awards will be made as soon as practicable after
January 1, 1926.
6. Essays awarded the “Naval Institute Prize" or "Honorable Men-
tion" will be published in the Naval INSTITUTE PROCEEDINGS as soon as
practicable. Essays not awarded a prize may be published at the discretion
of the Board of Control, and the writers of such articles shall be com-
pensated at the established rate for articles not submitted in competition.
7. Articles should be limited to twenty (20) printed pages in the PRO-
CEEDINGS (approximately 8,000 words), but shorter articles will receive
equal consideration.
8. In the event of the prize being awarded to the winner of a previous
year, a gold clasp suitably engraved will be given in lieu of the medal.
9. All essays must be typewritten, and submitted in duplicate.
H. A. BALDRIDGE,
Captain, U.S.N., Secretary-Treasurer.


  p. 2428 (#1392)                      

SUGGESTED TOPICS FOR ARTICLES
Aviation—Its Present Status and Probable Influence on Strategy and Tac-
tics.
The Anti-Aircraft Problem from the Navy's Viewpoint.
Co-ordination of the Naval Air Force with Other Naval Forces.
Naval Bases, Their Number, Location, and Equipment.
Military Character.
The Relation of Naval Communication to Naval Strategy.
Proportion of National Budget Which Should be Devoted to Naval Ex-
penditures.
The Necessity for Having a Fleet.
Organization of Fleet for War.
The Offensive and Defensive in Gas Warfare.
The Best Protection from Gas Attack.
Naval Gunnery of Today, the Problems of Long Range and Indirect Fire.
Physical Factors in Efficiency.
The Relation between the Navy and the Merchant Marine.
America as a Maritime Nation.
Relation of the Medical Department to a Plans Division.
The Place of Mines in Future Naval Warfare.
A Mobilization Program for the Future.
Morale Building.
The Mission of the Naval Academy in the Molding of Character.
How to Best Educate and Convert the American People to the Need of a
Strong National Defense.
The Navy in Battle; Operations of Air, Surface, and Underwater Craft.
Navy Spirit-Its Value to the Service and to the Country.
Based on a Major Ship Strength of Eighteen Dreadnaughts, What Do You
Consider a Balanced Navy?
The Future of the Naval Officers' Profession.
The Naval Officer as a Diplomat.
Is the Present System of Training and Education for Officers Satisfactory
and Sufficient?
The Rôle of the Navy at Peace.
Training Naval Personnel During the Next Ten Years.
Six Years of Promotion by Selection in U. S. Navy. Its Effect Upon
Discipline and Morale.
The Employment of Retired Officers Separated from the Service by Reason
of the Age in Grade Feature of the Existing Selection Law.
What Measures Should be Adopted to Create and Maintain a Balanced
Enlisted Personnel of 120,000 Men?
Our Future Naval Policy Based on Existing International Treaties.
The Future Naval Continental Shore Establishments.
Shore Duty for Enlisted Men.
The Limits of Specialization in Naval Training,
The Effect of the 5-5-3 Ratio Upon U. S. Naval Strategy in the Eastern
Pacific.
Armor or High Speed for Large Surface Vessels ?
Airplanes and Submarines Versus Super-Dreadnaughts.
The Navy's Relation to the Nation in World Affairs.


  p. 2429 (#1393)                      

INDEX TO VOLUME 51
Figures in bold type indicate whole number: light figures following indicate page number.
| Aeronautics.-Cont'd
Accidents to vessels.
Loening amphibian plane successful
French “Courbet" has fatal boiler acci.
(Illus.). 267, 850.
dent, 1924. 263, 116.
Navy to get long distance flying boat
Administration, U. S. Navy.
for heavy loads. 263, 148.
See U. S. Navy Administration; U. S. New (1925) British airships. 264, 328.
Navy Department; U. S. Navy
New naval air cruiser, PB type, 1925.
Organization.
264, 327.
Advertisements.
Prize ad for 1925 Lucky Bag. Front
Bombing.
cover No. 269.
See Bombing.
Aerial warfare.
Commercial.
Ballou, Sidney. Limitations of aircraft Commercial air transport. 271, 1768.
in naval warfare. 267, 746.
Dr. Eckner on airships in commerce.
Gautreau, J. B. Consequences of the 264, 329.
triumph of the Zeppelins. 263, 117.
Progress of civil aviation in Europe,
Haw, J. C. Anti-aircraft defense. 274, 1925. 274, 2382.
2383.
Henderson, Sir W. H. Airship offensive.
Dirigibles.
271, 1756.
Henderson, Sir W. H. Airship offensive.
Johnson, A. W. Aviation in coast 271, 1756.
defense. 271, 1652.
Russell, Sir H. Flying ships. 273, 2200.
Moffett, W. A. Some aviation funda Warlick, W. W. Letter regarding article
mentals (Illus.) 272, 1871.
in Washington Post on lighter-than-
Wead, F. W. Discussion of "Limita air aircraft carriers. 269, 1241.
tions of aircraft in naval warfare." Airship controversy-1925. 274, 2361.
271, 1745.
Some British views on airships. 274,
Aeronautics.
2342.
Castex, R. Effect of aircraft on future
warships. 263, 154.
Motors.
Johnson, A. W. Aviation in coast Wilson, E. E. Aircraft engine progress.
defense. 271, 1652.
266, 657.
Sherman, F. Naval aircraft in inter Packard engine. 269, 1288.
national law. 274, 2259.
"Propulseur trompe" for airplanes. 273,
Standley, W. H. Discussion of "Aviatica 2202.
in coast defense." 271, 1741.
Superchargers. 272, 1994.
10th annual report of N.A.C.A. 265,493. Wright "cyclone"' 400-H.P. engine
Aircraft.
(Illus.). 267, 855.
Chandler, C de F. Airships for military
Pilots
purposes. 270, 1531.
Baldridge, H. A. Aviation at Naval
Airplane replacements--need for a Academy. (Illus.) 271, 1632.
reserve. 273, 2196.
Davis, R. Ġ. Some physical aspects of
British flying boat carries crew of 12. Aying. 269, 1225.-
265, 461.
Air Ministry's exhibit at Wembly
Cierva giroplane. 267, 852.
(testing pilots). 271, 1758.
Civil and military men. 271, 1769.
Description of Rohrbach all-metal flying
Records.
boat. 268, 1076.
Arnold, H. H. Performance of future
Illustration of Rohrbach all-metal fly airplanes. 270, 1522.
ing boat. 268, 1027.
Pulitzer trophy races, 1925, 274, 2379.


  p. 2430 (#1394)                      

2430
[Dic
Inder to Volume 51
U.S.
Aeronautics.--Cont'd
Aeronautics. U. S. Navy.--Cont'd
Moffett, W. A. Some aviation funda
Round-the-World Flights
mentals (Illus.). 272, 1871.
Barker, F. V. How the navy helped Sherman, F. P. Discussion of "Sea
them home. (Illus.) 270, 1415.
going aircraft." 263, 103.
Sherman, F. P. Main battery elevation
Schools and Training
and fighting aircraft. 266, 600.
Baldridge, H. A. Aviation at Naval Vroom, G. B. Strategic value of the
Academy (Illus.). 271, 1632.
aircraft carrier. (Illus.) 263, 78.
Roby, J. Í. Naval aviation training. Wiley, H. V. Celestial cruise (U. S
271, 1646.
airship Los Angeles). 266, 604.
Wilson, E. E. Discussion of "Inde
France
pendent air force." 267, 807.
Progress of aeronautics in France, 1925. Wood, Ralph. Sanity in aviation. 269
272, 1977.
1133.
Extracts from report of Special Board
Germany
1925. 267, 856.
Training 2000 pilots. 267, 826.
Million dollar sea plane order placed
265, 496.
Great Britain
Naval expert urges enormous dirigible
Air Ministry's exhibits at Wembly. (1925). 265, 481.
271, 1758.
Navy plans 300 planes and 5 carriers
Britain's air force, 1925. 266, 656.
(1925). 267, 847.
British airship policy. 268, 1062.
Navy to have 23 pursuit planes. (1925
His Majesty's airships. 267, 813.
264, 326.
New (1925) British airships. 264, 328. U. S. Naval air policy centered o
planes operating from fleet. 263, 141
Air Board, U. S.
Bingham, H. Commercial airports and Personnel of. 274, 2370.
airways. 272, 1990.
Air flow.
Cook, M. G. Proposal for an inde See Magnus effect; Rotor ship; Win
pendent air service. 264, 215.
rotors.
Fairlamb, G. R. Independent air force. Airplane carriers.
265, 381.
Vroom, G. B. Strategic value of the
Kieffer, H. M. Control of the seas by aircraft carrier. (Illus.) 263, 78.
an air department? 274, 2265.
Warlick, W. W. Letter regarding artid
Warner, E. P. Air policy for U. S. 267, in Washington Post on lighter-tha?
722.
air aircraft carriers. 269, 1241.
Wilson, E. E. Unified procurement of British warships carry 80 planes. 264
government aircraft. 272, 1933.
616.
The aeronautical crisis, 1925. 274, 2377. New U. S. airplane carriers, 267, 848
Detroit takes off. 269, 1286.
Progress on U. S. airplane carriers. 264
Gen. Patrick on independent air force. 306.
270, 1518.
Airplane catapult.
The Mitchell plan. 274, 2372.
An explosive airplane catapult. 264
Personnel of President's Air Board, 326.
1925. 274, 2370.
New type catapult. 266, 674.
Wilbur says Coolidge is opposed to Photo of catapult in action. 266, 614
unified air force. 266, 657.
“Airplane vs battleship."
National air policy. 268, 1074.
See Battleship; Aerial warfare.
Air policy for U. S.
U. S. Navy
E. P. Warner. 267, 722.
Baldridge, H. A. Aviation at Naval | Air whistle. See Whistles.
Academy (Illus.). 271, 1632.
Airships.
Cook, M. G. Proposal for an inde See Aeronautics. Dirigibles.
pendent air service. 264, 215.
Akers, G. W.
Fairlamb, G. R. Independent air force. Discussion of "Naval Reserve training'
265, 381.
268, 1024.
McIntyre, M. H. Naval aircraft in- | Alloys.
vestigation, 1924. 263, 145.
High temperature alloys. 265, 484.


  p. 2431 (#1395)                      

1925]
2431
Index to Volume 51
Allen, E. G.
| Australia. Navy.
Discussion of “Our system of fleet Cruiser exchange between Brit. navy
training." 267, 804.
and Australian navy, 273, 2176.
Aluminum covered grate-bars.
Auto-giro.
Successful experiments with. 269, 1276. See Aeronautics. Aircraft.
America (S.S.).
Auxiliary vessels, engineering economy on
Photo. 274, 2238.
R. R. Smith. 273, 2101.
Amphibious warfare.
Aviation at the Naval Academy.
Pye, W. S. Joint army and navy H. A. Baldridge. 271, 1632.
Operations.
Aviation, Naval.
Pt. 1—262, 1963
See Aeronautics. U. S. Navy.
Pt. 2-263, 1
Pt. 3—264, 233
Pt. 4–265, 386
Bacon, Sir Reginald.
Pt. 5–266, 589
Defends Jellicoe in book criticising
Pt. 6—268, 975
Beatty's Jutland tactics. 264, 289.
Russell, Sir H. Amphibian operations. Bacteria, use of in war prohibited by Arms
274, 2403.
Traffic Convention. 270, 1566.
Anti-aircraft defense.
Bagby, Oliver W.
J. C. Haw. 274, 2383.
Naval mining and mines. 274, 2244.
Anti-aircraft guns.
Badger, 0. C.
Defense against air raids. 267, 854.
History repeats. (1st hon. mention,
Haw, J. C. Anti-aircraft defense. 274.
1925). 267, 707.
2383.
Baker, Wilder D.
Aorangi (motor ship).
Submarine capabilities and limitations.
Performance of. 271, 1776.
270, 1398.
Arbitration.
Baldridge, Harry A.
Brandt, E. S. R. Armament by example
Aviation at the Naval Academy. (Illus.)
and arbitration. 269, 1152.
271, 1632.
Are you worth it?
Ballistics.
W. E. Brown. 274, 2328.
Armament by example and arbitration.
- Wright, W. L. Vest pocket ballistics.
E. S. R. Brandt. 269, 1152.
273, 2138.
Armor.
Ballou, Sidney.
Musser, N.B. Lessons of Jutland affect-
Limitations of aircraft in naval warfare.
ing design of turret armor. 266, 562.
267, 746.
Arms Traffic Conference, 1925.
Barker, F. V.
See Geneva Arms Traffic Conf., 1925. How the navy helped them home.
Arnold, H. H.
(Illus.) 270, 1415.
Performance of future airplanes. 270, Battle cruisers.
1522.
Bywater, H. C., and Prendergast,
Array against sovereignty.
Maurice. Post-treaty naval design.
W. T. Cluverius. 272, 1916.
273, 2135.
Asia.
Russell, Sir H. New cruisers. (British.)
Simonds, F. H. British see war in Far 273, 2180.
East. 266, 678.
French battle cruisers (1925). 269, 1260.
Astronomy.
Warships of the future. 273, 2209.
Bauersfeld, I. W. Great planetarium of See also Battleships; Cruisers.
the Munich Museum. (Illus.) 267,761. Battleships.
Correction, 268, 1105.
Badger, 0. C. History repeats (1st hon.
Wood, A. N. Homemade planisphere. mention, 1925). 267, 707.
271, 1711.
Castex, R. Effect of aircraft on future
Asturias, (motor ship).
warships. 263, 154.
Description. 272, 2010.
Castex, R. Expert sees end of giant
Motor liner Asturias. 271, 1773.
dreadnaughts. 265, 467.
Photo showing Diesel engines. 271, Russell, Sir H. Smaller fighting ships.
1753.
274, 2349.
Australia. Asiatic policy.
Russell, Sir H. Will the capital ship
Russell, Sir H. Australia's appre pass? 270, 1548.
hensions. 272, 2021.
Battleship annihilators. 268, 1072,


  p. 2432 (#1396)                      

2432
(Dec.
Index to Volume 51
Bombing:
Battleships.--Cont'd
Battleship supreme over planes. 266,
636.
Capital ship problems: Adm. Sir W. H.
Henderson's views. 274, 2347.
A champion of the battleship. 263, 110.
Future capital ships, 271, 1754.
Maintenance costs. 273, 2188.
Naval architects see vastly improved
battleships. 265, 500.
New British battleships mark new era.
265, 462.
Warships of the future. 273, 2209.
See also Battlecruisers.
Bauersfeld, Ing. W.
Great planetarium of Munich museum.
(Illus.) 267, 761.
Correction, 268, 1105.
Baughman, C. C.
U. S. occupation of Dominican Re-
public. 274, 2306.
Beatty, Sir David.
Jutland tactics criticised. 264, 289.
Bellevue (D. C.) Research Laboratory.
Foley, Paul. Naval research laboratory.
272, 1925.
Benson, W. H., jt. author.
See Burkhead, L. H., and Benson, W. H.
Bettis, Cyrus.
Pulitzer Trophy race, 1925, won by
Bettis. 274, 2379.
· Wins 1925 Pulitzer air races. Photo. 274,
2340.
Biles, Sir John.
Steam or oil engines for fast ships?
269, 1278.
Billingsley, (U. S. S.).
Photo of Billingsley towing plane
“Boston.” 270, 1424.
Bingham, Hiram.
Commercial airports and airways. 272,
1990.
Binoculars.
McCracken, Alan R. Selection and use
of binoculars. 270, 1446.
Blandy, W. H. P.
Possible improvements in our gunnery
training. 271, 1696.
“Blood is thicker than water."
Palmer, H. C. Discussion of the Pei-ho
episode. 267, 801.
Copy of Tattnall's report of the inci-
dent. 269, 1243.
(Origin of the phrase] W.C.Tyler. 263,91.
Boiler explosions.
French Courbet fatal accident, 1924.
263, 116.
Boilers.
Brunler submerged fame boiler. 267,
840,
Russell, Sir H. The Washington experi-
ment. 266, 675.
Schuyler, G. L. Bombing radius as
affected by wind. 274, 2242.
Simpson, B. W. Bombing accuracy.
273, 2197.
Wile, F. W. Washington bombing test
report. 266, 655.
Battleship annihilators. 268, 1072.
Report of Board regarding bombing
tests on U. S. S. Washington. 266,
636.
Bombing radius as affected by wind.
G. L. Schuyler. 274, 2242.
Book reviews.
Alden, C. S., and Earle, R. Makers of
naval tradition. 273, 2224.
Balincourt, Comd. de. Flottes de combal.
266, 697.
Berkeley, L. M. North star navigation.
265, 517.
Bodilly, R. B. Interaction between
vessels. 266, 692
Bywater, H. C. Great Pacific war-
1931. 272, 1988.
Colcord, J. C., comp. roll and go. 266,
695.
Cornet, C. Cosmographie et navigation.
268, 1104.
Cugle, C. H. Practical navigation. 265,
Custance, Sir R. Study of war, 266, 688.
Edmunds, S. E. The lawless law of
nations. 274, 2414.
Essex Inst. Old-time ships of Salem.
268, 1104.
Farrère and Chack. Combats et batailles
sur mer. 271, 1806.
Gleaves, A., ed. Life of an American
sailor, Rear Adm. Emory. 274, 2419.
Goodwin, H. B. Companion to the
azimuth tables. 272, 2045.
Green, Fitzhugh. Our naval heritage.
273, 2218.
Hausmann, E. Dynamo-electric machin-
ery. 264, 353.
Hurd, A. Merchant Navy, 2 vols. 267,
882.
Jane's Aircraft, 1923. 271, 1813.
Jane's Fighting Ships, 1924. 266, 694.
Japan. Hydrographic Dept. New
altitude and azimuth tables. 267, 886.
Judge, A. W. Testing of high speed
internal combustion engines. 270, 1569.
Lewis, C. L. Famous American naval
officers. 264, 350.
Marsh, T. A. Combustion in the power
plant. 266, 696,
516.


  p. 2433 (#1397)                      

1925)
2433
Index to Volume 51
Bywater, Hector C.--Cont'd
American fleet outranges British. 270,
1517.
American naval bill, 1925. 266, 630.
British naval plans criticised at home.
272, 1970.
Cruiser strength vital to Gt. Britain.
263, 107.
Dutch East Indies: defense. 269, 1303.
Great Pacific war, Constable & Co..
book review. 272, 1988.
Gun elevation issue should be settled
by commission. 264, 311.
Gunnery in battle of Jutland. 271, 1780.
Hawaiian maneuvers and Japan's naval
policy. 265, 474.
Hawaii's naval need. 271, 1767.
Impressions of French seapower. 271,
1762.
Japan's giant 3,000-ton destroyers. 266,
629.
Shearer's charges in suit called absurd.
264, 286.
World-wide activity in naval con-
struction. 263, 156.
Bywater, Hector Ć., and Prendergast,
Maurice.
Post-treaty naval design. 273, 2125.
Book reviews.--Cont'd
Meigs, J. F. Story of the Seaman, 2 vols.
265, 514.
Middlebrook, L. F. Maritime Connecti-
cut during American revolution. 268,
1103.
Moore, Sir Alan. Last days of mast and
sail. 273, 2226.
Nicolai, W. German secret service. 268,
1098.
Norris, W. B. Annapolis: its colonial
and naval story. 273, 2223.
Paine, R. D. Joshua Barney. 263, 173.
Parmalee, M. Blockade and sea power.
263, 166.
Selfridge, T. O. Memoirs. 263, 166.
Westinghouse Elec. & Mfg. Co. Cata-
logue, 1925-26. 268, 1102.
Boris, King of Bulgaria.
Attempt at his assassination. 268, 1090.
Bowers, J. T.
Discussion of "Basic education of naval
officers." 268, 1022.
Brandt, E. S. R.
Armament by example and arbitration.
269, 1152.
Brandt, George E.
Discussion of “Mooring board prob-
lem." 274, 2339.
Maury's genius shown in old letter. 269,
1197.
Brazil. Navy.
12 new warships for Brazil. 264, 340.
Breckel, Harry F.
Naval radio progress. (1925). 267, 790.
Bridgeman, w. c.
Named first lord of Admiralty. 264,
288.
Brigham, C. C.
Psychological tests. 267, 875.
Brown, W. E.
Are you worth it? 274, 2328.
Brunler submerged flame boiler.
Description. 267, 840.
Buckau (rotor ship).
See Flettner rotor ship.
Bunts, F. M.
Discussion of “Basic education of
officers." 268, 1021.
Bureau system, U. S. Navy Dept.
Fisher, C. W. Proposed administrative
changes in U.S. Navy Dept. 265, 357.
Burkhead, L. H., and Benson, W. H.
Star identification diagram. 271, 1667.
Byrd, Richard E.
Flying over the polar sea. (Maps and
illus.) 270, 1319.
Bywater, Hector C.
American and Jap. navies compared.
264, 306.
Campbell, E. H.
Promotion of officer personnel. 264, 183.
Castex, R. (Fr. Navy).
Effect of aircraft on future warships.
263, 154.
Expert sees end of giant dreadnaughts.
265, 467.
Catapult, airplane.
See Airplane catapult.
Chadwick, D. V.
Discussion of “Administrative changes."
266, 610.
Chandler, C. de F.
Airships for military purposes. 270, 1527.
Chapel, U. S. Naval Academy.
Night photo of. 273, 2049.
Character.
Eller, E. M. Three craftsmen and the
part of the Naval Academy in the
mould of a man. 273, 2049.
Charlton, A. M.
Ship ventilation in 1741. 265, 437.
Chemical warfare.
Walton, D. C. Gas mask and the next
war. 269, 1172.
Poison gas prohibited by Arms Traffic
Convention. 270, 1566.
Gas Warfare 274, 2423
Chief of Naval operations, U. S. Navy
Dept. Annual report, 1924. 264, 304.


  p. 2434 (#1398)                      

2434
[Dec.
Index to Volume 51
China.
Corvoy.
Anti-foreign disturbances, June, 1925. Stirling, Yates. Bridge across the
270, 1568.
Atlantic. 271, 1669. See also correc-
Chinese tariff conference, Peking, 1925. tion 273, 2173.
274, 2412
Cook, Cary W.
Civil War, 1924.
Merchant ship subsidy systems. 271,
1787.
Wu Pei-fu surrenders to General Feng.
National merchant marine policy. 269,
263, 165.
1298.
Description
Cook, M. G.
Cotten, L. A. Other days in Kiang-Su.
Proposal for independent air service.
264, 215.
(Illus.) 268, 952.
Corinth canal.
Foreign Relations
Photo of. 265, 421.
China turning to Russia (1925). 272, Corsairs.
2039.
I. W. V. Mendl. 268, 1001.
Conflict of cultures. 273, 2216.
Cory, C. and Son.
Cieiva giroplane.
Issues new ship's telegraph bulletin.
Description. 267, 852.
265, 518.
Cluverius, Wat T.
Cost of battleship maintenance.
Array against sovereignty. 272, 1916.
273, 2188.
Coal.
Cotten, Lyman A.
See Fuel.
Other days in Kiang-Su. (Illus.) 268,
Coast defense.
952.
Johnson, A. W. Aviation in coast Courbet (Fr. battleship).
defense. 271, 1652.
Fatal boiler accident 1924. 263, 116.
Standley, W. H. Discussion of “Avia Court of Inquiry.
tion in coast defense.” 271, .1741. Gatch, T. L. Abuse of Court of Inquiry,
Coffin Air Transport Co.
267, 797.
Plans of promoters. 269, 1286.
Coxe, Lewis.
Columbo.
Mathew Fontaine Maury. 261, 1192.
British naval base--Columbo. 263, 111.
Craven, F. S.
Columbus, Christopher.
Excellence of naval material. 271, 1573.
Gulliver, L. J. Admiral Columbus. 263, Cruisers.
96.
British cruiser, 1925. 273, 2176.
Combat methods of Japanese.
French light cruisers and flotilla leaders.
C. E. Kilbourne. 272, 2015.
274, 2355.
Communism.
Future type of cruiser. 270, 1499.
Cluverius, W. T. Array against sover New Italian cruisers. 265, 504.
eignty. 272, 1916.
New Italian scout cruisers, 1925. 270,
Comparative naval statistics.
1508.
See Navies; naval statistics.
Problems in cruiser design. 263, 149.
Compressors.
See also Battlecruisers.
A new industry-manufacture of com- | Customs, Naval.
pressor lubricants. 274, 2405.
See Naval customs.
Condensers.
Gaster, G. E. Small plant condensers.
266, 650.
Constantinople.
Dahlgren, John Adolphus (1809-1870).
Field, R. Š. Destroyer in the near East.
Earle, Ralph. John Adolphus Dahlgren.
(Illus.) Pt. 1, 264, 246; Pt. 2, 265,400.
(Port.) 265, 424.
View of harbor. 264, 248.
“Dacia” incident.
Constitution, (U. S. S.).
Wainwright, Richard. Dacia dilemma.
Krafft, H. F. New lease of life for
270, 1452.
"Old Ironsides." 272, 1938.
Dalmatia.
“Old Ironsides" campaign. 271, 1766. Field, R. S. Spalato, 1919. (Illus.)
“Constitution” and “Guerriere."
267, 775.
Reproduction of painting, “Engagement | Dardanelles campaign.
between Constitution and Guerrier." | Miles, S. Notes on Dardanelles cam-
272, 1817.
paign. (Maps.) 268, 1027.


  p. 2435 (#1399)                      

1925)
2435
Index to Volume 51
Donald, H. G.
Operation of a destroyer at full power.
263, 15.
Drill.
Allen, E. G. Discussion of “Our system
of feet training." 267, 804.
Willson, Russell. Our system of fleet
training. 266, 572.
Du Bose, W. G.
Discussion on "Proposed administrative
changes in Navy Dept." 265, 455.
Dunn, Lucius C.
Morocco-a diplomatic complex. 263,
28.
Dutch East Indies.
Bywater, H. C. Dutch East Indies:
defense. 269, 1303.
Dutton, Benjamin.
Review of Berkeley's North star navi-
gation. 265, 517.
Review of Cugle's Practical navigation.
265, 516.
Review of Japanese Hydrographic Dept.
“New altitude and azimuih tables."
267, 886.
Dyson, C. W.
Discussion of “Diesels for capital ships."
269, 1236.
Davis, R. G.
Some physical aspects of flying. 269,
1225.
Debts, international.
See International finance.
Dellinger, J. H.
Survey of current progress in radio,
1925. 267, 865.
Denver (U. S. S.).
Lands 150 officers and men at Ceiba,
Honduras. 268, 1096.
Depth finders.
Navy ocean study aided by science.
264, 336.
Destroyer division commander's inspec-
tion. V. H. Godfrey. 274, 2292.
Destroyer engineer in battle.
G. R. Fairlamb. 274, 2289.
Destroyer in the Near East.
R. S. Field. Pt. 1, 264, 246; Pt. 2, 265,
400.
Destroyers.
Bywater, H. C. Japan's giant 3,000-ton
destroyers. 266, 629.
Fairlamb, G. R. Destroyer engineer in
battle. 274, 2289.
Gautreau, J. B. Qualities of the 2400-
ton French destroyers. 263, 115.
Thurber, H. R. Some notes on destroyer
handling alongside. 269, 1202.
British post-treaty flotilla leaders. 264,
288.
French destroyer trials 1925. 274, 2354.
French destroyers and light cruisers
(1925). 269, 1258.
Diesel engines.
See Internal combustion engines.
Dinger, H. C.
Discussion on “Diesel engines for
capital ships." 271, 1738.
Discussion of "Excellence of Naval
Material.” 273, 2167.
Discussion of “Proposed changes in
Navy Dept." 270, 1489.
Disarmament.
Brandt, E. S. R. Armament by example
and arbitration. 269, 1152.
Russell, Sir H. Peace without security.
267, 814.
Discipline.
Snyder, H. R. If I were to do my
service over again. 263, 59.
Dobbin (U. S. S.).
Illustration. 263, 107.
Docks.
Royal dockyards, 1925. 272, 1972.
Dominican Republic.
Baughman, C. C. U. S. occupation of
Dominican Republic. 274, 2306.
Earle, Ralph.
John Adolphus Dahlgren (1809-1870).
(Port.). 265, 424.
Review of Norris' Annapolis: its
colonial and naval story. 273, 2223.
East, The.
See Asia.
Eberle, E. W.
Elements of sea power and future of the
navy, 272, 1832.
Eckner, Hugo. .
On airships in commerce. 264, 329.
Eclipses.
Wiley, H. V. Celestial cruise. 266, 604.
Economics.
Unemployment in Gt. Britain, 1925.
271, 1755.
Education.
Some aspects of (technical] education.
269, 1305.
Education, Naval.
See Naval education,
Efficiency reports.
Hart, T. C. Discussion on "Com-
missioned personnel problems." 264,
280.
Effingham, (H. M. S.).
I Most costly British cruiser. 265, 461.


  p. 2436 (#1400)                      

2436
[Dec.
Index to Volume 51
1819.
Ejectors.
Fleet training.
Ejectors for blowing gas from guns Willson, Russell. Our system of fleet
tested. 265, 497.
training. 266, 572.
Electric propulsion of vessels.
Flettner, Von Anton.
Great future for electric propulsion. Flettner, rotor ship. 266, 663.
269, 1274.
Flettner rotor ship.
Eller, Ernest M.
Flettner, Von Anton. Flettner rotor
Three craftsmen and the part of the ship. 266, 663.
Naval Academy in the mould of Discredited by German ship owners.
a man. 273, 2049.
267, 829.
Engineering materials.
Rules of the road for rotor ships. 269,
High temperature materials. 265, 484. 1265.
Engineering training.
Wind power ship, Buckau. (Illus.) 264,
(Brit.) naval engineering training. 269, 321.
1256.
See also Magnus effect; Rotor ships:
Engines.
Wing rotors.
Biles, Sir J. Steam or oil engines for Flettner rudder.
fast ships? 269, 1278.
See Rudders.
European war, 1914-18.
Flying Cloud (clipper).
Miles, S. Notes on Dardanelles cam Photo of model of Flying Cloud. 271,
paign. (Maps.) 268, 1027.
Flying over the polar sea.
Naval.
R. E. Byrd. 270, 1319.
Mendl, I. W. V. Corsairs. 268, 1001. Flying, some physical aspects.
R. G. Davis. 269, 1225.
Transport service
Fog signals.
Stirling, Yates. Bridge across the Řadio fog signals. 264, 335.
Atlant:c. 271, 1669. See also Correc- Foley, Paul.
tion 273, 2173.
Naval research laboratory. (Illus.) 272,
Evans, Waldo.
1925.
Development and growth of the Amer- | Folk, Winston.
ican navy. (Illus.) 272, 1897.
Basic education of officers. 264, 274.
Excellence of naval material.
Ford, Henry.
F. S. Craven. 271, 1573.
Bid for Shipping Board's scrap ships
recommended for acceptance. 271,
1790.
Ford airline.
F-5-L (U. S. sea plane).
Plans of Ford for air transportation.
Photo of type. 271, 1573.
269, 1286.
Fairlamb, George R.
Foreign trade.
Destroyer engineer in battle. 274, 2289. See subhead "Commerce" under names
Independent air force. 265, 381.
of countries.
Ferguson, K. B.
France. Colonies.
Situation in the Pacific. 270, 1551.
French loss in wars with colonies since
Field, Richard S.
1920. 274, 2410.
Destroyer in the Near East. (Illus.)
Commerce
Pt. 1, 264, 246; Pt. 2, 265, 400. French foreign trade, 1924-25. 269,
Spalato, 1919. (Illus.). 267, 775
1264.
Finance, international
French trade expansion, 1925. 272,
See International finance.
1980.
Fisher, C. W.
Foreign Affairs
Discussion of “Excellence of naval French difficulties in Syria, 1925. 274,
material." 272, 1964.
2409.
Proposed administrative changes in Official recognition of Russia. 263, 162.
Navy Dept. 265, 357.
Fleet, The.
Naval Policy
Craven, F. S. Excellence of naval Russell, Sir H. French naval policy.
material. 271, 1573.
269, 1262.
Livingston, B. Discussion of "Balanced French naval construction policy, 1924.
fleet for U.S. Navy." 271, 1744.
263, 118.


  p. 2437 (#1401)                      

1925)
2437
Index to Volume 51
1566.
Navy
· General staff.
Bywater, H. C. Impressions of French
Wright, H. J. War staff idea afloat. 274,
sea power. 271, 1762.
2289.
French naval notes, 1925. 270, 1502.
Geneva Arms Traffic Conf., 1925.
French naval notes, 1925. 273, 2192. Decisions of. 269, 1315.
French naval outlook, 1925. 267, 822.
Poison gas and bacteria protocols. 270,
French naval renaissance, 1925. 274,
2352.
Geneva Cpium Conference, 1924.
The new French fleet (1925). 264, 292. Work of. 263, 164.
Reorganization of French high com-
Germany. Army.
mand. 265, 469.
Foch on German army and armament.
267, 878.
Navy. Program.
French navy notes, 1925. 271, 1764.
Domestic Affairs
New French program, 1925. 264, 294, Dec., 1924, elections. 264, 346.
265, 470.
Navy
Riffian War, 1925
Building new cruiser (1925). 264, 297,
Peace offers withdrawn. 272, 2038.
German naval activity, 1925. 266, 628.
New warship for German navy. 265,471.
War College
Gibson, H.
French war college, 1925. 267, 817. Discussion on “Diesel engines for capital
Freemasons.
ships." 271, 1735.
Facists attack Masons in Florence, Gilmer, F. H.
(1925). 274, 2411.
Device for solving for true wind. 274,
Frost, H. H.
2286.
Discussion of "What might have Giro-plane.
happened at Jutland." 269, 1231. See Aeronautics. Aircraft.
National strategy. 270, 1343.
Gleaves, Albert.
Fuel.
Review of Farrire, C., and Chack, P.,
Synthetic fuels. 267, 826.
Combats et batailles sur mer. 271, 1806.
Tests of pulverized coal. 272, 2007. Review of Hurd's Merchant navy, 2 vols.
Fuel (oil)."
267, 882.
Fuel oil for marine engines. 265, 490. Review of Paine's Joshua Barney. 263,
Furious (Brit. aircraft carrier).
173.
Photo. 269, 1248.
Godfrey, V. H.
Fushun (steamer).
Destroyer division commander's in-
Thornycroft shallow draft ship for spection. 274, 2292.
China. (Illus.). 274, 2394.
Goff (U.S. S.)
Field, Richard S. Destroyer in the
Near East. Pt. 1, 264, 246; Pt. 2,
Gas ejectors.
265, 400.
See Ejectors.
Photo showing U. S. S. Goff at Rhodes.
Gas mask and the next war.
265, 357.
D. C. Walton. 269, 1172.
Golden Horn.
Gas warfare.
Photo of. 265, 410.:
See Chemical warfare.
Goodrich, C. F.
Gaster, G. E.
Review of Custance, Study of war. 266,
Small plant condensers. 266, 650.
688.
Gatch, T. L.
Review of Gleaves' "Life of an Ameri-
Abuse of Court of Inquiry. 267, 797. can Sailor, Rear Adm. Emory." 274,
Mooring board problem. (Illus.) 271,
2419.
1716.
Review of Meigs' Story of the seaman.
Gautreau, J. B.
265, 514.
Consequences of the triumph of the Review of Adm. Selfridge's Memoirs.
Zeppelins. 263, 117.
263, 168.
French naval notes, 1925. 264, 290. Governors.
Quadruple turret in cruisers. 266, 626. Ramsay Diesel governor. 263, 143.
Qualities of the 2400-ton French de- | Graphical aids to navigation.
stroyer. 263, 115.
W. A. Mason, 271, 1707.


  p. 2438 (#1402)                      

2438
[Dec.
Index to Volume 51
305.
Grate bars.
Gunnery training.--Cont'd
Aluminum as protective coating. 269, Hewitt, H. K. Discussion of "Possible
1276.
improvements in our gunnery train-
Gt. Brit. Foreign relations.
ing." 274, 2334.
Diplomatic relations with Mexico re Shock, T. M. Discussion of "Possible
sumed, 1925. 272, 2038.
improvements in our gunnery train-
McDonald treaties with Russia can ing." 274, 2338.
celled. 263, 160.
Gun elevation.
Naval Policy
See Guns (ordnance).
Guns (ordnance).
Bywater, H. C. British naval plans
Bywater, H. C. Suggest gun elevation
criticised. 272, 1970.
issue be settled by commission. 264,
Bywater, H. C. Cruiser strength vital
311.
to Gt. Britain. 263, 107.
Eberle report recommends moderniza.
British navy needs and the Mosul issue.
tion of ships by elevating guns. 264,
274, 2360.
Cruiser policy, 1925. 273, 2176.
British note on gun elevation question.
Maintaining the fleet. 272, 1974.
264, 330.
Naval Stations and Bases
Elevation issue believed dead. 265, 48).
Russell, Sir H. Value of Hongkong.
Elevation of guns opposed by Coolidge.
269, 1251.
265, 479.
Navy
Improved 8-in.guns forcruisers. 264,309.
Wilbur urges new long range guns for
Data on British post-treaty warships. cruisers. 264, 332.
264, 285.
Last word on 5-5-3 ratio (capital ship
н
strength, U. S. and British navies, Hammond, P. H.
1925). 269, 1270.
Discussion of “Diesel engines for capital
Navy. Dockyards.
ships." 271, 1736.
Haney, Bert E.
Royal dockyards, 1925. 272, 1972.
Commissioner Haney and Adm. Palmer
Navy. Program.
273, 2207.
1925 269, 1249
Hart, Thos. C.
272, 1968
Discussion on "Commissioned per-
sonnel problems." 264, 280.
Politics
What might have happened at Jutland.
October, 1924, elections. 263, 160.
(Illus.) 269, 1143.
Greek-Bulgarian war, 1925.
Haw, J. C.
Hostilities halted. 274, 2408.
Anti-aircraft defense. 274, 2383.
Greif (Ger, aux. cruiser).
Hawaiian islands.
See Mendl. I. W. V. Corsairs. 268, 1001. Bywater, H. C. Hawaii's naval needs.
Gripsholm (Motor ship).
271, 1767.
Illustration showing 67-ton crank shaft Hawaiian maneuvers, 1925.
of the Gripsholm. 267, 845.
See Maneuvers.
Grow, G.
Hayes, Sir B. F.
Operation of carbon dioxide refrigerat Commands Majestic on last voyage.
ing plants. 263, 139.
264, 313.
Gulliver, L. J.
Helena ( U. S. S.).
Admiral Columbus. 263, 96.
Illustration. 263, 70.
“Guarding the Giant.”
Heligoland.
Painting by Poole. 272, 1830.
Demolition of harbor and defense works.
Gunnery.
267, 827.
Bywater, H. C. Gunnery in battle of | Henderson, Sir W. H.
Jutland. 271, 1780.
Airship offensive. 271, 1756.
Sherman, F. P. Main battery elevations Capital ship problems. 274, 2347.
and fighting aircraft. 266, 600.
Some British views on airships. 274,
Gunnery training.
2342.
Blandy, W. H. P. Possible improve- | Hewitt, H. K.
ments in our gunnery training. 271, Discussion of “Possible improvements in
1696.
our gunnery training." 274, 2334.


  p. 2439 (#1403)                      

1925)
2439
Index to Volume 51
Hilliard, Robert B.
Internal combustion engines.-Cont'd
Salvage of S-19. (Illus.) 270, 1408.
Gibson, H. Discussion on “Diesel
Hindenburg, Paul von.
engines for capital ships.” 271, 1736.
Elected pres. of Germany. 268, 1089. Hammond, P. H. Discussion on “Diesel
Inauguration of Pres. Hindenberg. 269, engines for capital ships." 271, 1736.
1314.
Howard, H. S.“ Discussion of “Diesel
Hinds, A. W.
engines for capital ships.” 270, 1496.
Panama canal's biggest ship. (Illus.) Proctor, A. M. Diesel engines for capital
271, 1703.
ships. 269, 1217.
Hironori, Mizuno.
Proctor, A. M. Discussion of “Diesel
America's Pacific maneuvers. 268, 1085. engines for capital ships.” (Illus.)
History repeats.
273, 2156.
O. C. Badger. 267, 707.
Robison, J. K. Discussion of “Diesels
Honduras.
for capital ships." 269, 1237.
Denver lands 150 officers and men at Robinson, S. M. Discussion of “Diesels
Ceiba, Honduras. 268, 1096.
for capital ships." 269, 1237.
Hongkong, China.
Theobald, R. A.: Discussion on “Diesel
Russell, Sir Herbert. Value of Hong engines for capital ships." 271, 1734.
kong. 269, 1251.
Chinese gunboats to have Diesel engines
Honi Heke's War.
265, 493.
McClellan, E. B. Honi Heke's war of Double-acting Diesels. 267, 841.
1845 in New Zealand. 270, 1459. German Diesel engine practice. (Illus.)
Hood (H. M. S.).
271, 1776.
Hinds, A. W. Panama Canal's biggest Illustration of 4-stroke cycle, double-
ship. (Illus.) 271, 1703.
acting, reversible Diesel. 267, 811.
Howard, H. S.
Largest Diesel in the world. 263, 138.
Discussion of “Diesel engines for capital Superchargers. 272, 1994.
ships." 270, 1496.
Supercharging. 271, 1773.
Discussion of "Excellence of naval 10,000 h.p. Diesel for motor ship
material.” 273, 2165.
Asturias. Illustration. 271, 1753.
Howe, Walter Bruce.
Whaley constant pressure engine. 273,
Navy Day. 272, 1825.
2203.
Hughes, Charles E.
Worthington. Diesel engine has 30-day
Resigns State portfolio. 265, 508.
test. 263, 137.
Hunt, Livingston.
International finance.
Attempted mutiny on the U. S. brig |
"Somers.” (Illus.) 273, 2062.
U. S. debt settlements, Czechoslovakia
and Italy, 1925. 274, 2411.
I
Identification of stars.
International maritime law.
Sherman, F. Naval aircraft in inter-
See Stars, identification of.
national law. 274, 2259.
Industry.
International Opium Conf. 1924-25.
Snow, Elliot. Army industrial college.
270, 1469.
Results. 266, 683.
International relations.
Inspection.
Godfrey, V. H. Destroyer division
Dunn, L. C. Morocco-a diplomatic
commander's inspection. 274, 2292.
complex. 263, 28.
Insurance.
Ferguson, K. B. Situation in the Pacific.
Brown, W. E. Are you worth it? 274,
270, 1551.
2328.
Japan, U. S., and Gt. Britain. 265, 464.
Intelligence tests.
World's danger spots. 272, 2023.
Brigham, C. C. Psychological tests.
Investments. American foreign invest-
267, 875.
ments, 1925. 272, 2038.
Tisdale, M. S. Intelligence tests at the
Irak dispute.
U. S. Naval Academy. 264, 202.
League council acts. 263, 161. .
Internal combustion boiler. See Boilers.
“Isabel” (U. S. S.).
Internal combustion engines.
Illustration. 263, 74.
Dinger, H. C. Discussion of “Diesel Isis (ship).
engines for capital ships." 271, 1738. Description. 265, 450.
Dyson, C. W. Discussion of “Diesels Isle of Pines.
for capital ships.” 269, 1236.
Ceded to Cuba. 267, 881.


  p. 2440 (#1404)                      

2440
[Dec.
Index to Volume 51
Italy.
Economic situation in Italy. 272, 1981.
Progress of Facismo in Italian affairs.
(1925.) 274, 2410.
Navy
New Italian warships. (1925) 265, 504.
Japan.
Commercial and industrial position of,
1925. 272, 1983.
Army
Kilbourne, C. E. Combat methods of
the Japanese. 272, 2015.
Earthquake, 1923
Lamb, S. G. U. S. Navy and the
Japanese earthquake. (Illus.) 268,
963.
Foreign Relations
Kawakami, K. K. Says Japan publishes
unfair data regarding U. Š. Navy.
264, 314.
Russell, Sir H. Australia's appre-
hensions. 272, 2021.
Tagawa, D. America, let's reason
together. 274, 2365.
Peace protest from Tokio. 274, 2362.
Naval Policy
Bywater, H. C. Hawaiian maneuvers
and Japan's naval policy. 265, 474.
Russell, Sir Herbert. Japan's naval
policy. 265, 472.
Russell, Sir Herbert. Shadow of rising
sun. 270, 1514.
Japanese naval aims, 1925. 270, 1511.
Japanese naval plans and policies, 1924.
263, 119.
Navy
Bywater, H. C. American and Jap.
navies compared. 264, 306.
Jap. naval construction, 1925. 268, 1070
Navy. Program .
Japanese program rushed to completion.
(1925.) 264, 301.
Jellicoe, John R., viscount.
Jutland tactics defended. 264, 289.
Jenkins, C. F.
Radio vision. (Illus.) 273, 2150.
Joint army and navy operations.
W. S. Pye.
Pt. 14-262, 1963
Pt. 2-263, 1
Pt. 3—264, 233
Pt. 4–265, 386
Pt. 5–266, 589
Pt. 6—268, 975
Johnson, A. W.
Aviation in coast defense. 271, 1653.
Jones, Hilary P.
Petroleum and national defense. 272,
1838.
Jones, John Paul.
Rochester, H. A. Discussion of "Basic
education of officers." 268, 1018.
Jordan, John N.
Discussion of “Organization of Navy
Dept." 271, 1727.
Jutland, battle of.
Bywater, H. C. Gunnery in battle of
Jutland. 271, 1780.
Frost, H. H. Discussion of "What
might have happened at Jutland."
269, 1231.
Hart, T.C. "What might have happened
at Jutland.” (Illus.) 269, 1143.
Knox, D. W. Battle of Jutland. 265,
501.
Musser, Neil B. Lessons of Jutland
affecting design of turret armor. 266,
562.
K
Kawakami, K. K.
Says Japan gave out misleading naval
data. 264, 314.
Kellogg, Frank B.
__Appointed Secy. of State. 265, 508.
Kiang-Su, China.
Cotten, L. A. Other days in Kiang-Su.
268, 952.
Kieffer, H. M.
Control of the seas by an air depart-
ment? 274, 2265.
Kilbourne, C. E.
Combat methods of the Japanese. 272,
2015.
Knight, A. M.
Review of Moore's Last days of mast
and sail. 273, 2226.
Knox, Dudley W.
Another side of the 5-5-3 argument.
272, 1985.
Battle of Jutland. 265, 501.
Experiments on U.S. S. Washington of
great value in determining bombing
effects. 263, 128.
New naval conference predicted. 265,
498.
Sea power and pocketbooks. 274. 2231.
Second naval parley needed. 264, 339.
Koon, Sidney G.
American naval strength. 263, 120.
Krafft, Herman F.
New lease of life for Old Ironsides. 272,
1938.


  p. 2441 (#1405)                      

1925)
2441
Index to Volume 51
Krause, R. E.
| Litchfield (U. S. S.).
Trend of naval affairs. (1925 prize Illustration; photo taken from the ruins
essay). 266, 521.
of Korghaz castle. 264, 183.
Littlehales, G. W.
Discussion on "Star identification dia-
gram.” 271, 1723.
Lake Erie, Battle of
Finding geographic position in region of
Lewis, Charles L. Powell's Perry's vic north pole. 270, 1339.
tory on Lake Erie, 270, 1473.
Review of Goodwin's Companion to
Lamb, S. G.
azimuth tables. 272, 2045.
U. S. Navy and Japanese earthquake Livingston, Brockholst.
(1923). (Illus.) 268, 963.
Discussion of “Balanced fleet for U. S.
Lang, R. G.
Navy." 271, 1744.
Supply ship. (Illus.) 264, 268.
Discussion of "Basic education of
Langley, (U. S. aircraft carrier).
officers." 266, 611.
Photo. 269, 1135.
Discussion of "National strategy.” 272,
Latin America.
1965.
Latin America and the League of Indoctrinating civilians in naval de-
Nations. 271, 1802.
fense. (Discussion.) 263, 102.
Lawrence, David.
Locarno treaty, 1925.
Arms parley call up to Europe. 26 274, 2407.
337."
Loening amphibian plane.
League of Nations.
Successful tests (illus.). 267, 850.
Russell, Sir H. League of nations and Los Angeles (U. S. airship).
disarmament. 263, 151.
Wiley, H. V. Celestial cruise. 266, 604.
6th annual session, 1925. 273, 2213.
Los Angeles a fine job. 269, 1287.
Invites Germany to enter League. 267,
Photo showing ship at mooring mast.
880.
266, 521, 605.
British conservatives and the League. Lovette, Leland P.
263, 112.
Pampanga case, China patrol, 1923.
Lejeune, John A.
263, 76.
U.S. Marine Corps. (Illus.) 272, 1858.
Lubricating oils.
Leviathans of antiquity.
O'Neill, J. G. Selecting oils for navy
T. L. Schumacher. 265, 446.
use. 272, 2004.
Leviathan (S. S.).
New industry. 274, 2405.
Lubrication.
Reconditioning of. 265, 492.
Photo. 274, 2734.
Reduction of friction in stern tubes.
269, 1285.
Lewis, Charles Lee.
Powell's Perry's Victory on Lake Erie.
M
(Illus.) 276, 1473.
Liberté (Fr. battleship).
McCain, J. S.
Service since graduation vs. age in
Refloating the Liberte. 267, 825.
grade retirement. 267, 737.
Life insurance.
McCall (U. S. S.).
See Insurance.
Reproduction of Poole's painting
Limitation of armament.
"Guarding the Giant." 272, 1830.
Knox, D. W. New naval conference. McClellan, E. N.
predicted. 265, 498.
Discussion of "Blood-is-thicker-than-
Knox, D. W. Second naval parley water" episode. (Tattnall report,
needed. 264, 339.
1859.) 269, 1243.
Lawrence, David. Arms parley call Honi Heke's war of 1845 in New
up to Europe. 264, 337.
Zealand. 270, 1459.
Russell, Sir H. League of nations and McCracken, Alan R.
disarmament. 263, 151.
Selection and use of binoculars. 270,
Economics of the next conference. 270, 1446.
1516.
McDowell, C. S.
Navy progress and pacts: new limita Discussion on “Excellence of naval
tions called impracticable. 274, 2356. material.” 272, 1961.
Views of a 2nd disarmament conference Discussion of "Proposed changes in
(1925). 268, 1092.
navy dept." 270, 1494.


  p. 2442 (#1406)                      

2442
[Dec.
Index to Volume 51
McIntyre, M. H.
Maury, Matthew Fontaine.
Naval aircraft investigation, 1924. 263, Brandt, G. E. Maury's genius shown
145.
in old letter. 269, 1196.
McKay, Donald.
Coxe, Lewis. M. F. Maury. 269, 1192.
Donald McKay memorial. 271, 1818. Port. 269, 1107.
McKeever, Isaac.
Mélot, H. F.
McClellan, E. N. Honi Heke's war of Mélot method of airplane propulsion.
1845 in New Zealand. 270, 1459.
273, 2202.
Magnetic pole.
Memorial Hall, U. S. N. A.
Byrd, R. E. Flying over the polar sea. Photo of entrance showing Perry's motto
(Maps and illus.) 270, 1319.
flag. 273, 2056.
Magnus effect.
Mendenhall, W. K.
Description of "Magnus effect" in air Retardation of ship's speed due to
flow. 264, 321.
turning. 271, 1719.
See also Flettner rotor ship; rotor ships; | Mendi, Ing. w. v.
wing rotors.
Corsairs. 268, 1001.
Maneuvering board.
Mental tests.
Willson, Russell. Direct reading See Intelligence tests.
maneuvering diagrams. 274, 2276. Merchant marine.
Maneuvers.
Cook, Cary W. Merchant ship subsidy
Bywater, H. C. Hawaiian maneuvers systems. 271, 1787.
and Japan. 265, 474.
Knox, D. W. Sea power and pocket-
Hironori, M. America's Pacific man-
books. 274, 2231.
euvers. 268, 1085.
Palmer, L. C. Government owned
Small, R. W. Navy's effort to "take" merchant marine. 272, 1944.
Hawaii to be gigantic affair. 266, 633. World's merch. shipp'g, 1925. 271,1785.
Hawaiian maneuvers called war pro Shipping Board asks aid of Congress
voking. (1925.) 264, 317.
(1925). 264, 319.
Pacific maneuvers proposal (1925). 265, Cook, Cary. National merchant marine
466.
policy. 269, 1298.
U. S. fleet maneuvers program for 1925. Defense (and armament) of merchant
263, 122.
ships in time of war. 270, 1541.
Manufactures.
Merchant marine reserve for U. S. 269,
Snow, Elliot. Army industrial college. 1301.
270, 1469.
Shipping Board and Adm. Palmer. 274,
Marine engineering.
2397.
Donald, H. G. Operation of a destroyer Ship-owner's solution of merchant ma-
at full power. 263, 15.
rine problems. 269, 1294.
Fairlamb, G. R. Destroyer engineer in World's tonnage ("British marine en-
battle. 274, 2289.
gineering") 1925. 274, 2392.
Robison, J. K. Wise man knows his See also Shipbuilding.
tools. 272, 1882.
Mexico. Foreign relations.
Smith, R. R. Engineering economy on Japanese fish'grightscancelled. 263, 164.
auxiliary vessels. 273, 2101.
Severs diplomatic relations with Gt.
Weber, G. K., and Styer, C. W. Stand Britain, 1924. 263, 164.
ing one. 273, 2110.
Midshipmen, Japanese.
One way to dodge entropy. 263, 141. Visit American waters. 264, 318.
Position of British marine engineering, Meters.
1925. 274, 2391.
Metering of Auids. 273, 2205.
Turbine gland sealing system. 264, 325. Miles, Sherman.
Wearing of turbine blades. (Illus.) 266, Notes on Dardanelles campaign (maps).
268, 1027.
World's marine engineering situation, Miller, P. J."
1925. 272, 2000.
Underwood, E. B. “Lest we forget."
Mason, A. W.'
269, 1166.
Graphical aids to navigation. 271, 1707. | Mines, military and naval.
Masons.
Bagby, 0. W. Naval mining and naval
See Freemasons.
mines. 274, 2244.
Material, naval.
Mitchell, William.
Craven, F. S. Excellence of naval The Mitchell plan for aeronautics. 274.
material. 271, 1573.
2372.
645.


  p. 2443 (#1407)                      

1925)
2443
Index to Volume 51
Moewe (Ger. qux. cruiser).
See Mendl, I. W. V., Corsairs. 268,
1001.
Moffett, William A.
Some' aviation fundamentals (Illus.).
272, 1871.
Monarch, (H. M. S.).
Monarch tests, 1925, 266, 619.
Taken from Portsmouth and sunk in
tests. 265, 462.
Mooring board.
Brandt, G. E. Discussion of "Moor-
ing board problem." 274, 2339.
Gatch, T. L. "Mooring board problem.”
(Illus.) 271, 1716.
Willson, Russell. Direct reading ma-
neuvering diagrams. 274, 2276.
Morale.
Snyder, H. R. If I were to do my
service over again. 263, 59.
Morocco-a diplomatic complex.
L. C. Dunn. 263, 28.
Mosul dispute.
Before League of Nations Council,
1925. 273, 2213.
British navy's needs and the Mosul
issue. 274, 2360.
Motor ships.
Fine performance of. 271, 1775.
Future of motorships. 267, 843.
Motor liner Asturias. 271, 1773.
Motor ships “Asturias." 272, 2010.
Propelling machinery controversy. 272,
2003.
Shipping Board's plan to convert to
motor drive is protested by ship-
builders. 263, 130.
Shipping Board to convert 18 ships to
motor drive. 263, 132.
Musser, Neil B.
Lessons of Jutland affecting design of
turret armor. 266, 562.
Naval architecture.
Bywater, H. C., and Prendergast,
Maurice. Post-treaty naval design.
273, 2135.
Engineers see vastly improved battle-
ships. 265, 500.
Problems in cruiser design. 263, 149.
Stability of ships. 274, 2396.
Thornycroft shallow-draft ship for
Chinese rivers. (Illus.) 274, 2394.
Warships of the future. 273, 2209.
Naval art and science.
Craven, F. S. Excellence of naval
material. 271, 1573.
Naval customs.
Cups and success for seamen. 269, 1254.
Naval education.
Bunts, F. M. Discussion of "Basic
education of officers." 268, 1021.
Folk, Winston. Basic education of
officers. 264, 274.
Livingston, Brockholst. Discussion of
“Basic education of officers.” 266, 611.
Riesenberg, Felix. Discussion of "Basic
education of officers" from Nautical
Gazette. 268, 1016.
Rochester, H. A. Discussion of "Basic
education of naval officers." 268,
1018.
Naval engineering training. 269, 1256.
Naval gunnery.
See Gunnery.
Naval history.
British naval history essays. 267, 811.
Naval material.
Craven, F. S. Excellence of naval
material. 271, 1573.
Naval policy:
National advisory committee for aero.
10th annual report. 265, 493.
National Strategy. H. H. Frost. 270, 1343.
Nation in arms and a national doctrine.
J. M. Scammell. 271, 1684.
Naval administration.
Craven, F. S. Excellence of naval
material. 271, 1573.
Naval architecture.
Musser, N. B. Lessons of Jutland
affecting design of turret armor. 266,
562.
Vaval archaeology.
Schumacher, T. L. Leviathans of
antiquity. (Illus.) 265, 446.
Stirling, Yates. Some fundamentals of
sea power. 268, 889.
Naval Research Laboratory.
Paul Foley. 272, 1925.
Naval statistics.
See Navies.
Naval strategy.
Russell, Sir H. Limitations of modern
sea war. 270, 1546.
Naval strategy and tactics.
Castex, R. Effect of aircraft on future
warships. 263, 154.
Krause, R. E. Trend of naval affairs.
(1925 prize essay.) 266, 521.
Russell, Sir H. Amphibian operations.
274, 2403.
Russell, Sir H. Prevision in strategy.
264, 340.
Navies.
Bywater, H. C. World-wide activity in
naval construction. 263, 156.


  p. 2444 (#1408)                      

2444
[Dec.
Index to Volume 51
Navies.-Cont'd
Oil fields.
Comparative data for treaty navies | British naval needs and the Mosul issue.
(1925). 272, 1954.
274, 2360.
Restraint of treaty shown in. naval See also Petroleum.
construction, 1924. 266, 680.
Oil production.
War fleets of the nations (1925). 269, Production and consumption of oil in
1306.
U. S. 265, 491.
Navigation.
Oil reserves (naval).
Gilmer, F. H. Device for solving for Naval oil reserve controversy. 265, 492.
true wind. 274, 2286.
Oklahoma (U. S. S.).
Mason, W. A. Graphical aids to navi Weber, G. K., and Styer, C. W. Stand-
gation. 271, 1707.
ing one. 273, 2110.
Weems, P. V.H. Navigator's notebook.
“Old Ironsides"
273, 2138.
See Constitution (U. S. S.).
Navigation laws.
O'Neill, J. G.
Smith, A. G. Need for revision of our Selecting oils for navy use. 272, 2004.
navigation laws. 267, 834.
Opium conference, Geneva, 1924.
Navigator's Notebook.
Work of. 263, 164.
P. V. H. Weems. 273, 2138.
Navy Day.
P
Howe, W. B. Navy Day. 272, 1825.
Pacificism.
Robinson, T. D. Gentlemen, the Navy! | Cluverius, W. T. Array against sover-
272, 1817.
eignty. 272, 1916.
Near East.
Pacific Zone: British view of U. S. naval
Field, R. S. Destroyer in the Near East.
policy. Sir H. Russell. 270, 1480.
(Illus.)
Packard aircraft engine.
Pt. 1—264, 246
269, 1288.
Pt. 2—265, 400
Packard Motor Car Co.
Nelson (H. M. S.).
Packard activities in aeronautics. 269,
Russell, Sir H. New cruisers. 273, 2180.
1287.
Russell, Sir H. The new battleships. Page, Walter Hines.'
274, 2357.
Wainwright, Richard. Dacia dilemma.
Illustration. 273, 2175.
270, 1452.
Remarkable design of. 265, 483.
Palen, F. P.
Neptune (planet).
Protection of American shipbuilding.
Brandt, G. E. Maury's genius shown
270, 1532.
in old letter. 269, 1197.
Palmer, H. C.
Nevada (U. S. S.).
Discussion of "Blood is thicker than
Photo. 272, 1845.
water." 267, 801.
New York City.
Palmer, Leigh C.
Photo of harbor. 272, 1845.
Commissioner Haney and Adm. Palmer.
New Zealand.
273, 2207.
McClellan, E. N. Honi Heke's war of
Government owned merchant marine.
1845. 270, 1459.
272, 1944.
Niagara (U. S. s.).
Past and future of Fleet Corporation.
To chart Venezuelan coast. 263, 148.
268, 1079.
Niblack, A. P.
Shipping Board and Adm. Palmer. 274,
Review of Nicolai, German secret service.
2397.
Truth from Adm. Palmer. 270, 1531.
Nicaragua.
Palos (U. S. S.).
U. S. Marines leave Nicaragua, 1925.
Illus. 263, 1.
271, 1802.
Pampanga (U, S. S.).
Nimitz, o.
U. S. S. Pampanga in Chinese waters.
Lt. Nimitz's true wind solver. 274, 2286.
263, 76.
Panama Canal.
Oil (fuel).
Hinds, A. W. Panama Canal's biggest
See Fuel.
ship. (Illus.) 271, 1703.
Oil burners.
Patrick, Mason M. .
Biles, Sir J. Steam or oil engines for Report on independent air service,
fast ships? 269, 1278.
1925. 270, 1518.
Nicaragual 098. "colai, Germa


  p. 2445 (#1409)                      

1925)
2445
Index to Volume 51
Prize essays.
Peace.
| Post-treaty naval design.
Brandt, E. S. R. Armament by example H. C. Bywater and Maurice Prender-
and arbitration. 269, 1152.
gast. 273, 2135.
Pearl harbor.
Powell, William Henry.
Bywater, H. C. Hawaii's naval needs. Lewis, C. L. Powell's Perry's Victory
271, 1767.
on Lake Erie. (Illus.) 270, 1473.
“Pei-ho Episode"
Prendergast, Maurice, jt. author.
See "Blood is thicker than water."
See Bywater, Hector C. and Prender-
Peking Tariff Conference, 1925.
gast, Maurice.
Opens, with 12 foreign powers repre- Preparedness.
sented. 274, 2412.
Cluverius, W. T. Array against sover-
Pelican (U. S. S.).
eignty. 272, 1916.
Photo showing P N9-1 on board U.S. S. Rodgers, W. L. Military preparedness.
Pelican. 274, 2258.
272, 1845.
Pensacola naval station.
Tripp, G. E. Manufacturer on “pre-
Raby, J. J. Naval aviation training. paredness." 267, 831.
271, 1646.
See also U. S. Naval policy.
Persia.
Trade and industry of Persia (1925). Krause, R. E. Trend of naval affairs.
274, 2401.
1925 prize. 266, 521.
Petroleum.
List of authors and essays 1879-1924.
Jones, H. P. Petroleum and national 263, 178.
defense. 272, 1838.
Van Dyke Prize Essay (2nd prize).
See also Oil.
Eller, E. M. Three craftsmen. 273,
Philippine Islands.
2049.
Foreign trade development. 267, 839. Proctor, A. M.
Photography.
Diesel engines for capital ships-a mili-
See Radiophotography.
tary necessity. 269, 1217.
Pierre Chailley (Fr. minelayer).
Discussion of "Diesel engines for capital
Illustration. 264, 294.
ships.” (Illus.) 273, 2156.
Pilgrim (Good year airship).
Propaganda.
Inaugural Hight. 272, 1999.
Livingston, B. Discussion of “National
Photo. 272, 1967.
strategy." 272, 1965.
Planetarium.
Propellers aeronautic.
Bauersfeld, I. W. Great planetarium of Magnesium propeller successful. 267,
the German museum at Munich.
849.
(Illus.) 267, 761. Correction, 268, Propulsion methods.
1105.
See also Internal combustion engines.
Planisphere.
Rival methods of ship propulsion. 270,
Wood, A. N. Home-made planisphere. 1543.
271, 1711.
Psychological tests.
PN9-1 ('U, S, airplane).
See Intelligence tests.
Photo showing P N9-1 on board U.S. S. Publicity.
Pelican. 274, 2258.
Knox, D. W. Sea power and pocket-
Polar regions.
books. 274, 2231.
Byrd, R. E. Flying over the polar sea. Scammell, J. M. Nation in arms and
(Maps and Illus. 279, 1319)
national doctrine. 271, 1684.
Littlehales, G. W. Finding geographic Livingston, B. Discussion on in-
position in region of north pole. 270, doctrinating civilians in matters of
1339.
naval defense. 263, 102.
Port Arthur.
Pulitzer air races, 1925.
Abandoned as base by Japs. 264, 303. Photo of winner, Lt. Bettis, and Curtis
Porter, Russell.
Army racer. 274, 2340.
Leading points in world disputes dis Pulitzer trophy race. 274, 2379.
cussed at Williamstown Institute of Pye, W. S.
Politics. 272, 2023.
Joint army and navy operations.
Position finding.
Pt. 1-262, 1963
Littlehales, G. W Finding geographic
Pt. 2—263 1
position in region of north pole. 270,
Pt. 3—264, 233
1339.
Pt. 4–265, 386


  p. 2446 (#1410)                      

2446
(Dec.
Index to Volume 51
R
Pye, W. S.--Cont'd
Riff War, 1925.
Pt. 5—266, 589
France and the Riff. 273, 2215.
Pt. 6—268, 975
Progress to May, 1925. 269, 1314.
French success in Morocco. 271, 1801.
Robison, J. K.
Discussion of “Diesels for capital ships."
R-101 (Brit, airship).
269, 1237.
Description. 268, 1061.
Wise man knows his tools. 272, 1882.
Raby, James J.
Robinson, S. M.
Naval aviation training. 271, 1646.
Discussion of “Diesels for capital ships."
269, 1237.
Review of Alden and Earle's "Makers
of naval tradition." 273, 2224.
Robinson, T. Douglas.
Radio.
Gentlemen, the Navy! 272, 1817.
Breckel, H. F. Naval radio progress
Rochester, Harry A.
(1925). 267, 790.
Bachelor looks at the navy pay bills.
270, 1455.
Dellinger, J. 'H. Survey of current
Discussion of "Basic education of
progress in radio. 267, 865.
officers." 268, 1018.
Broadcasting from airships successful.
Rodgers, W. L.
263, 149.
Naval radio needs millions for modern-
Military preparedness. 272, 1845.
· ization. 265,497.
Review of Custance, Study of War.
266, 689.
Radio beams.
New radio aids for saving ships. 264,
Review of Edmund's Lawless law of
nations. 274, 2414.
334.
Rodney (H. M. S.).
Short wave sent high opens new field.
Russell, Sir H. New cruisers. 273, 2180.
266, 674.
Russell, Sir H. The new battleships.
Radio control of vessels.
274, 2357.
Radio device guides ship. 264, 333.
Remarkable design of. 265, 483.
Radio fog signals.
Rohrbach metal flying boat.
Stations in U. S. 264, 335.
Description. 268, 1076.
Radiophotography.
Illustration. 268, 1027.
Jenkins, C. F. Radio vision. (Illus.) | Roosevelt, Theodore, Pres. of U.S.
273, 2150.
Port. 272, 1827.
Ramsay Diesel governor.
Rotor ships.
Description. 263, 143.
Sail-less wind ship. 263, 133.
Refrigerating plants.
German admiralty's rotor shif. 271,
Grow, G. Operation of carbon dioxide 1775.
refrigerating plants. 263, 139.
Wing rotor. (Illus.) 274, 2390.
Reid pilot testing apparatus.
See also Flettner rotor ship; Magnus
Air ministry's exhibit at Wembly. 271, 1
effect; wing rotor.
1758.
Rudders.
Renown (H. M. S.).
First installation of 3-blade Flettner
Reconstruction of. 265, 461.
rudder. (Illus.) 263, 135.
Research.
Flettner rudder of motor ship Sorrento
Foley, Paul. Naval research laboratory. | Rule
(Illus.). 272, 2013.
Rules of the road.
272, 1925.
Retardation of ship's speed due to turning.
Navigation rules for rotor ships. 269,
1265.
271, 1719.
Russell, Sir Herbert.
Rhodes.
America's naval policy. 269, 1267.
Photo showing U.S. S. Goff at Rhodes. Amphibian operations. 274, 2403.
265, 357.
Australia's apprehensions. 272, 2021.
Richmond (U. S. S.).
Flying ships. 273, 2200.
Barker, F. V. How the navy helped French naval policy. 269, 1262.
them home. (Illus.) 270, 1415.
Japan's naval policy. 265, 472,
Riesenberg, Felix.
League of nations and disarmament.
Discussion of "Basic education of 263, 151.
officers' from Nautical Gazette. 268, Limitations of modern sea war. 270,
1016.
1546.


  p. 2447 (#1411)                      

1925)
2447
Index to Volume 51
Russell, Sir Herbert.-Cont'd
Sea power and pocketbooks.
The new battleships- Nelson and Rod D. W. Knox. 274, 2231.
ney. 274, 2357.
Seeadler, (Ger. aux. cruiser).
New cruisers. 273, 2180.
See Mendl, I. W. V. Corsairs. 268, 1001.
Pacific zone: British view of U. S.
| Seamanship.
naval policy. 270, 1480.
Thurber, H. R. Some notes on destroyer
Peace without security. 267, 814.
handling alongside. 269, 1202.
Prevision in strategy. 264, 340.
Willson, Russell. Direct reading ma-
Shadow of the rising sun. 270, 1514. neuvering diagrams. 274, 2276.
Smaller fighting ships: reaction from Shafroth, J. F.
colossal displacement. 274, 2349. Discussion of "Excellence of naval
U. S. sea power. 266, 624.
material." 273, 2164.
Value of Hongkong. 269, 1251.
Shearer, William B.
The Washington experiment. 266, 675. Bywater, H. C. The Shearer suit to halt
Will the capital ship pass? 270, 1548. scrapping of Washington. 264, 286.
Russia. Foreign Relations.
American battleship incident. 264, 303.
English treaties cancelled 1924. 263, Says U. S. “destroyer power" is mere
160.
myth. 264, 305.
France recognizes Soviet republic. 263, Shenandoah (U. S. airship)..
162.
Henderson, Sir W. H. Some British
views on airships. 274, 2342.
Navy
The aeronautical crisis, 1925. 274, 2377.
German constructors remaking Russian Loss of. 273, 2195.
navy, 263, 119.
Sherman, Forrest P.
S-19 (U. S. submarine).
Main battery elevations and fighting
Hilliard, R. B. Salvage of S-19. 270, aircraft. 266, 600.
1408.
Naval aircraft in international law. 274,
Saegmuller, G. N. tr.
2259.
See Bauersfeld, I. W. Great planetarium Seagoing aircraft (Discussion). 263, 103.
of Munich museum. (Illus.) 267, 761.
Ship ventilation.
St. Louis (U. S. S.).
See Ventilation.
McClellan, E. N. Honi Heke's war of Shipbuilding.
1845 in New Zealand. 270, 1459.
Palen, F. P. Protection of American
Salvage operations.
shipbuilding. 270, 1532.
Hilliard, R. B. Salvage of S-19. (Illus.)
Development of German merchant ship-
270, 1408.
building. 270, 1504.
Juggling with a destroyer at Scapa
Launchings of the world's shipyards,
Flow. 273, 2189.
1924. 266, 642.
Refloating the Liberté. 267, 825.
Plight of the industry (1925). 273, 2190.
Saratoga (U. S. aircraft carrier).
Position of industry in England, 1925.
Description. 268, 1073.
270, 1500.
Scammell, J. M.
Shipbuilding in Germany in 1925. 268,
Nation in arms and national doctrine.
1068.
271, 1684.
Shipbuilding record (1925) lowest since
Schumacher, T. L.
war, 271, 1782.
Leviathans of antiquity. (Illus.) 265,
State of British shipbuilding, 1925.
268, 1064.
Schuyler, G. L.
Shipping laws.
Bombing radius as affected by wind.
See Navigation laws.
274, 2242.
Ships.
Discussion on “Excellence of naval Schumacher, T. L. Leviathans of
material." 271, 1740.
antiquity. (Illus.) 265, 446.
Scott, Sir Percy.
Ships' telegraphs.
Admiral Sir P. Scott and his work. 263, Cory Co. issues new bulletin (1925).
265, 518.
Sea power.
Shock, T. M.
Eberle, E. W. Elements of sea power Discussion of "Possible improvements
and the future of the navy, 272, 1832. in our gunnery training." 274, 2338.
Stirling, Yates. Some fundamentals of Simonds, Frank H.
sea power. 268, 889.
British see war in far East. 266, 678.
446.
113.


  p. 2448 (#1412)                      

2448
[Dec
Index to Volume 51
Simpson, B. W.
Standley, W. H.
Bombing accuracy. 273, 2197.
Discussion of "Aviation in coast de
Singapore.
fense." 271, 1741.
Russell, Sir H. Value of Hongkong Stars, identification of.
(and Singapore). 269, 1251.
Burkhead, L. H., and Benson, W. H.
Churchill and Singapore base. 263, 111. Star identification of. 271, 1667.
Future of Singapore. 264, 288.
Littlehales, G. W. Star identification
Singapore and naval strategy. 268, diagram, discussion of. 271, 1723.
1058.
Statistics, naval.
Singapore question up again (1925).
See Navies; also subhead, “Navy" under
265, 463.
names of countries.
Small, R. W.
Steel.
Navy's effort to take Hawaii to be
Non-corrosive steel for turbine blades.
gigantic affair. 266, 633.
263, 138.
Smith, Alfred Gilbert.
Stern tubes.
Need for revision of our navigation
laws. 267, 834.
Reduction of friction in stern tubes.
Smith, Roy C.
269, 1285.
Discussion on “Promotion of officer
Stirling, Yates.
Bridge across the Atlantic. 271, 1669.
personnel.” 265, 454.
Line personnel situation at the present
See also correction 273, 2173.
time (1925). 268, 934.
Review of Green's Our naval heritage.
Smith, R. R.
273, 2218.
Engineering economy on auxiliary ves-
Some fundamentals of sea power. 268,
sels. 273, 2101.
889.
Snow, Elliot.
Strategy.
Army industrial college. 270, 1469. Frost, H. H. National strategy. 270,
Snyder, H. R.
1343.
If I were to do my service over again. Pye, W. S. Joint army and navy opera-
263, 59.
tions.
Some fundamentals of sea power.
Pt. 1—262, 1963
Yates Stirling. 268, 889.
Pt. 2-263. 1
Somers (U. S. brig.).
Pt. 3—264, 233
Hunt, Livingston. Attempted meeting
Pt. 4–265, 386
on the U. Š. brig Somers. (Illus.) 273,
Pt. 5—266, 589
2062.
Pt. 6—268, 975
Spalato, Dalmatia. .
Styer, C. W., jt. author.
Field, R. S. Spalato, 1919. (Illus.) 267, See Weber, G. K. and Styer, C. W.
Submarine boats.
View of city. 267, 707.
Baker, W. D. Submarine capabilities
Special Naval Board for Aircraft.
and limitations. 270, 1398
Extracts from report, 1925. 267, 856. French mine-laying submarine. 272,
Speed of ships.
1980.
Mendenhall, W. K. Retardation of
German submarine design (1925). 265,
ship's speed due to turning. 271, 1719
488.
Spencer, Philip.
Hunt, Livingston. Attempted meeting
Large French submarine for convoy
on the U.S. brig Somers. (Illus.) 273,
duty. 263, 119.
2062.
Submarine cruisers (1925). 271, 1792.
Spies.
Submersible cruisers, 1925. 266, 614.
The employment of spies. 266, 618. Supercharging.
Stack, Sir Lee.
See Internal combustion engines.
Egypt pays indemnity for murder of Supply ships.
Sir L. Stack. 264, 344.
Lang, R. G. The supply ship. (Illus.)
Stability of ships.
264, 268.
Stability standards. 274, 2396.
Staff, general.
Surveys.
See General staff.
Venezuela coast to be charted. 263, 148.
Standing One.
Syria.
Weber, G. K. and Styer, C. W. 273, Difficulties of France in Syria, 1925.
2110.
274, 2409.
775.


  p. 2449 (#1413)                      

25]
2449
Index to Volume 51
645.
Trend of naval affairs.
cna-Arica dispute.
R. E. Krause. 266, 521.
Coolidge's award final. 268, 1095. Trial trips of vessels.
Coolidge submits arbitration decision. Donald, H. G. Operation of a destroyer
267, 881.
at full power. 263, 15.
gawa, Daikichiro.
Trident Literary Society
America, let's reason together. 274, Special notice. 265, 453.
2365.
Tripp, Gary E.
ttnall, Josiah.
Manufacturer on "preparedness.” 267,
Tyler, W. C. “Blood is thicker than 831.
water." 263, 91.
Trotsky, Leon.
Copy of report on "Blood-is-thicker Dropped from Soviet War Council.
than-water" episode (Pei-ho river, 265, 512.
1859). 269, 1243.
True wind solver.
ussig, J. K.
Gilmer, F. H. Device for solving for
Balanced feet for U. S. Navy. 269, true wind. 274, 2286.
1107.
Turbines.
Discussion of "Service-since-graduation 200 horse power from 20-1b. turbine.
vs. Age-in-grade retirement." 269, (Illus.) 264, 323.
1238.
Turbine gland sealing system. 264, 325.
Length of service vs. age in grade retire Wearing of turbine blades. (Illus.) 266,
ment. 268, 919.
ylor, D. W.
Turning, retardation due to.
Review of Bodilly, Interaction between Mendenhall, W. K. Retardation of
vessels. 266, 692.
ship's speed due to turning. 271,
eobald, R. A.
1719.
Discussion of “Diesel engines for capital Turrets.
ships.” 271, 1734.
Gautreau, J. B. Quadruple turret in
ornycraft and Co.
cruisers. 266, 626.
Company builds shallow-draft ship for Musser, N. B. Lessons of Jutland
China. (Illus.) 274, 2394.
affecting design of turret armor. 266,
urber, H.R.
562.
Some notes on destroyer handling along Tyler, Hanson R. (Horse.)
side. 269, 1202.
Underwood, E. B. “Lest we forget."
gre (Italian cruiser).
269, 1166.
Photo. 270, 1498.
Tyler, Willard C.
sdale, Mahlon S.
"Blood is thicker than water." 263, 91.
Intelligence tests at U. S. Naval Acad-
U
emy. 264, 202.
inopah (U. S. S.).
Illustration of Tonopah at Spalato. 267,
Underwood, Edmund B.
707.
An international incident (Virginius
rpedoes.
affair). (Illus.) 263, 83.
Steam turbine torpedo. 264, 323.
“Lest we forget.” (“P. J." Miller and
ade.
"Horse" Tyler). 269, 1166.
See subhead, “Commerce," under names
Unemployment.
of countries.
British unemployment situation, 1925.
'aining, fleet.
271, 1755.
See Fleet training.
Unified procurement of government air-
'aining, gunnery.
craft. E. E. Wilson. 272, 1933.
See Gunnery training.
Union Jack Club.
ansportation of troops.
Its aims and achievements. 269, 1255.
Stirling, Yates. Bridge across the | U. S. Aeronautics.
Atlantic. 271, 1669. See also correc-
See Aeronautics, U. S.
tion 273, 2173.
U. S. Army.
reaties.
Snow, Elliot. Army industrial college.
Effect of the 1925 Russo-Jap. pact.
270, 1469.
265, 510.
Commerce
European security agreements signed, Knox, D. W. Sea power and pocket-
1925, at Locarno. 274, 2407.
books. 274, 2231.


  p. 2450 (#1414)                      

2450
[Dec.
Index to Volume 51
U. S. Commerce.--Cont'd
| U. S. Naval Policy.-Contd
U. S. foreign trade, 1924. 269, 1299. Eberle, E. W. Elements of sea power
Water-borne commerce through U. S. and the future of the navy. 272,
ports, 1924. 273, 2208.
1832.
Ferguson, K. B. Situation in the Pacific.
Emergency Fleet Corporation
270, 1551.
See U. S. Shipping Board.
Kieffer, H. M. Control of the seas by
an air department? 274, 2265.
Foreign Relations
Knox, D. W. Sea power and pocket-
Hironori, M. America's Pacific ma books. 274, 2231.
neuvers. 268, 1085.
Krause, R. E. Trend of naval affairs
Wile, F. W. Move to placate Japan. (1925 prize essay). 266, 521.
(1925.) 264, 299.
Livingston, B. Discussion of "Balanced
British note to U. S. on gun elevation. fleet for U.S. Navy." 271, 1744.
264, 330.
Robinson, T. D. Gentlemen, the Navy!
Debt agreement with Poland. 263, 163. 272, 1817.
Japanese see war threat in U. S. fleet Rodgers, W. L. Military preparedness.
maneuver. 264, 297.
272. 1845.
Warning to Mexico, June, 1925. 270, Russell, Sir H. America's naval policy.
1567.
269, 1267.
Russell, Sir H. Pacific zone: British
Marine Corps
view of U. S. naval policy. 270, 1480.
Lejeune, J. A. The U. S. Marine corps. Russell, Sir H. U. S. sea power. 266,
(Illus.) 272, 1858.
624.
Taussig, J. K. Balanced fleet for the
Merchant Marine
U.S. Navy. 269, 1107.
See Merchant marine.
British criticism of American naval
Military Policy
building policy. 264, 284.
Naval propaganda. 266, 622.
Rodgers, W. L. Military preparedness. Secy. Wilbur favors strong naval policy.
272, 1845.
263, 123.
Naval Academy
See also Preparedness.
Baldridge, H. A. Aviation at Naval
Naval Reserve
Academy. (Illus.) 271, 1632.
Akers, G. W. Discussion of “Naval
Eller, E. M. Three craftsmen and the
reserve training." 268, 1024. .
part of the Naval Academy in the
molding of a man. 273, 2049.
Navy
Folk, Winston. Basic education of
officers. 264, 274.
Bywater, H. C. American and Jap.
Tisdale, M. S. Intelligence tests at the
navies compared. 264, 306.
U.S. Naval Academy. 264, 202.
Bywater, H. C. American fleet out.
ranges British. 270, 1517.
Aircraft course urged for Academy.
265, 496.
Koon, S. G. American naval strength,
Flying course added to curriculum. 268,
1924. 263, 120.
1074.
Krause, R. E. Trend of naval affairs
Trident Literary Society. 265, 453. (1925 prize essay). 266, 521.
View of Chapel-night photo. 273, 2049 American naval efficiency in 1925. 265,
466.
Naval History
Last word on 5-5-3 ratio (capital ship
Stirling, Yates. Bridge across the
strength, U. S. and Brit. navies,
Atlantic. 271, 1669. See also correc 1925). 269, 1270.
tion 273, 2173.
Naval Intelligence Office
Navy. Administration.
Chadwick, D. V. Discussion of "Ad-
British aroused by naval secrets re-
vealed in U.S. 265, 462.
ministrative changes." 266, 604.
Dinger, H. C. “Discussion of proposed
Naval Policy
changes in Navy Dept." 270, 1489.
Badger, 0. C. History repeats. (1st || Dinger, H. C. Discussion of "Excellence
hon. mention, 1925). 267, 707.
of naval material." 273, 2167.


  p. 2451 (#1415)                      

1925)
2451
Index to Volume 51
U. S. 'Navy. Administration.--Cont'd | U. S. Navy Promotion and Pay.--Cont'd
DuBose, W. G. Discussion on "Pro Taussig, J. K. Discussion of "Service-
posed administrative changes in Navy since-graduation vs. Age-in-grade re-
Dept." 265, 455.
tirement. 269, 1238.
Fisher, C. W. Discussion of "Excellence Taussig, J. K. Length-of-service vs.
of naval material." 272, 1964.
Age-in-grade retirement. 268, 919.
Fisher, C. W. Proposed administrative
changes in the Navy Dept. 265, 357.
[Navy. Vessels Building
Howard, H. S. Discussion of "Ex-
1924, October. 263, 130
cellence of naval material." 273, 2165.
1925, Feb. 267, 829
Jordan, John N. Discussion on "Change
1925, Sept. 274, 2370.
in organization of Navy Dept.” 271,
Navy Department
1727.
Dinger, H. C. Discussion of “Pro-
McDowell, C. S. Discussion on "Ex posed changes in U. S. Navy Dept."
cellence of naval material.” 272, 270, 1489.
1961.
DuBose, W. G. Discussion on “Pro-
McDowell, C. S. Discussion of “Pro posed administrative changes in Navy
posed changes in Navy Dept." 270, Dept." 265, 455.
1494.
Fisher, C. W. Proposed administrative
Schuyler, G. L. Discussion of "Ex changes in Navy Dept. 265, 357.
cellence of naval material." 271, Jordan, J. N. Discussion on “Organ-
1740.
ization of Navy Dept." 271, 1727.
Shafroth, J. F. Discussion of "Ex-
McDowell, C. S. Discussion of “Pro-
cellence of naval material." 273, posed changes in Navy Dept." 270,
2164.
1494.
Wygant, B. B. Excellence of naval
Navy Yards.
material. 272, 1963.
Williams, Henry. Administration of
Navy. History.
industrial work in navy yards. 270,
Evans, Waldo. Development and 1391.
growth of American navy. (Illus.)
Shipping Board.
272, 1897.
Palmer, L. C. Past and future of Fleet
Navy. Maneuvers.
Corp. 268, 1079.
See Maneuvers.
The Board and Adm. Palmer. 274, 2397.
Commissioner Haney and Adm. Palmer.
Navy. Materiel.
273, 2207.
Wilbur's testimony, 1925, regarding Fleet Corporation and Shipping Board
navy's efficiency. 265, 476.
affairs. 272, 2008.
Wile, F. W. Navy is up to par, Coolidge Ford's bid for scrap ships (1925) recom-
believes. 265, 481.
mended for acceptance. 271, 1790.
Navy. Organization.
Requested by Coolidge to negotiate
sale of ships. 270, 1534.
Wright,'H. J. War staff idea afloat. Scrapping Shipping Board's ships. 271,
274, 2298.
1791.
Navy. Program.
Shipping Board controversy, 1925. 274,
Hundred million dollar program urged
2400.
for U. S. (1925). 264, 316.
Truth from Adm. Palmer. 270, 1531.
Program, 1925. 264, 310.
U. S. Naval Institute.
Navy. Promotion and Pay
Annual financial statement, 1924. 266,
700.
Campbell, E. H. Promotion of officer
personnel. 264, 183.
McCain, J. S. Service since graduation | V-1 (U. S. submarine).
vs. age in grade retirement. 267, 737. Illustration. 264, 283.
Rochester, A. A. A bachelor looks at | Ventilation.
the navy pay bills. 270, 1455.
Charlton, A. M. Ship ventilation in
Smith, R. C. Discussion on “Promotion 1741. 265, 437.
of officer personnel.” 265, 454.
Virginius affair.
Smith, R. Č. Line personnel situation Underwood, E. B. The Virginius affair.
at the present time (1925). 268, 934. || Illus. 263, 83.


  p. 2452 (#1416)                      

2452
[Dec.
İndex to Volume 51
655.
Visible air whistle.
Wilbur, Curtis D.
Description. 265, 486.
Navy day address of Secy. Wilbur,
Vroom, G. B.
1924. 263, 125.
Strategic value of aircraft carrier. Wile, Frederic W.
(Illus.) 263, 78.
Move to placate Japan. (1925). 264,
W
299.
Wainwright, Richard.
Navy up to par, Coolidge believes. 265,
Dacia dilemma. 270, 1452.
481.
Review of Parmalee's Blockade and Washington bombing test report. 266,
Sea Power. 263, 166.
Walton, Duncan C.
Wiley, H. V.
Gas mask and the next war. 269, 1172. Celestial cruise. 266, 604.
War.
Williams, Henry.
Frost, H. H. National strategy. 270,
Administration of industrial work in
1343.
navy yards. 270, 1391.
War staff idea afloat.
Williamstown Institute of Politics.
H. J. Wright. 274, 2298.
Porter, Russell. Leading points of
Warlick, Wm. W.
world disputes. 272, 2023.
Letter regarding lighter-than-air air Peace by cooperation is Institute's
craft carriers. 269, 1241.
message. 272, 2029.
Warner, Edward P.
Report of proceedings of 5th session,
Air policy for U. S. 267, 722.
1925. 272, 2040.
Washington Conference on Limitation of | Willson, Russell.
Armament. Knox, D. W. Another side Direct reading maneuvering diagrams.
of the 5-5-3 argument. 272, 1985.
274, 2276.
The Washington pact and Mr. Shearer, Our system of feet training. 266, 572.
266, 623.
Wilson, E. E.
Will the Washington agreement sur Aircraft engine progress. 266, 657.
vive?-a British view (1925). 265, Discussion of "Independent air force."
459.
267, 807.
Washington (U. S. S.).
Unified procurement of govt. aircraft.
Russell, Sir Herbert. Washington ex-
272, 1933.
periment. 266, 675.
Wile, F. W. Washington bombing test
Gilmer, F. H. Deivce for solving for
report. 266, 655.
true wind. 274, 2286.
American battleship incident. 264, 303. Wing rotors.
Washington tests -report of official Description and illustration. 274, 2390.
board. 266, 636.
Wolf (Ger. aux. cruiser).
See also Shearer, William B.
See Mendl, I. W. V., Corsairs. 268,
Water recovery.
1001.
Uses of water recovery. 271, 1769.
Wood, Albert N.
Wead, F. W.
Home-made planisphere. 271, 1710.
Discussion of “Limitations of aircraft
Wood, Ralph.
in naval warfare." 271, 1745.
Sanity in aviation. 269, 1133.
Weber, G. K., and Styer, C. W.
Worthington Diesel engine.
Standing one. 273, 2110.
30-day test results. 263, 137.
Weems, P. V. H.
Wright, H. J.
Navigator's notebook. 273, 2138. War staff idea afloat. 274, 2298.
Welding, electric.
Wright, W.L.
Stirling, Yates. Bridge across the Vest pocket ballistics. 273, 2138.
Atlantic. Correction, 273, 2173. Wygant, B. B.
Wembly exposition, 1924-25.
Discussion of "Excellence of naval
Air Ministry's exhibits at Wembly. 271, material.” 272, 1963.
1758.
Whaley oil engine.
Description. 273, 2203.
Yangtze patrol.
Wharton, Wallace S.
Wharton, W. S. Our Chinese navy.
Our Chinese navy. 263, 68.
263, 68.
Whistles.
Yokahama.
Visible air whistle. 265, 486.
Scenes after 1923 quake. 268, 889, 963.
Wind.


  p. (#1417)                        #

PUBLICATIONS
U.S. NAVAL INSTITUTE
NAVAL LEADERSHIP
Naval Leadership: with Some Hints to Junior Officers
and Others. 2nd Edition, revised 1925.
Containing some 200 pages of clear type on good paper, in a neat and
durable fabrikoid binding, in a size convenient for the pocket, approxi-
mately 4%x7%8". $1.50 postpaid.
NAVAL ORDNANCE
Naval Ordnance, 1925.
A text book prepared for the use of Midshipmen by Officers of the
United States Naval Academy. Revised and brought up to date.
641 pages, illustrated. $8.00 postpaid.
LAW
International Law for Naval Officers, 1923.
By Comdr. C. C. Soule, U. S. Navy, and Lieut. Comdr. C. McCauley,
U. S. Navy. 148 pages. $2.00 postpaid.
Constitutional Law. Reprinted 1924 with slight additions.
By H. J. Fenton, M.A., LL.D. 351 pages. $2.25 postpaid. This book
is now the text book on the subject at the U. S. Military Academy,
West Point.
NAVIGATION
Navigation, 1922.
By Lieut. Commanders E. A. Lofquist, and A. M. R. Allen, U. S.
Navy. 508 pages, illustrated, $5.65 postpaid.
Navigation and Compass Deviation, 1918.
By Comdr. W. C. P. Muir, U. S. Navy. 765 pages. $4.30 postpaid.
Practical Manual of the Compass, 1921.
By Captain Harris Laning, U. S. Navy, and Lieut. Comdr. H. D.
McGuire, U. S. Navy. 234 pages, illustrated, $3.90 postpaid.
Celo-Navigation, 1924.
By Commander Benjamin Dutton, U. S. Navy. Containing methods
and problems for use of the new method of reckoning time. For use
especially with Navigation, 1922. Suitable for use with any navigation
textbook. Cloth, 69 pages. Price $1.25 postpaid.
(1)


  p. (#1418)                        #

MARINE ENGINEERING
Internal Combustion Engines, 1925.
Their Principles and Applications to Automobile, Aircraft, and
Marine Purposes.
A complete and thorough revision of the 1920 edition by the Depart.
ment of Marine Engineering and Naval Construction, U. S. Navai
Academy.
Obsolete material has been omitted, and much new material has
been added, such as Diesel engines, aircraft engines and naval type-V
engine. 266 pages. $3.00 postpaid.
Naval Reciprocating Engines and Auxiliary Machinery, 1922.
By Commanders J. K. Barton, U. S. Navy, and H. O. Stickney,
U. S. Navy. 634 pages, illustrated, with Atlas containing 48 plates,
$6.50 postpaid.
Marine and Naval Boilers, 1920.
By Lieut. Commanders Frank Lyon, U. S. Navy, and A. W. Hinds,
U. S. Navy. 404 pages, illustrated, $3.80 postpaid.
Naval Turbines, 1924.
By Commanders 0. L. Cox, U. S. Navy, and M. A. Libbey, U. S.
Navy. Prepared primarily for use in the instruction of midshipmen,
the book covers the latest principles involved in turbine design and con-
struction. 251 pages with many illustrations and drawings. Price $5.00
postpaid.
How to Preserve Your Boiler, 1921.
By Captain E. P. Jessop, U. S. Navy. 23 pages. $.30 postpaid.
NAVAL COMMUNICATIONS
Notes on Naval Communications. 2nd Edition, 1924.
Compiled and revised by Lieut. A. C. Kidd, U. S. Navy. The book
contains the latest on communications, and is a necessity for those
studying for promotion. 160 pages. $1.30 postpaid.
ELECTRICAL ENGINEERING
Radio Manual. A New Textbook for Midshipmen.
Prepared for the Department of Electrical Engineering and Physics,
Naval Academy. Contains 18 chapters, and deals with both receiving
and sending. Off the press in July, 1925. Cloth. $3.00 postpaid.
Robison's Manual of Radio Telegraphy and Telephony, 1924.
6th Revised Edition, enlarged and brought up to date.
By Commander S. C. Hooper, U. S. Navy. 906 pages, illustrated.
$8.50 postpaid.
Naval Electrician's Textbook, 1922.
Vol. I. Theoretical, 640 pages, illustrated. $4.80 postpaid. Vol. II.
Practical, 473 pages, illustrated. $3.00 postpaid.
Storage Battery Manual, Including Principles of Storage
Battery Construction and Design, 1920.
By Lieut. Comdr. Lucius C. Dunn, U. S. Navy. 400 pages, illustrated.
$2.00 postpaid, formerly $7.00.


  p. (#1419)                        #

NAVAL CONSTRUCTION
Principles of Naval Architecture and Warship Construction,
1924.
By Lieut. Comdr. G. C. Manning (CC), U. S. Navy, and Lieut.
T. L. Schumacher (CC), U. S. Navy. A treatise especially prepared
to furnish in compact form the information required by the operating
personnel of the U. S. Navy. 368 pages with many illustrations and
drawings. $5.00 postpaid.
Naval Artificer's Manual, 1918.
By Lieut. McCall Pate (CC), U. S. Navy. 797 Pages, illustrated.
$2.00 postpaid.
LANGUAGES
Composition for Naval Officers, 1921.
By Professors W. O. Stevens and C. S. Alden, U.S.N.A. 235 pages.
$1.55 postpaid.
French Nautical Phrase Book and Reader, 1921.
By Professor P. J. des Garennes, U.S.N.A. 182 pages. $1.50 post-
paid.
A Spanish Nautical Phrase Book and Reader.
Reprinted 1925 with additional corrections. By the Department of
Modern Languages, U. S. Naval Academy. 175 pages. $2.00 postpaid.
AVIATION
Naval Aviation, 1925.
A text book primarily for the instruction of midshipmen, but is
valuable to the service at large. Everything of a technical nature has
been purposely excluded. Compiled by Lieut. W. W. Warlick, U. S.
Navy. 128 pages. $1.75 postpaid.
Airplanes, Airships, and Aircraft Engines, 1921.
By Lieut. Albert Tucker (CC), U. S. Navy. 448 pages, illustrated.
$3.50 postpaid.
PHYSICAL TRAINING
Manual of Athletic Requirements, 1922.
By Department of Physical Training, U. S. Naval Academy. 573
pages, illustrated. $3.75 postpaid.
MATHEMATICS
Trigonometry and Stereographic Projections, 1919.
By Professor S. J. Brown, U. S. Navy. 303 pages. $2.75 postpaid.
MISCELLANEOUS
Yankee Mining Squadron, 1920.
By Captain R. R. Belknap, U. S. Navy. 110 pages, illustrated. Price
reduced to $1.00 postpaid.
Routine Book, 1918.
By Captain R. R. Belknap, U. S. Navy. 308 pages. Price reduced
to $1.25 postpaid.
(3)


  p. (#1420)                        #

TRADE
TRADE NAVY STANDARD
MARK
BITUMINOUS COAL
Mined at Ebensburg No. 1 Mine
Annual Capacity One Million Tons
Producers
COLEMAN & CO., Inc.
PHILADELPHIA
Bankers Trust Building
NEW YORK
25 Broadway

The Advantages of FRICK
Refrigerating Machines
have put 4300 of them into successful opera-
tion.
The simple valve arrangement makes it easy
to start. It is dependable in operation, because
every feature making for long life, efficiency,
quietness, and flexibility has been built into it.
Write for illustrated booklet & quotations
FRICK COMPANY INC.
WAYNESBORO, PA.
Switchboards, Etc.
Built to Order
* LONG ISLAND CITY
NEW YORK
ELECTRIC

QRY PRODUC
ODUCTS
SPERRY
The Largest Milling
Organization in the West
Mills in California, Oregon, Washington, Utah
Daily Capacity, 27,000 Barrels; Elevator Capacity, 18,000,000 Bushels
SPERRY FLOUR CO. SAN FRANCISCO
CDCDDV DLOUD Ca
Head Office
JOHN E. LINGO & SON, Manufacturers and Erectors
TUBULAR STEEL FLAG POLES Wood Flag Poles STEEL MASTS
Coopers Point, CAMDEN, N. J.
Mention the Naval Institute-It Identifies You
(4)


  p. (#1421)                        #


Monel metal and Nickel
literature sent on request.
Physical Properties
of Monel Metal
VOLUME
NUMBER
Metal Blades in Destroyer Turbines
How Material Costs Affect Pump Economy
MONEL METAL and
NICKEL LITERATURE
and address filed in bo
Check literatare desired cm
DESCEUTIVE
NIELSEN SURVEYS
TECHNICAL
.
INCO MAGAZINE
Dereted is the latest of
Jesu
EW LITERATURE
IN
TEMS
The International Nickel Co.
67 Wall Street, New York City, N. Y.
Please send me, at the address given below, your "List B”
of Monel Metal and Nickel literature. I understand that
I am to check this list according to literature desired.
Name
Ship or Station.............
Address Via.......
N. I. P.
Mention the Naval Institute-It Identifies You
(5)


  p. (#1422)                        #

LOVE NEST
The Best Eating Candy Bar in the
World for a Nickel
THE EUCLID CANDY CO.
Factories
New York Cleveland San Francisco
CRESCENT REFRACTORIES COMPANY
FIRE CLAY BRICK AND DUST
HIGH TEMPERATURE CEMENT
CURWENSVILLE, PENNA.
INDIANA CONDENSED MILK CO.
COLSPRING BRAND EVAPORATED MILK
Main Office Box 895
INDIANAPOLIS, INDIANA
THE whole personnel
of this Company is standing
by to be of assistance to
the United States Navy111
to render service and to
furnish petroleum products.
STANDARD OIL COMPANY
(California)
Mention the Naval Institute It Identifier You


  p. (#1423)                        #


U. S. Navy Department
SEATTLE
TACOMA
AT
SO
PORTLAND
110
CUB)
COMP
CAN
Lubricating Oils
Sustained Item No. NAME
Quality 1-Avon Ice
Marine
Machine "B"
Lubricants
2-Avon Turbine
Oil Light "C
3-Avon Turbine
Oil Medium "C"
4-Avon Turbine
THESE cities form a service
Oil Heavy "C"
chain for Associated
-Avon Turbine
Practical Marine Lubrication
Oil Extra Heavy "C"
Service on the Pacific Coast.
6-Avon Turbine
From Canada to Mexico,
Oil Ultra Heavy "C"
Avon Marine Lubricantsand
other Associated products
7–Cycol Aero Oil No. 4
are available. There are no
8-Cycol Aero Oil No. 3
long waits for shipments to 9Avon Mardex
arrive and our staff of marine Marine Engine Oil
engineers is always ready to 10—Avon Mineral
help you solve your lubrica-
Marine Engine Oil
tion problems
11-Bryso Marine
Steam Cylinder Oil
A post card addressed 12—Hyso Marine
to our office nearest you
will put this money-sav.
Steam Cylinder Oil
ing service in motion.
HONOLU
ogt
SAN
FRANCISCO
OAKLAND
SANTA CRUZ
MONTEREY
SANTA BARBARA
LOS ANGELES HARBOR
SAN DIEGO
ASSOCIATED OIL COMPANY
SAN FRANCISCO, CALIF.
Your Condenser Problems
DUBILIER engineers can efficiently solve your
condenser problems.
DUBILIER is the pioneer manufacturer of fixed
condensers.
DUBILIER condensers are now used in practi-
cally every governmental radio station and are
meeting the test of time in Super-Power trans-
mitting stations.
Dubilier
CONDENSER AND RADIO CORPORATION
Mention the Naval Institute-It Identifies You
(7)


  p. (#1424)                        #

NAVAL OFFICERS' UNIFORMS AND EQUIPMENT
When in Bremerton, Navy Yard, Puget Sound, call on
PAUL MEHNER, Tailor and Importer
Local Representative Officers' Uniform Shop
409 Washington Ave.
Bremerton, Wash,
Phone 3 L
THE OHIO BRUSH COMPANY
Established in the Year 1879. Office and Factory: 3093-97 East 78th St
CLEVELAND, OHIO
Manufacturers of Quality Brushes of All Kinds
BOEING AIRPLANE CO.
Manufacturers of
COMMERCIAL and MILITARY
AIRCRAFT
SEATTLE, WASHINGTON
Satisfies Every Radio Wish
THE MELCO SUPREME RECEIVER
A five tube tuned radio frequency receiver that embodies
every feature demanded by the most discriminating enthu-
siasts for perfect radio reception. The Melco Supreme really
amazes in its performance any time and any place.
If you build your own, Melco Knock-Down Kits are available.
Your dealer will be glad to demonstrate. Ask for our
literature. It's interesting.
AMSCO PRODUCTS CO. FAIRBANKS BLDG. NEW YORK

Window Screen and Storm Sash
HANGERS AND
FASTENERS
Garage Door
BOLTS AND HOLDERS
PHENIX MFG. CO.
018 Center Street
MILWAUKEE, WIS.
Mention the Naval Institute-It Identifies You
(8)



  p. (#1425)                        #

OXY-ACETYLENE WELDING
AND CUTTING EQUIPMENT
High Pressure Gas Apparatus
TRADE
MARK

Torches for
Welding
Cutting
Brazing
Etc.
Drum Valves for
Oxygen
Acetylene
Carbonic Gas
Etc.
Regulators for
Oxygen
Hydroge:
Acetylena
and All G25.1
Manifolds
Charging
and
Discharging
High Pressure
Fittings
Tees
Elbows
Master Valves
Welding Hccc
All Accessories
Rego No. 962 Oxygen Valve
THE BASTIAN-BLESSING COMPANY
240-258 E. Ontario St., CHICAGO, ILL.
THE BASTIAN-BLESSING COMPANY
MEET OUR MR. LANGUILLE
Who represents us and our can-
dies. He has a line of bars, box
candies, etc., which will appeal
to the navy trade.
IMPERIAL CANDY COMPANY
SEATTLE, U. S. A.
“Visit Us When In Seattle"
Mention the Naval Institute-It Identifies You
(9)


  p. (#1426)                        #


Kinney Fuel Oil Service Pump
The Pump shown in the
above cut is built in sizes
ranging from 5 to 10
GPM at 300 pounds pres-
sure and from 10 to 60
GPM at 60 pounds pres-
sure. Larger sizes will be
furnished on application,
KINNEY MFG. CO., BOSTON, MASS.
SURGICAL SUPPLIES
manufactured by Bauer & Black are accepted everywhere
as meeting all the requirements as to quality and sterility.
They are dependable, which is the supreme test of all
surgical dressings.
SPECIALTIES
Handy Fold Gauze Picric Acid Gauze
Surgical Lubricant Handy Packer Strips
Zinc Oxide Adhesive Plaster
Moleskin Adhesive Plaster
Dermal & Tension Sutures
Full Line of Sutures and Ligatures
Catgut-Silk-Silkworm Gut
Kangaroo Tendon
Copy of Booklet on Ligatures and Sutures Sent on Request

68 Bauer & Black
MAKERS OF STERILE BURGICAL DRERINGS AND ALUED POOVCTS
CHICACO NEW YORK - TORONTO
Mention the Naval Institute-It Identifies You
(10)


  p. (#1427)                        #

THE ANNAPOLIS BANKING & TRUST COMPANY
ANNAPOLIS, MD.
Safe Deposit Boxes for Rent
Total Resources-$2,400,000
4% Paid on Savings Accounts—2% Paid on Checking Accounts
Foreign Exchange and Travelers Checks Issued
Since its Foundation this Bank has handled the moneys of the Officers and
Midshipmen of the United States Navy. We invite you to make this Bank
your Business Home throughout your Naval Career
JAMES A. WALTON RIDGELY P. MELVIN F. H. THOMPSON, JR.
President
Vice President and Attorney
Treasurer
Gould Battery
For Every Battery Purpose!
THE GOULD STORAGE BATTERY COMPANY, Inc., 250 Park Ave., N. Y
Laundry Machinery
The American Laundry Machinery Company has
planned and equipped the laundries of many of the
foremost military and naval hospitals in this
country. It maintains a corps of engineers who
specialize in this work.
If you have any questions pertaining to modern
hospital laundry practice, you will find consultation
with these specialists advantageous. This service
is gladly offered without any obligation on your part
whatsoever.
The American Laundry Machinery Company
Norwood Station, Cincinnati, Ohio
The Canadian Laundry Machinery Co., Ltd., 47-93 Sterling Road,
Toronto 3, Ontario, Canada
Agents:
British-American Laundry Machinery Co., Ltd., Underhill Street,
Camden Town, London, N. w. i, England
COSBY PRODUCTS COMPANY
Manufacturers of Cleaning Compound
Marvel Silver Polish
Marvel Metal Polish
Marvel Aluminum Polish
Supreme Metal Polish
549 Fulton Street, CHICAGO, ILL.
Mention the Naval Institute-It Identifies You
(11)


  p. (#1428)                        #


Thoroughly Dependable
SHELL COMPANY
OF CALIFORNIA
ASCOLOY
STAINLESS
Resists
Rust – Heat – Wear
Allegheny Ä Steel Company
Brackenridge *02 Pennsylvania, U. S. A
THE CARPENTER STEEL COMPANY
READING, PA.
Highest Grade Tool, Alloy and
Non-Corrosive Steels
H. M. SAWYER & SON
EAST CAMBRIDGE, MASS.
Oiled Clothing for Naval Uses
Also Lightweight Colored Coats (Red, Blue and Green)
for Women and Children
Mention the Naval Institute-It Identifies You
. (12)


  p. (#1429)                        #

THE DOUGLAS COMPANY
SANTA MONICA, CALIF.
Airplane Development and Production
COMMERCIAL AND MILITARY TYPES
Whatever Your
Question

Be it the pronunciation of vitamin or marquisette or soviet,
the spelling of a puzzling word--the meaning of overhead,
novocaine, etc., this “Supreme Authority"
Webster's New International Dictionary
contains an accurate, final answer. 407,000 words. 2700 pages. 6000 illustra-
tions. Constantly improved and kept up to date. Copyright 1924. Regular
and India Paper Editions. Write for specimen pages, prices, etc. Cross Word
Puzzle workers should be equipped with the New International, for it is used
as the authority by puzzle editors. FREE Pocket Maps if you name Proceedings
of U. S. Naval Institute.
G. & C. MERRIAM COMPANY, Springfield, Mass., U. S. A.
The Farmers National Bank of Annapolis, Md.
GROSS ASSETS
4% INTEREST ON:
$3,167,723.34
SAVINGS ACCOUNTS
STORAGE VAULTS SAFE DEPOSIT BOXES
ESTABLISHED 1805
GEO. W. HARTZELL, Piqua, Ohio
Wholesale Manufacturer of
AMERICAN WALNUT LUMBER AND FANCY VENEERS
We Use the Genuine Old-fashioned Soft Ohio and Indiana Walnut
W. MEADE HOLLADAY
President
CHARLES F. LER
Vice-President
D. J. THOMPSON
Cashier
JOHN M. GREEN
Asst. Cashia
The State Capital Bank of the E. S. T. Co.
Church Circle & Gloucester St., Annapolis, Md.
“Naval Accounts Solicited"
It Identifies You
Mention the Naval Instituto
(13)


  p. (#1430)                        #

Power - Economy . Performance
Insured When Your Motor Is Equipped with the Famous
STROMBERG CARBURETOR
Best for Aeroplanes, Boats, Trucks and Passenger Cars
STROMBERG MOTOR DEVICES COMPANY
68 E. 25th St.
CHICAGO, ILL.
IMPERVIOUS VARNISH CO.
Manufacturers
Electrical Insulating Varnishes
Baking Enamels, Lacquers, Coil and
Special Varnishes
421 Wood Street PITTSBURGH, PA.
New England Coal & Coke Company
MINERS AND SHIPPERS
STEAM and GAS COALS
FROM THE
New River, Pocahontas, Pennsylvania and Fairmont Fields
GENERAL OFFICES
111 Devonshire St.
Boston, Mass.
BRANCH OFFICES
Citizens Bank Bldg.
Cunard Bldg.
Continental Bldg.
Norfolk, Va.
New York, N. Y.
Baltimore, Ma
Standard Steam Pressure Reducing Valves and
Pump Governors for Marine Service
Mason Regulator Co.
Boston, Mass.
Mention the Naval Institute-It Identifies You
(14)


  p. (#1431)                        #

The Welding Rod of a Thousand Uses
TOBIN BRONZE
WELDING RODS
REG.U.S. PAT. OFF
With the oxy-acetylene process all kinds of iron and
steel parts are welded satisfactorily with Tobin Bronze
at a dull red heat. Dismantling, preheating and re-
assembling are seldom necessary. Supplied by leading
distributors. Manufactured solely by
THE AMERICAN BRASS COMPANY
General Offices: Waterbury, Connecticut
STRATFORD OAKUM
Known as the World's Best
for Nearly a Century
GEORGE STRATFORD OAKUM CO.
Jersey City
New Jersey
VLLULLOWIEDOTOVOLA
Ford Instrument Company, Inc.
Rawson St. and Nelson Ave.
LONG ISLAND CITY, N. Y.
RUODI D'QQIQIY
beebi
GUN FIRE CONTROL APPARATUS,
SCIENTIFIC, MATHEMATICAL AND
CALCULATING INSTRUMENTS
CONSULTING ENGINEERS
W. H. WYATT LUMBER COMPANY
PHILADELPHIA
Specialists in Pacific Coast Products
Cargo and Rail Shipments
ATLANTIC COAST SHIPPERS
ALASKA SHIPPERS
PORT BLAKELY MILL CO.
LUMBER, LOGS AND TIMBERLANDS
FOREIGN AND DO MESTIC CARGOES
6100 Arcade Square
SEATTLE, WASHINGTON
Mention the Naval Institute-It Identifies You
(15)


  p. (#1432)                        #

New-edition
1926

136 pages
METALLIC
PACKING
DO YOU KNOW
PACKING?
Observations and findings of sci-
entific accuracy covering experi-
ence of many years progressive
work in packing marine and
stationary reciprocating rods,
centrifugal pumps, refrigera-
tion systems, superheat,
plungers, etc. New material
never before published on
stuffing box proportions and
designs. Complete. Reli-
able. A text book. Send
the coupon for complimen-
tary copy.
Name.....
Company
Address.
Crane Packing Company
1821 Cuyler Avenue, 109 Broad Street
Chicago New York
CONSOLCO
(Wawan
SHEET PACKING
WOUD
H. P. SHEET NO. 500 NO. 567 FOR LIQUIDS
A compressed asbestos sheet suit A plant fibre sheet for joints of
able for superheated steam at 300 lubricating and fuel oil also all
pounds pressure and 625 degrees F. gasoline joints.
temperature and for H. P. joints of Wisoid contains no rubber or as-
internal combustion engines.
bestos and is not affected by action
Furnished in thicknesses of 1/64 of gasoline, oils, greases.
to 44" in sheets of various sizes.
Is recommended for all liquid
Consolco can be furnished in gas conditions under 300° F. tempera-
ket formall shapes and sizes.
ture.
Manufacturers of High Grade Packings for All Conditions
CONSOLIDATED PACKING AND SUPPLY CO., 21 Barclay St., New York

POWER, ELECTRICAL and
INDUSTRIAL MACHINERY
[LECTRICAL Machinery, Steam Engines, Steam Tur.
L bines, Condensers, Gas Engines, Oil Engines, Hydraulic
Turbines, Pumping Engines, Centrifugal Pumps, Mining
Machinery, Metallurgical Machinery, Crushing M
COMPLETE POWER Cement Machinery, Flour Mill Machinery, Saw Mill Machin.
UNITS WITH ANY ery, Air Compressors, Air Brakes, Steam and Electric Hoists,
TYPE OF
Farm Tractors, Power Transmission Machinery, Perforated
PRIME MOVER
Metals, Timber Preserving Machinery.
ALLIS-CHALMERS MANUFACTURING CO.
MILWAUKEE, WIS. U.S.A.
Mention the Naval Institute-It Identifies You
(16)


  p. (#1433)                        #


Metallic Packing
FOR
All Conditions
SAN
OF
Marine Service
Send for Catalogue and List of Users
FRANCE PACKING COMPANY
6506 TACONY ST., PHILADELPHIA, PA.
GYRO-PILOTS GYRO SHIP STABILIZERS GYRO-COMPASSES
NAVIGATIONAL INSTRUMENTS
GUN FIRE CONTROL APPARATUS
NAVAL, MILITARY AND COMMERCIAL SEARCHLIGHTS
NAVIGATION PRINSTRUMENTS***.com
THE SPERRY GYROSCOPE COMPANY
LONDON
NEW YORK
TOKYO
15 Victoria Street Manhattan Bridge Plaza, B
Mitsui Building
SPERRY
FOR BETTER NAVIGATION
:
JINDICATING|
mperature (IND
instruments
RECORDING
JCONTROLLING
The Line is Complete
Write
For Catalogs
Taylor Instrument Companies
ROCHESTER, N. Y., U. S. A.
CANADIAN PLANT
TYCOS BUILDING, TORONTO
There is a Tycos or Taylor Temperature Instrument for Every Purpose
Mention the Naval Institute-It Identifies You
(17)


  p. (#1434)                        #

Refrigerators should be

white outside as well as
inside. An aid to clean-
liness and sanitation.
White porcelain enamel
fused on steel will hold
its immaculate color for
years—will not craze or
peel.
The famous Bohn Syphon
Refrigerator is now made
only in white porcelain both
inside and outside. All
standard sizes. At prices
little more than the old
fashioned wood box.
Send for Catalogue.
BOHN REFRIGERATOR COMPANY
ST. PAUL, MINNESOTA

Marine Refrigeration
York CO, Refrigerating Machines
are specially designed to meet every
refrigerating requirement in the
Navy and Marine Service,
They are built in sizes ranging from
14-ton refrigerating capacity up-
wards, and can be driven by any
available power.
YORK MANUFACTURING CO.
Ice Making and Refrigerating
Machinery Exclusively
YORK
PENNA.
WHITMER-PARSONS PULP & LUMBER COMPANY
Manufacturers
SPRUCE - HARDWOODS - HEMLOCK
OFFICE: 1411 Finance Bldg., Philadelphia, Pa.
MILLS: Horton, W. Va.; Ravensford, N. C.; (Sunburst, N. C.)
AMERICAN TWIST DRILL & TOOL COMPANY
MANUFACTURERS OF
FORGED HIGH SPEED DRILLS OF QUALITY
DETROIT, MICH.
Mention the Naval Institute-It Identifies You
(18)


  p. (#1435)                        #


SEMPER
PARATU
16th Infantry
Enright,
Gresham and Hay!
Every soldier, from buck to "wax works,” clenched his
ist more determinedly as he thrilled at the news of the
glorious death of these men—the first of the American
Army to be casualties in the World War.
At 10 P. M., on the night of November 3rd, in '17, in
Barthlemont, the 2nd Battalion of the 16th Infantry
-elieved the French on a hill jutting out from the Rhine-
Marne Canal. At about 3 A. M., the Boche opened up
vith their artillery and machine guns, the official German
velcome to the American soldiers. While the box bar-
age isolated one platoon in a bit of trench the Germans
eaped over the parapet and came to grips with the
lefenders. The Americans were inexperienced in the
actics of trench raids, but they fought like demons with
ists and rifle butts in this mêlée of death.
The trench was held and the Germans driven off, but in
ts muddy bottom lay three men, America's first dead
n the cause of human freedom. These men were
Corporal James B. Gresham, Private Thomas F. En-
Fight, and Private Merle D. Hay, all of Company F,
16th Infantry
E. I. DU PONT DE NEMOURS & CO., Inc.
Wilmington, Delaware
Du Pont Powder
has been insep-
arably connected
with the combat
history of every
organization in
the service. In
1802, practically
all du Pont Pow-
der was made for
military purposes.
Today, 98% is
produced for in-
dustrial uses.
QU POND
Mention the Naval Institute-It Identifies You
(19)


  p. (#1436)                        #


Fuel is injected into
the cylinders in a min-
utely atomized form by
the aid of high-pressure
air. Ignition is caused
solely by the heat of
air compressed in the
cylinders prior to fuel
injection,
Conversion to oil engine
drive at minimum cost
THE Bethlehem Oil Engine Bethlehem Oil Engine can be
simplifies the conversion installed without changing the
of steamships to oil engine stern construction and without
power and minimizes the cost. enlarging the propeller shaft.
It is the unusual compactness of The oil engine can be placed in
the Bethlehem Oil Engine that the machinery space formerly
makes its installation so rela occupied by the steam engines
tively simple. This American and boilers.
designed engine is of the two-
cycle type, combining maximum Bethlehem engineers will wel-
power with minimum weight and come an opportunity to explain
space occupied.
the advantages of the Bethlehem
Oil Engine to any interested
In the majority of vessels, the shipowner.
BETHLEHEM SHIPBUILDING CORPORATION, LTD., BETHLEHEM, PA.
General Sales Offices: 25 Broadwav. New York City


BETHLEHEM
OIL ENGINE Lange Unit
Large Unit
Type -.
Mention the Naval Institute-It Identifies You
(20)


  p. (#1437)                        #


C-30242:7
1500 S.H.P., 90 R.P.M. Engine for Standard Oil Co. (N.J.)
DISTINCTIVE FEATURES,
Cylinder head is symmetrical through any section with only
one opening through the center;
Scavenging and charging air enters cylinder through a double
row of wall ports, the upper row being controlled by auto-
matic valves, thus eliminating cylinder head scavenging
valves;
Exhaust is blown out of cylinder through wall ports, avoiding
exhaust valves;
Reversing is accomplished by swinging the cam rollers—one
set of rollers for running forward and one set for running
astern—without shifting the camshaft.
Busch-Sulzer Bros. -Diesel Engine Co.
ST. LOUIS, MO.
Mention the Naval Institute-It Identifies You
(21)


  p. (#1438)                        #

MORE ADVENTURES OF
BURGESS
RADIO BATTERIES
The same Burgess Radio
'A', 'B' and 'C' Batteries
which are today faith.
fully serving the nation's
armed forces on land and
sea and in the air, and
used by leading radio
broadcasting stations,
experienced radio engi-
neers and amateurs, are
sold in your own com-
munity by your own
dealer for your own re-
ceiving set.
When you replace your
old batteries, ask your
dealer for Burgess. In-
sist upon this brand of
laboratory products-
you will receive the same
measure of satisfactory
service that has won the
confidence of the radio
public.
"ASK ANY RADIO ENGINEER"
BURGESS BATTERY COMPANY
Engineers DRY BATTERIES Manufacturers
Flashlight - Radio · Ignition · Telephone
General Sales Office: Harris Trust
Bldg., Chicago
Laboratories and Works: Madison, Wis.
In Canada : Niagara Falls and Winnipeg

The US Navy Uses
USE SASIO BRES

BURGESSU
"A"
BATTERY
OURCES
BATTERY
CU TUBES
RADIO
SERVICE
US
BURGESS
BATTERY
Mention the Naval Institute-It Identifies You
(22)


  p. (#1439)                        #

ADMIRAL PORTER
was the First President
U. S. Naval Institute
Over 60% of Retired Flag Officers
Retain Their Membership
Why Are
80% of the Rear Admirals
70% of the Captains
60% of the Commanders
57% of the Lieutenant-Commanders
46% of the Lieutenants
on the Active List Today Members?
TO THE YOUNGER OFFICERS:
The above figures are significant in that
they mean that officers as they reach the
top of their profession have found it in-
creasingly necessary to keep abreast of the
current of progress.
Yearly cost of Membership (including
Proceedings) $3.00
Address:
SECRETARY-TREASURER
U. S. NAVAL INSTITUTE
Annapolis, Md.


  p. (#1440)                        #

U. S. NAVAL INSTITUTE
PROCEEDINGS


  p. (#1441)                        #



  p. (#1442)                        #



  p. (#1443)                        #




  p. (#1444)                        #




  p. (#1445)                        #


BOUND
UNIVERSITY OF MICHIGAN
OCT 131926
JNIV. OF MICHI
LIBRARY
3 9015 07709 5761


#blankp. (#1446)                        #


